Vol. I. B
CHAPTER I.
Of the Kingdom of Granada, and the tribute which it
paid to the Castilian crown.
The
history of those bloody and disastrous wars,
which have caused the downfall of mighty empires,
(observes Fray Antonio Agapida,) has ever been
considered
a study highly delectable, and full of
precious
edification. What then must be the history of
a pious crusade, waged by the most Catholic of
sovereigns
,
to rescue from the power of the Infidels one
of the most beautiful but benighted regions of the
globe? Listen then, while, from the solitude of my
cell, I relate the events of the conquest of Granada,
where Christian knight and turbaned Infidel
disputed
,
inch by inch, the fair land of Andalusia, until
the crescent, that symbol of heathenish abomination,
was cast down, and the blessed cross, the tree of our
redemption, erected in its stead.
Nearly eight hundred years were past and gone,
since the Arabian invaders had sealed the perdition
of Spain, by the defeat of Don Roderick, the last
of her Gothic kings. Since that disastrous event,
kingdom after kingdom had been gradually recovered
by the Christian princes, until the single, but
powerful
,
territory of Granada alone remained under
domination of the Moors.
This renowned kingdom was situated in the
southern part of Spain, bordering on the
Mediterranean
sea, and defended on the land side by lofty
and rugged mountains, locking up within their
embraces
,
deep, rich, and verdant valleys, where the
sterility of the surrounding heights was repaid by
prodigal fertility. The city of Granada lay in the
centre of the kingdom, sheltered as it were in the
lap of the Sierra Nevada, or chain of snowy
mountains
.
It covered two lofty hills, and a deep valley
which divides them, through which flows the river
Darro. One of these hills was crowned by the
royal palace and fortress of the Alhambra, capable
of containing forty thousand men within its walls
and towers. There is a Moorish tradition, that the
king who built this mighty pile, was skilled in the
occult sciences, and furnished himself with gold and
silver for the purpose, by means of alchemy.
[3]
[3]
Zurita, lib. 20. c. 42.
Certainly
,
never was there an edifice accomplished in a
superior style of barbaric magnificence; and the
stranger who, even at the present day, wanders
among its silent and deserted courts and ruined
halls, gazes with astonishment at its gilded and
fretted
domes and luxurious decorations, still retaining
their brilliancy and beauty in defiance of the ravages
of time.
Opposite to the hill on which stood the
Alhambra
,
was its rival hill, on the summit of which was a
spacious plain, covered with houses and crowded
with inhabitants. It was commanded by a fortress
called the Alcazaba. The declivities and skirts of
these hills were covered with houses to the number
of seventy thousand, separated by narrow streets
and small squares, according to the custom of
Moorish
cities. The houses had interior courts and
gardens
,
refreshed by fountains and running streams, and
set out with oranges, citrons, and pomegranates, so
that as the edifices of the city rose above each other
on the sides of the hill, they presented a mingled
appearance of city and grove, delightful to the eye.
The whole was surrounded by high walls, three
leagues in circuit, with twelve gates, and fortified
by a thousand and thirty towers. The elevation of
the city, and the neighborhood of the Sierra Nevada
crowned with perpetual snows, tempered the fervid
rays of summer; so that, while other cities were
panting with the sultry and stifling heat of the
dog-days
,
the most salubrious breezes played through the
marble halls of Granada.
The glory of the city, however, was its vega or
plain, which spread out to a circumference of
thirty-seven
leagues, surrounded by lofty mountains. It
was a vast garden of delight, refreshed by numerous
fountains, and by the silver windings of the Xenil.
The labor and ingenuity of the Moors had diverted
the waters of this river into thousands of rills and
streams, and diffused them over the whole surface
of the plain. Indeed, they had wrought up this
happy region to a degree of wonderful prosperity,
and took a pride in decorating it, as if it had been a
favorite mistress. The hills were clothed with
orchards
and vineyards, the valleys embroidered with
gardens, and the wide plains covered with waving
grain. Here were seen in profusion the orange, the
citron, the fig, and pomegranate, with great
plantations
of mulberry trees, from which was produced
the finest of silk. The vine clambered from tree to
tree; the grapes hung in rich clusters about the
peasant's cottage, and the groves were rejoiced by
the perpetual song of the nightingale. In a word,
so beautiful was the earth, so pure the air, and so
serene the sky, of this delicious region, that the
Moors imagined the paradise of their Prophet to be
situated in that part of the heaven which overhung
the kingdom of Granada.
[4]
[4]
Juan Botero Benes. Relaciones Universales del Mundo.
This rich and populous territory had been left in
quiet possession of the Infidels, on condition of an
annual tribute to the sovereign of Castile and Leon,
of two thousand doblas or pistoles of gold, and
sixteen
hundred Christian captives; or, in default of
captives, an equal number of Moors to be
surrendered
as slaves; all to be delivered in the city of
Cordova.
Garibay. Compend. lib. 4. c. 25.
As the era at which this chronicle commences,
Ferdinand and Isabella, of glorious and happy
memory
,
reigned over the united kingdoms of Castile,
B 2 3
Leon, and Arragon; and Muley Aben Hassan sat on
the throne of Granada. This Muley Aben Hassan
had succeeded to his father Ismael in 1465, while
Henry IV., brother and immediate predecessor of
queen Isabella, was king of Castile and Leon. He
was of the illustrious lineage of Mohammed Aben
Alaman, the first Moorish king of Granada, and was
the most potent of his line. He had in fact
augmented
in power, in consequence of the fall of other
Moorish kingdoms, which had been conquered by
the Christians. Many cities and strong places of
those kingdoms, which lay contiguous to Granada,
had refused to submit to Christian vassalage, and had
sheltered themselves under the protection of Muley
Aben Hassan. His territories had thus increased in
wealth, extent, and population, beyond all former
example, and contained fourteen cities and
ninety-seven
fortified towns, besides numerous unwalled
towns and villages, defended by formidable castles.
The spirit of Muley Aben Hassan swelled with his
possessions.
The tribute of money and captives had been
regularly paid by his father Ismael; and Muley
Aben Hassan had, on one occasion, attended
personally
in Cordova, at the payment. He had
witnessed
the taunts and sneers of the haughty
Castilians
;
and so indignant was the proud son of Afric
at what he considered a degradation of his race, that
his blood boiled whenever he recollected the
humiliating
scene.
When he came to the throne, he ceased all
payment
of the tribute; and it was sufficient to put him
in a transport of rage, only to mention it. He
was a fierce and warlike Infidel, says the Catholic
Fray Antonio Agapida; his bitterness against the
holy Christian faith had been signalized in battle,
during the life-time of his father; and the same
diabolical
spirit of hostility was apparent in his ceasing
to pay this most righteous tribute.
CHAPTER II.
How the Catholic Sovereigns sent to demand arrears of
tribute of the Moor, and how the Moor replied.
In
the year 1478, a Spanish courtier, of powerful
frame and haughty demeanor, arrived at the gates
of Granada, as ambassador from the Catholic
monarchs
,
to demand the arrear of tribute. His name
was Don Juan de Vera, a zealous and devout knight,
full of ardor for the faith, and loyalty for the crown.
He was gallantly mounted, armed at all points, and
followed by a moderate but well-appointed retinue.
The Moorish inhabitants looked jealously at this
small but proud array of Spanish chivalry, as it
paraded, with that stateliness possessed only by
Spanish cavaliers, through the renowned gate of
Elvira. They were struck with the stern and lofty
demeanor of Don Juan de Vera, and his sinewy
frame, which showed him formed for hardy deeds
of arms; and they supposed he had come in search
of distinction, by defying the Moorish knights in open
tourney, or in the famous tilt with reeds, for which
they were so renowned: for it was still the custom
of the knights of either nation to mingle in these
courteous and chivalrous contests, during the
intervals
of war. When they learnt, however, that he
was come to demand the tribute so abhorrent to the
ears of the fiery monarch, they observed that it well
required a warrior of his apparent nerve, to execute
such an embassy.
Muley Aben Hassan received the cavalier in state,
seated on a magnificent divan, and surrounded by
the officers of his court, in the hall of ambassadors,
one of the most sumptuous apartments of the
Alhambra
.
When De Vera had delivered his message, a
haughty and bitter smile curled the lip of the fierce
monarch. Tell your sovereigns, said he, that
the kings of Granada, who used to pay tribute in
money to the Castilian crown, are dead. Our mint
at present coins nothing but blades of scimitars and
heads of lances.
[5]
[5]
Garibay. Compend. lib. 40. c. 29. Conde. Hist. de les
Arabes, p. 4. c. 34.
The defiance couched in this proud reply, was
heard with stern and lofty courtesy by Don Juan de
Vera, for he was a bold soldier, and a devout hater
of the Infidels; and he saw iron war in the words of
the Moorish monarch. He retired from the audience
chamber with stately and ceremonious gravity, being
master of all points of etiquette. As he passed through
the Court of Lions, and paused to regard its
celebrated
fountain, he fell into a discourse with the
Moorish courtiers on certain mysteries of the
Christian
faith. The arguments advanced by those Infidels
(says Fray Antonio Agapida) awakened the pious
indignation of this most Christian knight and discreet
ambassador; but still he restrained himself within the
limits of lofty gravity, leaning on the pommel of his
sword, and looking down with ineffable scorn upon
the weak casuists around him. The quick and subtle
Arabian witlings redoubled their light attacks upon
this stately Spaniard, and thought they had
completely
foiled him in the contest; but the stern Juan
de Vera had an argument in reserve, for which they
were but little prepared; for, on one of them, of the
race of the Abencerrages, daring to question, with a
sneer, the immaculate conception of the blessed
virgin, the Catholic knight could no longer restrain
his ire. Raising his voice of a sudden, he told the
Infidel he lied; and, raising his arm at the same time,
he smote him on the head with his sheathed sword.
In an instant the Court of Lions glistened with the
flash of arms, and its fountains would have been dyed
with blood, had not Muley Aben Hassan overheard
the tumult, and forbade all appeal to arms,
pronouncing
the person of the ambassador sacred while within
his territories. The Abencerrage treasured up the
remembrance of the insult until an hour of vengeance
should arrive, and the ambassador prayed our blessed
lady to grant him an opportunity of proving her
immaculate
conception on the head of this turbaned
Infidel.
[6]
[6]
The Curate of Los Palacios also records this anecdote, but
mentions it as happening on a subsequent occasion, when Don
Juan de Vera was sent to negotiate for certain Christian captives.
There appears every reason, however, to consider Fray Antonio
Agapida most correct in the period to which he refers it.
Notwithstanding this occurrence, Don Juan de
Vera was treated with great distinction by Muley
Aben Hassan; but nothing could make him unbend
from his stern and stately reserve. Before his
departure
,
a scimitar was sent to him by the king; the
blade of the finest Damascus steel, the hilt of agate
enriched with precious stones, and the guard of gold.
De Vera drew it, and smiled grimly as he noticed
the admirable temper of the blade. His majesty
has given me a trenchant weapon, said he: I trust
a time will come when I may show him that I know
how to use his royal present. The reply was
considered
as a compliment, of course; the bystanders
little knew the bitter hostility that lay couched
beneath
.
Don Juan de Vera and his companions, during
their brief sojourn at Granada, learned the force and
situation of the Moor, with the eyes of practised
warriors
.
They saw that he was well prepared for
hostilities
.
His walls and towers were of vast strength,
in complete repair, and mounted with lombards and
other heavy ordnance. His magazines were well
stored with all the munitions of war: he had a mighty
host of foot-soldiers, together with squadrons of
cavalry
,
ready to scour the country and carry on either
defensive or predatory warfare. The Christian
warriors
noted these things without dismay; their hearts
rather glowed with emulation, at the thoughts of
encountering
so worthy a foe. As they slowly pranced
through the streets of Granada, on their departure,
they looked round with eagerness on its stately
palaces, and sumptuous mosques; on its alcayceria
or bazar, crowded with silks and cloth of silver and
gold, with jewels and precious stones, and other rich
merchandise, the luxuries of every clime; and they
longed for the time when all this wealth should be
the spoil of the soldiers of the faith, and when each
tramp of their steeds might be fetlock deep in the
blood and carnage of the Infidels.
Don Juan de Vera and his little band pursued
their way slowly through the country, to the Christian
frontier. Every town was strongly fortified. The
vega was studded with towers of refuge for the
peasantry: every pass of the mountain had its castle
of defence, every lofty height its watch-tower. As
the Christian cavaliers passed under the walls of
the fortresses, lances and scimitars flashed from their
battlements, and the turbaned sentinels seemed to
dart from their dark eyes glances of hatred and
defiance
.
It was evident that a war with this kingdom
must be one of doughty peril and valiant enterprise;
a war of posts, where every step must be gained by
toil and bloodshed, and maintained with the utmost
difficulty. The warrior spirit of the cavaliers kindled
at the thoughts, and they were impatient for
hostilities
;
not, says Antonio Agapida, from any thirst
for rapine and revenge, but from that pure and holy
indignation which every Spanish knight entertained
at beholding this beautiful dominion of his ancestors
defiled by the footsteps of Infidel usurpers. It was
impossible, he adds, to contemplate this delicious
country, and not long to see it restored to the
dominion
of the true faith, and the sway of the
Christian
monarchs.
When Don Juan de Vera returned to the Castilian
court, and reported the particulars of his mission,
and all that he had heard and seen in the Moorish
territories, he was highly honored and rewarded by
king Ferdinand; and the zeal he had shown in
vindication
of the sinless conception of the blessed
virgin
,
was not only applauded by that most Catholic
of sovereigns, but gained him great favor and renown
among all pious cavaliers and reverend prelates.
Vol. I. C 4
CHAPTER III.
How the Moor determined to strike the first blow in the war.
The
defiance thus hurled at the Castilian
sovereigns
by the fiery Moorish king, would at once have
been answered by the thunder of their artillery; but
they were embroiled, at that time, in a war with
Portugal, and in contests with their own factious
nobles. The truce, therefore, which had existed for
many years between the nations, was suffered to
continue
;
the wary Ferdinand reserving the refusal to
pay tribute as a fair ground for war, whenever the
favorable moment to wage it should arrive.
In the course of three years, the war with Portugal
was terminated, and the factions of the Spanish nobles
were, for the most part, quelled. The Castilian
sovereigns
now turned their thoughts to what, from the
time of the union of their crowns, had been the great
object of their ambition,the conquest of Granada,
and the complete extirpation of the Moslem power
from Spain. Ferdinand, whose pious zeal was
quickened
by motives of temporal policy, looked with a
craving eye at the rich territory of the Moor, studded
with innumerable towns and cities. He determined
to carry on the war with cautious and persevering
patience, taking town after town and fortress after
fortress, and gradually plucking away all the supports,
before he attempted the Moorish capital. I will
pick out the seeds, one by one, of this pomegranate,
said the wary Ferdinand.
[7]
[7]
Granada is the Spanish term for
pomegranate
.
Muley Aben Hassan was aware of the hostile
intentions
of the Catholic monarch, but felt confident
in his means of resisting them. He had amassed great
wealth, during a tranquil reign; he had strengthened
the defences of his kingdom, and had drawn large
bodies of auxiliary troops from Barbary, besides
making arrangements with the African princes to
assist him with supplies, in case of emergency. His
subjects were fierce of spirit, stout of heart, and
valiant of hand. Inured to the exercises of war, they
could fight skilfully on foot, but, above all, were
dexterous horsemen, whether heavily armed and
fully appointed, or lightly mounted
a la geneta
, with
simply lance and target. They were patient of
fatigue, hunger, thirst, and nakedness; prompt for
war, at the first summons of their king, and tenacious
in defence of their towns and possessions.
Thus amply provided for war, Muley Aben Hassan
determined to be beforehand with the politic
Ferdinand
,
and to be the first to strike a blow. In the
truce which existed between them, there was a
singular
clause, permitting either party to make sudden
inroads and assaults upon towns and fortresses,
provided
they were done furtively and by stratagem,
without display of banners or sound of trumpet, or
regular encampment, and that they did not last above
three days.
Zurita. Anales de Aragon, 1. 20. c. 41. Mariana. Hist. de
Espaa, 1. 25. c. 1.
This gave rise to frequent enterprises
of a hardy and adventurous character, in which
castles and strong holds were taken by surprise, and
carried sword in hand. A long time had elapsed,
however, without any outrage of the kind on the
part of the Moors; and the christian towns on the
frontiers had all, in consequence, fallen into a state
of the most negligent security.
Muley Aben Hassan cast his eyes round to select
his object of attack, when information was brought
him that the fortress of Zahara was but feebly
garrisoned
and scantily supplied, and that its alcayde
was careless of his charge. This important post was
on the frontier, between Ronda and Medina Sidonia,
and was built on the crest of a rocky mountain, with
a strong castle perched above it, upon a cliff, so high
that it was said to be above the flight of birds or drift
of clouds. The streets and many of the houses were
mere excavations, wrought out of the living rock.
The town had but one gate, opening to the west,
and defended by towers and bulwarks. The only
ascent to this cragged fortress was by roads cut in
the rock, and so rugged as in many places to resemble
broken stairs. Such was the situation of the
mountain
fortress of Zahara, which seemed to set all attack
at defiance, insomuch that it had become so proverbial
throughout Spain, that a woman of forbidding and
inaccessible virtue was called a Zaharea. But the
strongest fortress and sternest virtue have weak
points, and require unremitting vigilance to guard
them: let warrior and dame take warning from the
fate of Zahara.
CHAPTER IV.
Expedition of Muley Aben Hassan against the fortress
of Zahara.
It
was in the year of our Lord one thousand four
hundred and eighty-one, and but a night or two after
the festival of the most blessed Nativity, that Muley
Aben Hassan made his famous attack upon Zahara.
The inhabitants of the place were sunk in profound
sleep; the very sentinel had deserted his post, and
sought shelter from a tempest which had raged for
three nights in succession; for it appeared but little
probable that an enemy would be abroad during such
an uproar of the elements. But evil spirits work
best during a storm, (observes the worthy Antonio
Agapida,) and Muley Aben Hassan found such a
season most suitable for his diabolical purposes. In
the midst of the night, an uproar arose within the
walls of Zahara, more awful than the raging of the
storm. A fearful alarm cryThe Moor! the
Moor! resounded through the streets, mingled with
the clash of arms, the shriek of anguish, and the
shout of victory. Muley Aben Hassan, at the head
of a powerful force, had hurried from Granada, and
passed unobserved through the mountains in the
obscurity of the tempest. While the storm pelted
the sentinel from his post, and howled round tower
and battlement, the Moors had planted their
scaling-ladders
,
C 2
and mounted securely, into both town and
castle. The garrison was unsuspicious of danger,
until battle and massacre burst forth within its very
walls. It seemed to the affrighted inhabitants, as if
the fiends of the air had come upon the wings of the
wind, and possessed themselves of tower and turret.
The war-cry resounded on every side, shout
answering
shout, above, below, on the battlements of the
castle, in the streets of the townthe foe was in all
parts, wrapped in obscurity, but acting in concert by
the aid of preconcerted signals. Starting from sleep,
the soldiers were intercepted and cut down as they
rushed from their quarters; or, if they escaped, they
knew not where to assemble, or where to strike.
Wherever lights appeared, the flashing scimitar was
at its deadly work, and all who attempted resistance
fell beneath its edge.
In a little while, the struggle was at an end. Those
who were not slain took refuge in the secret places
of their houses, or gave themselves up as captives.
The clash of arms ceased; and the storm continued
its howling, mingled with the occasional shout of the
Moorish soldiery, roaming in search of plunder.
While the inhabitants were trembling for their fate,
a trumpet resounded through the streets, summoning
them all to assemble, unarmed, in the public square.
Here they were surrounded by soldiery, and strictly
guarded, until day-break. When the day dawned,
it was piteous to behold this once prosperous
community
,
who had laid down to rest in peaceful
security
,
now crowded together without distinction of
age, or rank, or sex, and almost without raiment,
during the severity of a wintry storm. The fierce
Muley Aben Hassan turned a deaf ear to all their
prayers and remonstrances, and ordered them to be
conducted captives to Granada. Leaving a strong
garrison in both town and castle, with orders to put
them in a complete state of defence, he returned,
flushed with victory, to his capital, entering it at the
head of his troops, laden with spoil, and bearing in
triumph the banners and pennons taken at Zahara.
While preparations were making for jousts and
other festivities, in honor of this victory over the
christians, the captives of Zahara arriveda
wretched
train of men, women, and children, worn out with
fatigue and haggard with despair, and driven like
cattle into the city gates, by a detachment of Moorish
soldiery.
Deep was the grief and indignation of the people
of Granada, at this cruel scene. Old men, who had
experienced the calamities of warfare, anticipated
coming troubles. Mothers clasped their infants to
their breasts, as they beheld the hapless females of
Zahara, with their children expiring in their arms.
On every side, the accents of pity for the sufferers
were mingled with execrations of the barbarity of
the king. The preparations for festivity were
neglected
;
and the viands, which were to have feasted
the conquerors, were distributed among the captives.
The nobles and alfaquis, however, repaired to the
Alhambra, to congratulate the king; for, whatever
storms may rage in the lower regions of society,
rarely do any clouds, but clouds of incense, rise to
the awful eminence of the throne. In this instance,
however, a voice rose from the midst of the
obsequious
crowd, that burst like thunder upon the ears
of Aben Hassan. Wo! wo! wo! to Granada!
exclaimed the voice; its hour of desolation
approaches
.
The ruins of Zahara will fall upon our
heads; my spirit tells me that the end of our empire
is at hand! All shrunk back aghast, and left the
denouncer of wo standing alone in the centre of the
hall. He was an ancient and hoary man, in the rude
attire of a dervise. Age had withered his form
without quenching the fire of his spirit, which glared
in baleful lustre from his eyes. He was, (say the
Arabian historians,) one of those holy men termed
santons, who pass their lives in hermitages, in fasting,
meditation, and prayer, until they attain to the purity
of saints and the foresight of prophets. He was,
says the indignant Fray Antonio Agapida, a son of
Belial, one of those fanatic infidels possessed by the
devil, who are sometimes permitted to predict the
truth to their followers; but with the proviso, that
their predictions shall be of no avail.
The voice of the santon resounded through the
lofty hall of the Alhambra, and struck silence and
awe into the crowd of courtly sycophants. Muley
Aben Hassan alone was unmoved; he eyed the hoary
anchorite with scorn as he stood dauntless before
him, and treated his predictions as the ravings of a
maniac. The santon rushed from the royal presence,
and, descending into the city, hurried through its
streets and squares with frantic gesticulations. His
voice was heard, in every part, in awful denunciation.
The peace is broken! the exterminating war is
commenced. Wo! wo! wo to Granada! its fall is
at hand! desolation shall dwell in its palaces; its
strong men shall fall beneath the sword, its children
and maidens shall be led into captivity. Zahara is
but a type of Granada!
Terror seized upon the populace, for they
considered
these ravings as the inspirations of prophecy.
They hid themselves in their dwellings, as in a time
of general mourning; or, if they went abroad, it was
to gather together in knots in the streets and squares,
to alarm each other with dismal forebodings, and to
curse the rashness and cruelty of the fierce Aben
Hassan.
The Moorish monarch heeded not their murmurs.
Knowing that his exploit must draw upon him the
vengeance of the christians, he now threw off all
reserve, and made attempts to surprise Castellan and
Elvira, though without success. He sent alfaquis,
also, to the Barbary powers, informing them that the
sword was drawn, and inviting them to aid in
maintaining
the kingdom of Granada, and the religion of
Mahomet, against the violence of unbelievers.
5
CHAPTER V.
Expedition of the Marques of Cadiz against Alhama.
Great
was the indignation of king Ferdinand,
when he heard of the storming of Zaharamore
especially as it had anticipated his intention of
giving
the first blow in this eventful war. He valued
himself upon his deep and prudent policy; and there
is nothing which politic monarchs can less forgive,
than thus being forestalled by an adversary. He
immediately issued orders to all the adelantados and
alcaydes of the frontiers, to maintain the utmost
vigilance at their several posts, and to prepare to
carry fire and sword into the territories of the
Moors.
Among the many valiant cavaliers who rallied
round the throne of Ferdinand and Isabella, one of
the most eminent in rank and renowned in arms was
Don Roderigo Ponce de Leon, marques of Cadiz.
As he was the distinguished champion of this holy
war, and commanded in most of its enterprises and
battles, it is meet that some particular account
should be given of him. He was born in 1443, of
the valiant lineage of the Ponces, and from his
earliest
youth had rendered himself illustrious in the
field. He was of the middle stature, with a
muscular
and powerful frame, capable of great exertion
and fatigue. His hair and beard were red and curled,
his countenance was open and magnanimous, of a
ruddy complexion, and slightly marked with the
small-pox. He was temperate, chaste, valiant,
vigilant
;
a just and generous master to his vassals;
frank and noble in his deportment towards his
equals; loving and faithful to his friends; fierce and
terrible, yet magnanimous, to his enemies. He was
considered the mirror of chivalry of his times, and
compared by contemporary historians to the
immortal
Cid.
The marques of Cadiz had vast possessions in the
most fertile parts of Andalusia, including many towns
and castles, and could lead forth an army into the
field from his own vassals and dependants. On
receiving
the orders of the king, he burned to
signalize
himself by some sudden incursion into the
kingdom
of Granada, that should give a brilliant
commencement
to the war, and should console the
sovereigns for the insult they had received in the
capture of Zahara. As his estates lay near to the
Moorish frontiers, and were subject to sudden
inroads
,
he had always in his pay numbers of adalides,
or scouts and guides, many of them converted Moors.
These he sent out in all directions, to watch the
movements of the enemy, and to procure all kinds
of information important to the security of the
frontier. One of these spies came to him one day
in his town of Marchena, and informed him that the
Moorish town of Alhama was slightly garrisoned and
negligently guarded, and might be taken by surprise.
This was a large, wealthy, and populous place,
within a few leagues of Granada. It was situated
on a rocky height, nearly surrounded by a river, and
defended by a fortress to which there was no access
but by a steep and cragged ascent. The strength of
its situation, and its being embosomed in the centre
of the kingdom, had produced the careless security
which now invited attack.
To ascertain fully the state of the fortress, the
marques dispatched secretly a veteran soldier, who
was highly in his confidence. His name was Ortega
de Prado, a man of great activity, shrewdness, and
valor, and captain of escaladors, or those employed
to scale the walls of fortresses in time of attack.
Ortega approached Alhama one moonless night,
and paced along its walls with noiseless step, laying
his ear occasionally to the ground or to the wall.
Every time, he distinguished the measured tread of
a sentinel, and now and then the challenge of the
night-watch going its rounds. Finding the town thus
guarded, he clambered to the castle:there all was
silent. As he ranged its lofty battlements, between
him and the sky he saw no sentinel on duty. He
noticed certain places where the wall might be
ascended
by scaling-ladders; and, having marked the
hour of relieving guard, and made all necessary
observations, he retired without being discovered.
Ortega returned to Marchena, and assured the
marques of Cadiz of the practicability of scaling the
castle of Alhama, and taking it by surprise. The
marques had a secret conference with Don Pedro
Henriquez Adelantado, of Andalusia; Don Diego de
Merlo, commander of Seville; and Sancho de Avila,
alcayde of Carmona, who all agreed to aid him with
their forces. On an appointed day, the several
commanders
assembled at Marchena with their troops
and retainers. None but the leaders knew the object
or destination of the enterprise; but it was enough
to rouse the Andalusian spirit, to know that a foray
was intended into the country of their old enemies,
the Moors. Secrecy and celerity were necessary
for success. They set out promptly, with three
thousand
genetes, or light cavalry, and four thousand
infantry
.
They chose a route but little travelled, by
the way of Antiquera, passing with great labor
through rugged and solitary defiles of the Sierra or
chain of mountains of Alzerifa, and left all their
baggage on the banks of the river Yeguas, to be
brought after them. Their march was principally in
the night; all day they remained quiet; no noise
was suffered in their camp, and no fires were made,
lest the smoke should betray them. On the third day
they resumed their march as the evening darkened,
and forcing themselves forward at as quick a pace as
the rugged and dangerous mountain roads would
permit
,
they descended towards midnight into a small
deep valley, only half a league from Alhama. Here
they made a halt, fatigued by this forced march, during
a long dark evening towards the end of February.
The marques of Cadiz now explained to the
troops, the object of the expedition. He told them
it was for the glory of the most holy faith, and to
avenge the wrongs of their countrymen of Zahara;
and that the rich town of Alhama, full of wealthy
Vol. I. D
spoil, was the place to be attacked. The troops
were roused to new ardor by these words, and
desired
to be led forthwith to the assault. They
arrived
close to Alhama about two hours before
day-break
.
Here the army remained in ambush, while
three hundred men were dispatched to scale the
walls and get possession of the castle. They were
picked men, many of them alcades and officers, men
who preferred death to dishonor. This gallant band
was guided by the escalador Ortega de Prado, at the
head of thirty men with scaling-ladders. They
clambered
the ascent to the castle in silence, and arrived
under the dark shadow of its towers without being
discovered. Not a light was to be seen, not a sound
to be heard; the whole place was wrapped in
profound
repose.
Fixing their ladders, they ascended cautiously and
with noiseless steps. Ortega was the first that
mounted upon the battlements, followed by one
Martin Galindo, a youthful esquire, full of spirit and
eager for distinction. Moving stealthily along the
parapet to the portal of the citadel, they came upon
the sentinel by surprise. Ortega seized him by the
throat, brandished a dagger before his eyes, and
ordered
him to point the way to the guard-room. The
infidel obeyed, and was instantly dispatched, to
prevent
his giving an alarm. The guard-room was a
scene rather of massacre than combat. Some of the
soldiery were killed while sleeping, others were cut
down almost without resistance, bewildered by so
unexpected an assault: all were dispatched, for the
scaling party was too small to make prisoners or to
spare. The alarm spread throughout the castle, but
by this time the three hundred picked men had
mounted the battlements. The garrison, startled
from sleep, found the enemy already masters of the
towers. Some of the Moors were cut down at once,
others fought desperately from room to room, and
the whole castle resounded with the clash of arms,
the cries of the combatants, and the groans of the
wounded. The army in ambush, finding by the
uproar
that the castle was surprised, now rushed from
their concealment, and approached the walls with
loud shouts, and sound of kettle-drums and trumpets,
to increase the confusion and dismay of the garrison.
A violent conflict took place in the court of the
castle, where several of the scaling party sought to
throw open the gates to admit their countrymen.
Here fell two valiant alcaydes, Nicholas de Roja
and Sancho de Avila; but they fell honorably, upon
a heap of slain. At length Ortega de Prado
succeeded
in throwing open a postern, through which
the marques of Cadiz, the adelantado of Andalusia,
and Don Diego de Merlo, entered with a host of
followers
,
and the citadel remained in full possession of
the christians.
As the Spanish cavaliers were ranging from room
to room, the marques of Cadiz, entering an
apartment
of superior richness to the rest, beheld, by the
light of a silver lamp, a beautiful Moorish female,
the wife of the alcayde of the castle, whose husband
was absent, attending a wedding-feast at Velez
Malaga
.
She would have fled at the sight of a Christian
warrior in her apartment, but, entangled in the
covering
of the bed, she fell at the feet of the marques,
imploring mercy. The christian cavalier, who had
a soul full of honor and courtesy towards the sex,
raised her from the floor, and endeavored to allay
her fears; but they were increased at the sight of
her female attendants pursued into the room by the
Spanish soldiery. The marques reproached his
soldiers
with their unmanly conduct, and reminded
them that they made war upon men, not on
defenceless
women. Having soothed the terrors of the
females by the promise of honorable protection, he
appointed a trusty guard to watch over the security
of their apartment.
The castle was now taken; but the town below
it was in arms. It was broad day, and the people,
recovered from their panic, were enabled to see and
estimate the force of the enemy. The inhabitants
were chiefly merchants and trades-people; but the
Moors all possessed a knowledge of the use of
weapons
,
and were of brave and warlike spirit. They
confided in the strength of their walls, and the
certainty
of speedy relief from Granada, which was
but about eight leagues distant. Manning the
battlements
and towers, they discharged showers of stones
and arrows, whenever the part of the christian army,
without the walls, attempted to approach. They
barricadoed the entrances of their streets, also, which
opened towards the castle; stationing men expert at
the cross-bow and arquebuse. These kept up a
constant
fire upon the gate of the castle, so that no one
could sally forth without being instantly shot down.
Two valiant cavaliers, who attempted to lead forth a
party in defiance of this fatal tempest, were shot
dead at the very portal.
The christians now found themselves in a
situation
of great peril. Reinforcements must soon arrive
to the enemy from Granada; unless, therefore, they
gained possession of the town in the course of the
day, they were likely to be surrounded and
beleagured
,
without provisions, in the castle. Some observed
that, even if they took the town, they should not be
able to maintain possession of it. They proposed,
therefore, to make booty of every thing valuable, to
sack the castle, set it on fire, and make good their
retreat to Seville.
The marques of Cadiz was of different counsel.
God has given the citadel into christian hands,
said he; he will no doubt strengthen them to
maintain
it. We have gained the place with difficulty
and bloodshed; it would be a stain upon our honor
to abandon it through fear of imaginary dangers.
The adelantado and Don Diego de Merlo joined in
his opinion; but without their earnest and united
remonstrances, the place would have been
abandoned
;
so exhausted were the troops by forced marches
and hard fighting, and so apprehensive of the
approach
of the Moors of Granada.
The strength and spirits of the party within the
castle, were in some degree restored by the
provisions
which they found. The Christian army
beneath
D 2 6
the town, being also refreshed by a morning's
repast, advanced vigorously to the attack of the
walls. They planted their scaling-ladders, and,
swarming up, sword in hand, fought fiercely with the
Moorish soldiery upon the ramparts.
In the mean time, the marques of Cadiz, seeing
that the gate of the castle, which opened toward the
city, was completely commanded by the artillery of
the enemy, ordered a large breach to be made in the
wall, through which he might lead his troops to the
attack; animating them, in this perilous moment, by
assuring them that the place should be given up to
plunder, and its inhabitants made captives.
The breach being made, the marques put himself
at the head of his troops, and entered sword in
hand. A simultaneous attack was made by the
christians
in every partby the ramparts, by the gate, by
the roofs and walls which connected the castle with
the town. The Moors fought valiantly in their
streets, from their windows, and from the tops of
their houses. They were not equal to the christians
in bodily strength, for they were for the most part
peaceful men, of industrious callings, and enervated
by the frequent use of the warm bath; but they
were superior in number, and unconquerable in
spirit; old and young, strong and weak, fought with
the same desperation. The Moors fought for
property
,
for liberty, for life. They fought at their
thresholds
and their hearths, with the shrieks of their
wives and children ringing in their ears, and they
fought in the hope that each moment would bring
aid from Granada. They regarded neither their own
wounds nor the deaths of their companions; but
continued fighting until they fell, and seemed as if,
when they could no longer contend, they would
block up the thresholds of their beloved homes with
their mangled bodies. The christians fought for
glory, for revenge, for the holy faith, and for the
spoil of these wealthy infidels. Success would place
a rich town at their mercy; failure would deliver
them into the hands of the tyrant of Granada.
The contest raged from morning until night, when
the Moors began to yield. Retreating to a large
mosque near the walls, they kept up so galling a fire
from it with lances, cross-bows, and arquebuses,
that for some time the christians dared not approach.
Covering themselves, at length, with bucklers and
mantelets
[8]
[8]
Manteleta movable parapet, made of thick planks, to
protect
troops, when advancing to sap or assault a walled place.
to protect them from the deadly shower,
they made their way to the mosque, and set fire to
the doors. When the smoke and flames rolled in
upon them, the Moors gave all up as lost. Many
rushed forth desperately upon the enemy, but were
immediately slain; the rest surrendered themselves
captives.
The struggle was now at an end; the town
remained
at the mercy of the christians; and the
inhabitants
,
both male and female, became the slaves
of those who made them prisoners. Some few
escaped
by a mine or subterranean way, which led to
the river, and concealed themselves, their wives and
children, in caves and secret places; but in three or
four days, were compelled to surrender themselves
through hunger.
The town was given up to plunder, and the booty
was immense. There were found prodigious
quantities
of gold and silver, and jewels, and rich silks,
and costly stuffs of all kinds; together with horses
and beeves, and abundance of grain and oil, and
honey, and all other productions of this fruitful
kingdom
;
for in Alhama were collected the royal rents
and tributes of the surrounding country; it was the
richest town in the Moorish territory, and, from its
great strength and its peculiar situation, was called
the key to Granada.
Great waste and devastation were committed by
the Spanish soldiery; for, thinking it would be
impossible
to keep possession of the place, they began
to destroy whatever they could not take away.
Immense
jars of oil were broken, costly furniture
shattered
to pieces, and magazines of grain broken open,
and their contents scattered to the winds. Many
christian captives, who had been taken at Zahara,
were found buried in a Moorish dungeon, and were
triumphantly restored to light and liberty; and a
renegado Spaniard, who had often served as guide to
the Moors in their incursions into the christian
territories
,
was hanged on the highest part of the
battlements
,
for the edification of the army.
CHAPTER VI.
How the people of Granada were affected, on hearing of
the capture of Alhama; and how the Moorish King
sallied forth to regain it.
A Moorish
horseman had spurred across the vega,
nor reined his panting steed until he alighted at the
gate of the Alhambra. He brought tidings to Muley
Aben Hassan, of the attack upon Alhama. The
christians, said he, are in the land. They came
upon us, we know not whence or how, and scaled
the walls of the castle in the night. There has been
dreadful fighting and carnage in its towers and courts;
and when I spurred my steed from the gate of Alhama,
the castle was in possession of the unbelievers.
Muley Aben Hassan felt for a moment as if swift
retribution had come upon him for the woes he had
inflicted upon Zahara. Still he flattered himself that
this had only been some transient inroad of a party
of marauders, intent upon plunder; and that a little
succor, thrown into the town, would be sufficient to
expel them from the castle, and drive them from the
land. He ordered out, therefore, a thousand of his
chosen cavalry, and sent them in all speed to the
assistance of Alhama. They arrived before its walls,
the morning after its capture: the christian standards
floated upon its towers, and a body of cavalry poured
forth from its gates and came wheeling down into
the plain to receive them.
The Moorish horsemen turned the reins of their
steeds, and galloped back for Granada. They
entered
its gates in tumultuous confusion, spreading
terror and lamentation by their tidings. Alhama
is fallen! Alhama is fallen! exclaimed they; the
christians garrison its walls; the key of Granada is
in the hands of the enemy!
When the people heard these words, they
remembered
the denunciation of the santon. His
prediction
seemed still to resound in every ear, and its
fulfilment
to be at hand. Nothing was heard
throughout
the city, but sighs and wailings. Wo is me,
Alhama! was in every mouth; and this ejaculation
of deep sorrow and doleful foreboding, came to be
the burthen of a plaintive ballad, which remains until
the present day.
[9]
[9]
The mournful little Spanish romance of
Ay de mi, Alhama!
is supposed to be of Moorish origin, and to embody the grief of
the people of Granada on this occasion.
Many aged men, who had taken refuge in Granada
from other Moorish dominions which had fallen into
the power of the Christians, now groaned in despair
at the thoughts that war was to follow them into this
last retreat, to lay waste this pleasant land, and to
bring trouble and sorrow upon their declining years.
The women were more loud and vehement in their
grief; for they beheld the evils impending over their
children, and what can restrain the agony of a
mother's heart? Many of them made their way
through the halls of the Alhambra into the presence
of the king, weeping, and wailing, and tearing their
hair. Accursed be the day, cried they, that thou
hast lit the flame of war in our land! May the holy
Prophet bear witness before Allah, that we and our
children are innocent of this act! Upon thy head,
and upon the heads of thy posterity, until the end of
the world, rest the sin of the desolation of Zahara!
[10]
[10]
Garibay, lib. 40. c. 29.
Muley Aben Hassan remained unmoved, amidst all
this storm; his heart was hardened (observes Fray
Antonio Agapida) like that of Pharaoh, to the end
that, through his blind violence and rage, he might
produce the deliverance of the land from its heathen
bondage. In fact, he was a bold and fearless
warrior
,
and trusted soon to make this blow recoil upon
the head of the enemy. He had ascertained that the
captors of Alhama were but a handful: they were
in the centre of his dominions, within a short distance
of his capital. They were deficient in munitions of
war, and provisions for sustaining a siege. By a
rapid movement, he might surround them with a
powerful army, cut off all aid from their countrymen,
and entrap them in the fortress they had taken.
To think was to act, with Muley Aben Hassan;
but he was prone to act with too much precipitation.
He immediately set forth in person, with three
thousand
horse and fifty thousand foot, and in his
eagerness
to arrive at the scene of action, would not wait
to provide artillery and the various engines required
in a siege. The multitude of my forces, said he,
confidently, will be sufficient to overwhelm the
enemy.
The marques of Cadiz, who thus held possession
of Alhama, had a chosen friend and faithful
companion
in arms, among the most distinguished of the
christian chivalry. This was Don Alonzo de
Cordova
,
senior and lord of the house of Aguilar, and
brother of Gonsalvo of Cordova, afterwards renowned
as grand captain of Spain. As yet, Alonzo de Aguilar
was the glory of his name and racefor his brother
was but young in arms. He was one of the most
hardy, valiant, and enterprising of the Spanish knights,
and foremost in all service of a perilous and
adventurous
nature. He had not been at hand, to
accompany
his friend Ponce de Leon, marques of Cadiz, in
his inroad into the Moorish territory; but he hastily
assembled a number of retainers, horse and foot, and
pressed forward to join the enterprise. Arriving at
the river Yeguas, he found the baggage of the army
still upon its banks, and took charge of it to carry it
to Alhama. The marques of Cadiz heard of the
approach
of his friend, whose march was slow in
consequence
of being encumbered by the baggage. He
was within but a few leagues of Alhama, when scouts
came hurrying into the place, with intelligence that
the Moorish king was at hand with a powerful army.
The marques of Cadiz was filled with alarm lest De
Aguilar should fall into the hands of the enemy.
Forgetting his own danger, and thinking only of that
of his friend, he dispatched a well-mounted messenger,
to ride full speed, and warn him not to approach.
The first determination of Alonzo de Aguilar, when
he heard that the Moorish king was at hand, was to
take a strong position in the mountains, and await
his coming. The madness of an attempt with his
handful of men to oppose an immense army, was
represented to him with such force as to induce him
to abandon the idea; he then thought of throwing
himself into Alhama, to share the fortunes of his
friend: but it was now too late. The Moor would
infallibly intercept him, and he should only give the
marques the additional distress of beholding him
captured
beneath his walls. It was even urged upon
him that he had no time for delay, if he would
consult
his own safety, which could only be insured by
an immediate retreat into the Christian territory.
This last opinion was confirmed by the return of
scouts, who brought information that Muley Aben
Hassan had received notice of his movements, and
was rapidly advancing in quest of him. It was with
infinite reluctance that Don Alonzo de Aguilar yielded
to these united and powerful reasons. Proudly and
sullenly he drew off his forces, laden with the baggage
of the army, and made an unwilling retreat towards
Antiquera. Muley Aben Hassan pursued him for
some distance through the mountains, but soon gave
up the chase and turned with his forces upon Alhama.
As the army approached the town, they beheld the
fields strewn with the dead bodies of their
countrymen
,
who had fallen in defence of the place, and had
been cast forth and left unburied by the christians.
There they lay, mangled, and exposed to every
indignity
;
while droves of half-famished dogs were
preying upon them, and fighting and howling, over
Vol. I. E 7
their hideous repast.
[11]
[11]
Pulgar. Cronic.
Furious at the sight, the
Moors, in the first transports of their rage, attacked
those ravenous animals: their next measure was to
vent their fury upon the christians. They rushed
like madmen to the walls, applied scaling-ladders in
all parts, without waiting for the necessary mantelets
and other protections,thinking, by attacking
suddenly
and at various points, to distract the enemy,
and overcome them by the force of numbers.
The marques of Cadiz, with his confederate
commanders
,
distributed themselves along the walls, to
direct and animate their men in the defence. The
Moors, in their blind fury, often assailed the most
difficult and dangerous places. Darts, stones, and
all kinds of missiles, were hurled down upon their
defenceless heads. As fast as they mounted, they
were cut down, or dashed from the battlements, their
ladders overturned, and all who were on them
precipitated
headlong below.
Muley Aben Hassan stormed with passion, at the
sight; he sent detachment after detachment to scale
the wallsbut in vain; they were like waves rushing
upon a rock, only to dash themselves to pieces. The
Moors lay in heaps beneath the wall, and among
them many of the bravest cavaliers of Granada. The
christians, also, sallied frequently from the gates, and
made great havoc in the irregular multitude of
assailants
.
On one of these occasions, the party was
commanded
by Don Juan de Vera, the same pious and
high-handed knight who had borne the embassy to
Muley Aben Hassan, demanding tribute. As this
doughty cavalier, after a career of carnage, was
slowly retreating to the gate, he heard a voice loudly
calling after him, in furious accents. Turn back!
turn back! cried the voice; thou who canst insult
in hall, prove that thou canst combat in the field.
Don Juan de Vera turned, and beheld the same
Abencerrage whom he had struck with his sword in
the Alhambra, for scoffing at the immaculate
conception
of the blessed virgin. All his holy zeal and
pious indignation rekindled at the sight; he put lance
in rest, and spurred his steed to finish this doctrinal
dispute. Don Juan de Vera was a potent and
irresistible
arguer with his weapon; and he was aided,
(says Fray Antonio Agapida,) by the peculiar virtue
of his cause. At the very first encounter, his lance
entered the mouth of the Moor, and hurled him to
the earth, never more to utter word or breath. Thus
(continues the worthy friar) did this scoffing infidel
receive a well-merited punishment, through the very
organ with which he had offended; and thus was the
immaculate conception miraculously vindicated from
his foul aspersions.
The vigorous and successful defence of the
christians
,
now made Muley Aben Hassan sensible of his
error in hurrying from Granada without the proper
engines for a siege. Destitute of all means to batter
the fortifications, the town remained uninjured,
defying
the mighty army which raged and roamed before
it. Incensed at being thus foiled, Muley Aben Hassan
gave orders to undermine the walls. The Moors
advanced with shouts to the attempt. They were
received with a deadly fire from the ramparts, which
drove them from their works. Repeatedly were
they repulsed, and repeatedly did they return to the
charge. The christians not merely galled them from
the battlements, but issued forth and cut them down
in the excavations they were attempting to form.
The contest lasted throughout a whole day, and by
evening two thousand Moors were either killed or
wounded.
Muley Aben Hassan now abandoned all hope of
carrying the place by assault, and attempted to
distress
it into terms by turning the channel of the river
which runs by its walls. On this stream the
inhabitants
depended for their supply of water; the place
being destitute of fountains and cisterns, from which
circumstance it is called Alhama
la seca
, or the dry.
A desperate conflict ensued on the banks of the
river, the Moors endeavoring to plant palisades in
its bed to divert the stream, and the christians
striving
to prevent them. The Spanish commanders
exposed themselves to the utmost danger to animate
their men, who were repeatedly driven back into
the town. The marques of Cadiz was often up to
his knees in the stream, fighting hand to hand with
the Moors. The water ran red with blood, and was
encumbered with dead bodies. At length, the
overwhelming
numbers of the Moors gave them the
advantage
,
and they succeeded in diverting the greater
part of the water. The christians had to struggle
severely, to supply themselves from the feeble rill
which remained. They sallied to the river by a
subterraneous passage; but the Moorish
cross-bowmen
stationed themselves on the opposite bank,
keeping up a heavy fire upon the christians,
whenever
they attempted to fill their vessels from the
scanty and turbid stream. One party of the
christians
had, therefore, to fight, while another drew
water. At all hours of the day and night, this deadly
strife was maintained, until it seemed as if every drop
of water were purchased with a drop of blood.
In the mean time, the sufferings in the town
became
intense. None but the soldiery and their horses
were allowed the precious beverage so dearly earned,
and even that in quantities that only tantalized their
wants. The wounded, who could not sally to
procure
it, were almost destitute; while the unhappy
prisoners, shut up in the mosques, were reduced to
frightful extremities. Many perished raving mad,
fancying themselves swimming in boundless seas, yet
unable to assuage their thirst. Many of the soldiers
lay parched and panting along the battlements, no
longer able to draw a bowstring or hurl a stone;
while above five thousand Moors, stationed upon a
rocky height which overlooked part of the town,
kept up a galling fire into it with slings and
cross-bows
;
so that the marques of Cadiz was obliged to
heighten the battlements, by using the doors from the
private dwellings.
E 2
The christian cavaliers, exposed to this extreme
peril, and in imminent danger of falling into the hands
of the enemy, dispatched fleet messengers to Seville
and Cordova, entreating the chivalry of Andalusia to
hasten to their aid. They sent likewise, imploring
assistance from the king and queen, who at that time
held their court in Medina del Campo. In the
midst of their distress, a tank, or cistern, of water,
was fortunately discovered in the city, which gave
temporary relief to their sufferings.
CHAPTER VII.
How the Duke of Medina Sidonia, and the chivalry of
Andalusia, hastened to the relief of Alhama.
The
perilous situation of the christian cavaliers,
pent up and beleaguered within the walls of Alhama,
spread terror among their friends, and anxiety
throughout
all Andalusia. Nothing, however, could equal the
anguish of the marchioness of Cadiz, the wife of the
gallant Roderigo Ponce de Leon. In her deep
distress
,
she looked round for some powerful noble,
who had the means of rousing the country to the
assistance of her husband. No one appeared more
competent for the purpose than Don Juan de
Guzman
,
the duke of Medina Sidonia. He was one of
the most wealthy and puissant grandees of Spain;
his possessions extended over some of the most
fertile
parts of Andalusia, embracing towns, and
seaports
,
and numerous villages. Here he reigned in
feudal state, like a petty sovereign, and could at any
time bring into the field an immense force of vassals
and retainers.
The duke of Medina Sidonia, and the marques of
Cadiz, however, were at this time deadly foes. An
hereditary feud existed between them, which had
often arisen to bloodshed and open war; for as yet
the fierce contests between the proud and puissant
Spanish nobles had not been completely quelled by
the power of the crown, and in this respect they
exerted a right of sovereignty, in leading their vassals
against each other in open field.
The duke of Medina Sidonia would have appeared,
to many, the very last person to whom to apply for
aid of the marques of Cadiz; but the marchioness
judged of him by the standard of her own high and
generous mind. She knew him to be a gallant and
courteous knight, and had already experienced the
magnanimity of his spirit, having been relieved by
him when besieged by the Moors in her husband's
fortress of Arcos. To the duke, therefore, she
applied
in this moment of sudden calamity, imploring
him to furnish succor to her husband. The event
showed how well noble spirits understand each other.
No sooner did the duke receive this appeal from the
wife of his enemy, than he generously forgot all feeling
of animosity, and determined to go in person to his
succor. He immediately dispatched a courteous
letter to the marchioness, assuring her that in
consideration
of the request of so honorable and estimable
a lady, and to rescue from peril so valiant a cavalier
as her husband, whose loss would be great, not only
to Spain, but to all christendom, he would forego the
recollection of all past grievances, and hasten to his
relief with all the forces he could raise.
The duke wrote at the same time to the alcaydes
of his towns and fortresses, ordering them to join him
forthwith at Seville, with all the forces they could
spare from their garrisons. He called on all the
chivalry of Andalusia to make a common cause in
the rescue of those christian cavaliers, and he offered
large pay to all volunteers who would resort to him
with horses, armor, and provisions. Thus all who
could be incited by honor, religion, patriotism, or
thirst of gain, were induced to hasten to his standard,
and he took the field with an army of five thousand
horse and fifty thousand foot.
[12]
[12]
Cronica de los Duques de Medina Sidonia, por Pedro de
Medina. MS.
Many cavaliers of
distinguished name accompanied him in this generous
enterprise. Among these was the redoubtable Alonzo
de Aguilar, the chosen friend of the marques of Cadiz,
and with him his younger brother, Gonsalvo
Fernandez
de Cordova, afterwards renowned as the
grand captain; Don Roderigo Giron, also, Master of
the order of Calatrava, together with Martin Alonzo
de Montemayor, and the marques De Villena,
esteemed
the best lance in Spain. It was a gallant
and splendid army, comprising the flower of Spanish
chivalry, and poured forth in brilliant array from the
gates of Seville, bearing the great standard of that
ancient and renowned city.
Ferdinand and Isabella were at Medina del Campo,
when tidings came of the capture of Alhama. The
king was at mass when he received the news, and
ordered
te deum
to be chanted for this signal triumph
of the holy faith. When the first flush of triumph
had subsided, and the king learnt the imminent peril
of the valorous Ponce de Leon and his companions,
and the great danger that this strong hold might again
8
be wrested from their grasp, he resolved to hurry in
person to the scene of action. So pressing appeared
to him the emergency, that he barely gave himself
time to take a hasty repast while horses were
providing
,
and then departed at furious speed for
Andalusia
,
leaving a request for the queen to follow him.
[13]
[13]
Illescas. Hist. Pontifical.
He was attended by Don Beltram de la Cueva, duke
of Albuquerque, Don Inigo Lopez de Mendoza,
count of Tendilla, and Don Pedro Mauriques, count
of Trevio, with a few more cavaliers of prowess
and distinction. He travelled by forced journeys,
frequently changing his jaded horses, being eager to
arrive in time to take command of the Andalusian
chivalry. When he arrived within five leagues of
Cordova, the duke of Albuquerque remonstrated with
him upon entering, with such incautious haste, into
the enemies' country. He represented to him that
there were troops enough assembled to succor
Alhama
,
and that it was not for him to venture his royal
person in doing what could be done by his subjects;
especially as he had such valiant and experienced
captains to act for him. Besides, sire, added the
duke, your majesty should bethink you that the
troops about to take the field are mere men of
Andalusia
,
whereas your illustrious predecessors never
made an inroad into the territory of the Moors,
without
being accompanied by a powerful force of the
staunch and iron warriors of old Castile.
Duke, replied the king, your counsel might
have been good, had I not departed from Medina
with the avowed determination of succoring these
cavaliers in person. I am now near the end of my
journey, and it would be beneath my dignity to
change my intention, before even I had met with an
impediment. I shall take the troops of this country
who are assembled, without waiting for those of
Castile, and, with the aid of God, shall prosecute
my journey.
[14]
[14]
Pulgar. Cronica, p. 3. c. 3.
As king Ferdinand approached Cordova, the
principal
inhabitants came forth to receive him.
Learning
,
however, that the duke of Medina Sidonia was
already on the march, and pressing forward into the
territory of the Moors, the king was all on fire to
overtake him, and to lead in person the succor to
Alhama. Without entering Cordova, therefore, he
exchanged his weary horses for those of the
inhabitants
who had come forth to meet him, and pressed
forward for the army. He dispatched fleet couriers
in advance, requesting the duke of Medina Sidonia
to await his coming, that he might take command of
the forces.
Neither the duke nor his companions in arms,
however, felt inclined to pause in their generous
expedition
,
and gratify the inclination of the king. They
sent back missives, representing that they were far
within the enemies' frontier, and it was dangerous
either to pause or turn back. They had likewise
received pressing entreaties from the besieged to
hasten their speed, setting forth their great sufferings,
and their hourly peril of being overwhelmed by the
enemy.
The king was at Ponton del Maestre, when he
received
these missives. So inflamed was he with zeal
for the success of this enterprise, that he would have
penetrated into the kingdom of Granada with the
handful of cavaliers who accompanied him, but they
represented the rashness of such a journey, through
the mountainous defiles of a hostile country, thickly
beset with towns and castles. With some difficulty,
therefore, he was dissuaded from his inclination, and
prevailed upon to await tidings from the army, in
the frontier city of Antiquera.
CHAPTER VIII.
Sequel of the events at Alhama.
While
all Andalusia was thus in arms, and
pouring
its chivalry through the mountain passes of the
Moorish frontier, the garrison of Alhama was
reduced
to great extremity, and in danger of sinking
under its sufferings before the promised succor
could arrive. The intolerable thirst that prevailed
in consequence of the scarcity of water, the
incessant
watch that had to be maintained over the vast
force of enemies without, and the great number of
prisoners within, and the wounds which almost every
soldier had received in the incessant skirmishes and
assaults, had worn grievously both flesh and spirit.
The noble Ponce de Leon, marques of Cadiz, still
animated the soldiery, however, by word and
example
,
sharing every hardship and being foremost in
every danger; exemplifying that a good commander
is the vital spirit of an army.
When Muley Aben Hassan heard of the vast force
that was approaching under the command of the
duke of Medina Sidonia, and that Ferdinand was
coming in person with additional troops, he
perceived
that no time was to be lost: Alhama must be
carried
by one powerful attack, or abandoned entirely
to the christians.
A number of Moorish cavaliers, some of the
bravest youth of Granada, knowing the wishes of
Vol. I. F
the king, proposed to undertake a desperate
enterprise
,
which, if successful, must put Alhama in his
power. Early one morning, when it was scarcely
the gray of the dawn, about the time of changing the
watch, these cavaliers approached the town, at a
place considered inaccessible, from the steepness of
the rocks on which the wall was founded; which, it
was supposed, elevated the battlements beyond the
reach of the longest scaling-ladder. The Moorish
knights, aided by a number of the strongest and most
active escaladors, mounted these rrocks, and applied
the ladders, without being discovered; for, to divert
attention from them, Muley Aben Hassan made a
false attack upon the town in another quarter.
The scaling party mounted with difficulty, and in
small numbers; the sentinel was killed at his post,
and seventy of the Moors made their way into the
streets before an alarm was given. The guards
rushed to the walls, to stop the hostile throng that
was still pouring in. A sharp conflict, hand to hand
and man to man, took place on the battlements, and
many on both sides fell. The Moors, whether
wounded or slain, were thrown headlong without
the walls; the scaling-ladders were overturned, and
those who were mounting were dashed upon the
rocks, and from thence tumbled upon the plain.
Thus, in a little while, the ramparts were cleared
by christian prowess, led on by that valiant knight
Don Alonzo Ponce, the uncle, and that brave esquire
Pedro Pineda, nephew of the marques of Cadiz.
The walls being cleared, these two kindred cava
liers now hastened with their forces in pursuit of the
seventy Moors who had gained an entrance into
the town. The main party of the garrison being
engaged
at a distance resisting the feigned attack of the
Moorish king, this fierce band of infidels had ranged
the streets almost without opposition, and were
making their way to the gates to throw them open
to the army.
[15]
[15]
Zurita, lib. 20. c. 43.
They were chosen men from among
the Moorish forces, several of them gallant knights
of the proudest families of Granada. Their
footsteps
through the city were in a manner printed
in blood, and they were tracked by the bodies of
those they had killed and wounded. They had
attained the gate; most of the guard had fallen
beneath
their scimitars; a moment more, and Alhama
would have been thrown open to the enemy.
Just at this juncture, Don Alonzo Ponce and
Pedro
de Pineda reached the spot with their forces.
The Moors had the enemy in front and rear; they
placed themselves back to back, with their banner
in the centre. In this way they fought with
desperate
and deadly determination, making a rampart
around them with the slain. More christian troops
arrived, and hemmed them in; but still they fought,
without asking for quarter. As their numbers
decreased
,
they serried their circle still closer, defending
their banner from assault; and the last Moor died at
his post, grasping the standard of the Prophet. This
standard was displayed from the walls, and the tur
baned heads of the Moors were thrown down to the
besiegers.
[16]
[16]
Pedro de Pineda received the honor of knighthood from the
hand of king Ferdinand, for his valor on this occasion; (Alonzo
Ponce was already knight.)See Zuiga, Annales of Seville, lib.
12. an. 1482.
Muley Aben Hassan tore his beard with rage at the
failure of this attempt, and at the death of so many
of his chosen cavaliers. He saw that all further
effort was in vain; his scouts brought word that they
had seen from the heights, the long columns and
flaunting banners of the christian army approaching
through the mountains. To linger, would be to place
himself between two bodies of the enemy.
Breaking
up his camp, therefore, in all haste, he gave up
the siege of Alhama, and hastened back to Granada;
and the last clash of his cymbals scarce died upon
the ear from the distant hills, before the standard of
the duke of Sidonia was seen emerging in another
direction from the defiles of the mountains.
When the christians in Alhama beheld their
enemies
retreating on one side and their friends
advancing
on the other, they uttered shouts of joy and
hymns of thanksgiving, for it was as a sudden relief
from present death. Harassed by several weeks
of incessant vigil and fighting, suffering from scarcity
of provisions and almost continual thirst, they
resembled
skeletons rather than living men. It was a
noble and gracious sight to behold the meeting of
those two ancient foes, the duke of Medina Sidonia
and the marques of Cadiz. When the marques
beheld
his magnanimous deliverer approaching, he
melted into tears: all past animosities only gave the
greater poignancy to present feelings of gratitude and
admiration; they clasped each other in their arms,
and from that time forward were true and cordial
friends.
While this generous scene took place between the
commanders, a sordid contest arose among their
troops. The soldiers who had come to the rescue
claimed a portion of the spoils of Alhama; and so
violent was the dispute, that both parties seized their
arms. The duke of Medina Sidonia interfered, and
settled the question with his characteristic
magnanimity
.
He declared that the spoil belonged to those
who had captured the city. We have taken the
field, said he, only for honor, for religion, and for
the rescue of our countrymen and fellow-christians;
and the success of our enterprise is a sufficient and
a glorious reward. If we desire booty, there are
sufficient Moorish cities yet to be taken, to enrich us
all. The soldiers were convinced by the frank and
chivalrous reasoning of the duke; they replied to
his speech by acclamations, and the transient broil
was happily appeased.
The marchioness of Cadiz, with the forethought
of a loving wife, had dispatched her major domo
with the army, with a large supply of provisions.
Tables were immediately spread beneath the tents,
where the marques gave a banquet to the duke and
the cavaliers who had accompanied him, and nothing
F 2 9
but hilarity prevailed in this late scene of suffering
and death.
A garrison of fresh troops was left in Alhama; and
the veterans who had so valiantly captured and
maintained it, returned to their homes, burthened
with precious booty. The marques and duke, with
their confederate cavaliers, repaired to Antiquera,
where they were received with great distinction by
the king, who honored the marques of Cadiz with
signal marks of favor. The duke then accompanied
his late enemy, but now most zealous and
grateful
friend, the marques of Cadiz, to his town of
Marchena, where he received the reward of his
generous conduct, in the thanks and blessings of the
marchioness. The marques celebrated a sumptuous
feast, in honor of his guest; for a day and night, his
palace was thrown open, and was the scene of
continual
revel and festivity. When the duke departed
for his estates at St. Lucar, the marques attended
him for some distance on his journey; and when
they separated, it was as the parting scene of brothers.
Such was the noble spectacle exhibited to the
chivalry
of Spain, by these two illustrious rivals. Each
reaped universal renown from the part he had
performed
in the campaign; the marques, from having
surprised and captured one of the most important
and formidable fortresses of the kingdom of Granada;
and the duke, from having subdued his deadliest foe,
by a great act of magnanimity.
CHAPTER IX.
Events at Granada, and rise of the Moorish King
Boabdil el Chico.
The
Moorish king, Aben Hassan, returned, baffled
and disappointed, from before the walls of Alhama,
and was received with groans and smothered
execrations
by the people of Granada. The prediction of
the santon was in every mouth, and appeared to be
rapidly fulfilling; for the enemy was already strongly
fortified in Alhama, in the very heart of the kingdom.
The disaffection, which broke out in murmurs among
the common people, fermented more secretly and
dangerously among the nobles. Muley Aben Hassan
was of a fierce and cruel nature; his reign had been
marked with tyranny and bloodshed, and many chiefs
of the family of the Abencerrages, the noblest
lineage
among the Moors, had fallen victims to his policy
or vengeance. A deep plot was now formed, to put
an end to his oppressions, and dispossess him of the
throne. The situation of the royal household favored
the conspiracy.
Muley Aben Hassan, though cruel, was uxorious;
that is to say, he had many wives, and was prone to
be managed by them by turns. He had two queens,
in particular, whom he had chosen from affection.
One, named Ayxa, was a Moorish female; she was
likewise termed in Arabic, La Horra, or the chaste,
from the spotless purity of her character. While
yet in the prime of her beauty, she bore a son to
Aben Hassan, the expected heir to his throne. The
name of this prince was Mahomet Abdalla, or, as he
has more generally been termed among historians,
Boabdil. At his birth, the astrologers, according to
custom, cast his horoscope: they were seized with
fear and trembling, when they beheld the fatal
portents
revealed to their science. Alla Achbar! God
is great! exclaimed they; he alone controls the
fate of empires. It is written in the heavens that
this prince shall sit upon the throne of Granada, but
that the downfall of the kingdom shall be
accomplished
during his reign. From this time, the prince
was ever regarded with aversion by his father; and
the series of persecutions which he suffered, and the
dark prediction which hung over him from his
infancy
,
procured him the surname of El Zogoybi, or
the unfortunate. He is more commonly known
by the appellation of El Chico (the younger,) to
distinguish
him from an usurping uncle.
The other favorite queen of Aben Hassan was
named Fatima, to which the Moors added the
appellation
of La Zoraya, or the light of dawn, from her
effulgent beauty. She was a christian by birth, the
daughter of the commander Sancho Ximenes de
Solis, and had been taken captive in her tender
youth.
[17]
[17]
Cronica del Gran Cardinal, cap. 71. Salazar.
The king, who was well stricken in years
at the time, became enamored of the blooming
christian maid; he made her his sultana, and, like
most old men who marry in their dotage, resigned
himself to her management. Zoraya became the
mother of two princes, and her anxiety for their
advancement seemed to extinguish every other
natural
feeling in her breast. She was as ambitious as
she was beautiful, and her ruling desire became to
see one of her sons seated upon the throne of
Granada
.
For this purpose, she made use of all her
arts, and of the complete ascendancy she had over
the mind of her cruel husband, to undermine his
other children in his affections, and to fill him with
jealousies of their designs. Muley Aben Hassan
was so wrought upon by her machinations, that he
publicly put several of his sons to death, at the
celebrated
fountain of Lions, in the court of the
Alhambra
,a
place signalized in Moorish history as the
scene of many sanguinary deeds.
The next measure of Zoraya, was against her
rival sultana, the virtuous Ayxa. She was past the
bloom of her beauty, and had ceased to be attractive
in the eyes of her husband. He was easily persuaded
to repudiate her, and to confine her and her son in
the tower of Cimares, one of the principal towers
of the Alhambra. As Boabdil increased in years,
Zoraya beheld in him a formidable obstacle to the
pretensions of her sons; for he was universally
considered
heir-apparent to the throne. The jealousies,
suspicions, and alarms, of his tiger-hearted father,
were again excited; he was reminded, too, of the
prediction that fixed the ruin of the kingdom during
the reign of this prince. Muley Aben Hassan im
piously set the stars at defiance: The sword of the
executioner, said he, shall prove the falsehood of
these lying horoscopes, and shall silence the
ambition
of Boabdil, as it has the presumption of his
brothers.
The sultana Ayxa was secretly apprized of the
cruel design of the old monarch. She was a woman
of talents and courage, and, by means of her female
attendants, concerted a plan for the escape of her
son. A faithful servant was instructed to wait below
the Alhambra, in the dead of the night, on the banks
of the river Darro, with a fleet Arabian courser.
The sultana, when the castle was in a state of deep
repose, tied together the shawls and scarfs of herself
and her female attendants, and lowered the youthful
prince from the tower of Cimares.
[18]
[18]
Salazar. Cronica del Gran Cardinal, cap. 71.
He made his
way in safety down the steep rocky hill to the banks
of the Darro, and, throwing himself on the Arabian
courser, was thus spirited off to the city of Guadix
in the Alpuxarres. Here he lay for some time
concealed
,
until, gaining adherents, he fortified himself
in the place, and set the machinations of his tyrant
father at defiance. Such was the state of affairs in
the royal household of Granada, when Muley Aben
Hassan returned foiled from his expedition against
Alhama. The faction, which had secretly formed
among the nobles, determined to depose the old king
Aben Hassan, and to elevate his son Boabdil to the
throne. They concerted their measures with the
latter, and an opportunity soon presented to put them
in practice. Muley Aben Hassan had a royal
country
palace called Alixares, in the vicinity of
Granada
,
to which he resorted occasionally to recreate
his mind, during this time of perplexity. He had
been passing one day among its bowers, when, on
returning to the capital, he found the gates closed
against him, and his son Mohammed Abdalla,
otherwise
called Boabdil, proclaimed king. Allah
Achbar
!
God is great! exclaimed old Muley Aben
Hassan
;
it is in vain to contend against what is written
in the book of fate. It was predestined, that my son
should sit upon the throneAllah forefend the rest
of the prediction! The old monarch knew the
inflammable nature of the Moors, and that it was
useless
to attempt to check any sudden blaze of popular
passion. A little while, said he, and this rash
flame will burn itself out, and the people when cool
will listen to reason. So he turned his steed from
the gate, and repaired to the city of Baza, where he
was received with great demonstrations of loyalty.
He was not a man to give up his throne without a
struggle. A large part of the kingdom still remained
faithful to him; he trusted that the conspiracy in the
capital was but transient and partial, and that by
suddenly making his appearance in its streets, at the
head of a moderate force, he should awe the people
again into allegiance. He took his measures with
that combination of dexterity and daring which
formed his character, and arrived one night under
the walls of Granada, with five hundred chosen
followers
.
Scaling the walls of the Alhambra, he threw
himself with sanguinary fury into its silent courts.
The sleeping inmates were roused from their repose
only to fall by the exterminating scimitar. The rage
of Aben Hassan spared neither age, nor rank, nor
sex; the halls resounded with shrieks and yells, and
the fountains ran red with blood. The alcayde,
Aben Cimixer, retreated to a strong tower, with a
few of the garrison and inhabitants. The furious
Aben Hassan did not lose time in pursuing him; he
was anxious to secure the city, and to wreak his
vengeance on its rebellious inhabitants. Descending
with his bloody band into the streets, he cut down
the defenceless inhabitants, as, startled from their
sleep, they rushed forth to learn the cause of the
alarm. The city was soon completely roused; the
people flew to arms; lights blazed in every street,
revealing the scanty numbers of this band, that had
been dealing such fatal vengeance in the dark. Muley
Aben Hassan had been mistaken in his conjectures;
the great mass of the people, incensed by his tyranny,
were zealous in favor of his son. A violent, but
transient conflict took place in the streets and squares:
many of the followers of Aben Hassan were slain;
the rest driven out of the city; and the old monarch,
with the remnant of his band, retreated to his loyal
city of Malaga.
Such was the commencement of those great
internal
feuds and divisions, which hastened the downfall
of Granada. The Moors became separated into two
hostile factions, headed by the father and the son,
and several bloody encounters took place between
them: yet they never failed to act with all their
separate
force against the christians, as a common enemy,
whenever an opportunity occurred.
Vol. I. G 10
CHAPTER X.
Royal Expedition against Loxa.
King Ferdinand
held a council of war at Cordova,
where it was deliberated what was to be done with
Alhama. Most of the council advised that it should
be demolished, inasmuch as being in the centre of
the Moorish kingdom, it would be at all times liable
to attack, and could only be maintained by a
powerful
garrison and at a vast expense. Queen Isabella
arrived at Cordova in the midst of these deliberations,
and listened to them with surprise and impatience.
What! said she, shall we destroy the first fruits
of our victories? shall we abandon the first place we
have wrested from the Moors? Never let us suffer
such an idea to occupy our minds. It would give
new courage to the enemy, arguing fear or feebleness
in our councils. You talk of the toil and expense of
maintaining Alhama. Did we doubt, on undertaking
this war, that it was to be a war of infinite cost,
labor, and bloodshed? And shall we shrink from the
cost, the moment a victory is obtained, and the
question
is merely to guard or abandon its glorious trophy?
Let us hear no more about the destruction of Alhama;
let us maintain its walls sacred, as a strong-hold
granted
us by heaven, in the centre of this hostile land;
and let our only consideration be how to extend our
conquest, and capture the surrounding cities.
The language of the queen infused a more lofty
and chivalrous spirit into the royal council.
Preparations
were immediately made to maintain Alhama
at all risk and expense; and king Ferdinand appointed
as alcayde Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero, Senior
of the house of Palma, supported by Diego Lopez
de Ayola, Pero Ruiz de Alarcon, and Alonzo Ortis,
captains of four hundred lances, and a body of one
thousand foot; supplied with provisions for three
months.
Ferdinand resolved also to lay siege to Loxa, a
city of great strength, at no great distance from
Alhama
.
For this purpose, he called upon all the
cities and towns of Andalusia and Estramadura, and
the domains of the orders of Santiago, Calatrava, and
Alcantara, and of the priory of St. Juan, and the
kingdom of Toledo, and beyond to the cities of
Salamanca
,
Tero, and Valladolid, to furnish, according to
their repartimientos or allotments, a certain quantity
of bread, wine, and cattle, to be delivered at the
royal camp before Loxa, one-half at the end of June,
and one-half in July. These lands, also, together
with Biscay and Guipiscoa, were ordered to send
reinforcements of horse and foot, each town
furnishing
its quota; and great diligence was used in
providing
bombards, powder, and other warlike munitions.
The Moors were no less active in their
preparations
,
and sent missives into Africa, entreating
supplies
,
and calling upon the Barbary princes to aid
them in this war of the faith. To intercept all succor,
the Castilian sovereigns stationed an armada of ships
and galleys in the Straits of Gibraltar, under the
command
of Martin Diaz de Mina and Carlos de Valera,
with orders to scour the Barbary coast, and sweep
every Moorish sail from the sea.
While these preparations were making, Ferdinand
made an incursion, at the head of his army, into the
kingdom of Granada, and laid waste the vega,
destroying
its hamlets and villages, ravaging its fields of grain,
and driving away the cattle.
It was about the end of June, that king Ferdinand
departed from Cordova, to sit down before the walls
of Loxa. So confident was he of success, that he
left a great part of the army at Ecija, and advanced
with but five thousand cavalry and eight thousand
infantry. The marques of Cadiz, a warrior as wise
as he was valiant, remonstrated against employing so
small a force, and indeed was opposed to the measure
altogether, as being undertaken precipitately and
without
sufficient preparation. King Ferdinand, however,
was influenced by the counsel of Don Diego de
Merlo, and was eager to strike a brilliant and decided
blow. A vain-glorious confidence prevailed, about
this time, among the Spanish cavaliers; they
overrated
their own prowess, or rather they undervalued
and despised their enemy. Many of them believed
that the Moors would scarcely remain in their city,
when they saw the christian troops advancing to
assail
it. The Spanish chivalry, therefore, marched
gallantly and fearlessly, and almost carelessly, over
the border, scantily supplied with the things needful
for a besieging army, in the heart of an enemy's
country. In the same negligent and confident spirit,
they took up their station before Loxa.
The country around was broken and hilly, so that
it was extremely difficult to form a combined camp.
The river Xenil, which runs by the town, was
compressed
between high banks, and so deep as to be
fordable with extreme difficulty; and the Moors had
possession of the bridge. The king pitched his tents
in a plantation of olives, on the banks of the river;
the troops were distributed in different encampments
on the heights, but separated from each other by deep
rocky ravines, so as to be incapable of yielding each
other prompt assistance. There was no room for the
operation of the cavalry. The artillery, also, was so
injudiciously placed, as to be almost entirely useless.
Alonzo of Arragon, duke of Villahermosa, and
illegitimate
brother of the king, was present at the siege,
and disapproved of the whole arrangement. He was
one of the most able generals of his time, and
especially
renowned for his skill in battering fortified
places. He recommended that the whole disposition
of the camp should be changed, and that several
bridges should be thrown across the river. His advice
was adopted, but slowly and negligently followed, so
that it was rendered of no avail. Among other
over-sights
in this hasty and negligent expedition, the army
had no supply of baked bread; and, in the hurry of
encampment, there was no time to erect furnaces.
Cakes were therefore hastily made, and baked on the
coals, and for two days the troops were supplied in
this irregular way.
G 2
King Ferdinand felt, too late, the insecurity of his
position, and endeavored to provide a temporary
remedy. There was a height near the city, called
by the Moors Santo Albohacen, which was in front
of the bridge. He ordered several of his most valiant
cavaliers to take possession of this height, and to hold
it as a check upon the enemy and a protection to the
camp. The cavaliers chosen for this distinguished
and perilous post, were, the marques of Cadiz, the
marques of Villena, Don Roderigo Tellez Giron,
Master of Calatrava, his brother the count of Urea,
and Don Alonzo de Aguilar. These valiant warriors,
and tried companions in arms, led their troops with
alacrity to the height, which soon glittered with the
array of arms, and was graced by several of the most
redoubtable pennons of warlike Spain.
Loxa was commanded at this time by an old
Moorish
alcayde, whose daughter was the favorite wife of
Boabdil el Chico. The name of this Moor was
Ibrahim Ali Atar, but he was generally known among
the Spaniards as Alatar. He had grown gray in
border warfare, was an implacable enemy of the
christians, and his name had long been the terror of
the frontier. He was in the ninetieth year of his
age, yet indomitable in spirit, fiery in his passions,
sinewy and powerful in frame, deeply versed in
warlike
stratagem, and accounted the best lance in all
Mauritania. He had three thousand horsemen under
his command, veteran troops, with whom he had
often scoured the borders; and he daily expected the
old Moorish king, with reinforcements.
Old Ali Atar had watched from his fortress every
movement of the christian army, and had exulted in
all the errors of its commanders: when he beheld
the flower of Spanish chivalry, glittering about the
height of Albohacen, his eye flashed with exultation.
By the aid of Allah, said he, I will give those
pranking cavaliers a rouse.
Ali Atar, privately, and by night, sent forth a large
body of his chosen troops, to lie in ambush near one
of the skirts of Albohacen. On the fourth day of the
siege, he sallied across the bridge, and made a feint
attack upon the height. The cavaliers rushed
impetuously
forth to meet him, leaving their
encampment
almost unprotected. Ali Atar wheeled and
fled, and was hotly pursued. When the christian
cavaliers had been drawn a considerable distance
from their encampment, they heard a vast shout
behind
them, and, looking round, beheld their
encampment
assailed by the Moorish force which had been
placed in ambush, and which had ascended a different
side of the hill. The cavaliers desisted from the
pursuit, and hastened to prevent the plunder of their
tents. Ali Atar, in his turn, wheeled and pursued
them; and they were attacked in front and rear, on
the summit of the hill. The contest lasted for an
hour; the height of Albohacen was red with blood;
many brave cavaliers fell, expiring among heaps of
the enemy. The fierce Ali Atar fought with the fury
of a demon, until the arrival of more christian forces
compelled him to retreat into the city. The severest
loss to the christians, in this skirmish, was that of
Roderigo Tellez Giron, Master of Calatrava. As he
was raising his arm to make a blow, an arrow pierced
him, just beneath the shoulder, at the open part of
the corselet. He fell instantly from his horse, but
was caught by Pedro Gasca, a cavalier of Avila, who
conveyed him to his tent, where he died. The king
and queen, and the whole kingdom, mourned his
death, for he was in the freshness of his youth, being
but twenty-four years of age, and had proved himself
a gallant and high-minded cavalier. A melancholy
group collected about his corse, on the bloody height
of Albohacen: the knights of Calatrava mourned him
as a commander; the cavaliers who were encamped
on the height, lamented him as their companion in
arms, in a service of peril; while the count de Urea
grieved over him with the tender affection of a brother.
King Ferdinand now perceived the wisdom of the
opinion of the marques of Cadiz, and that his force
was quite insufficient for the enterprise. To continue
his camp in its present unfortunate position, would
cost him the lives of his bravest cavaliers, if not a
total defeat, in case of reinforcements to the enemy.
He called a council of war, late in the evening of
Saturday; and it was determined to withdraw the
army, early the next morning, to Rio Frio, a short
distance from the city, and there wait for additional
troops from Cordova.
The next morning, early, the cavaliers on the
height of Albohacen began to strike their tents. No
sooner did Ali Atar behold this, than he sallied forth
to attack them. Many of the christian troops, who
had not heard of the intention to change the camp,
seeing the tents struck and the Moors sallying forth,
supposed that the enemy had been reinforced in the
night, and that the army was on the point of
retreating
.
Without stopping to ascertain the truth, or to
receive orders, they fled in dismay, spreading
confusion
through the camp; nor did they halt until they
had reached the Rock of the Lovers, about seven
leagues from Loxa.
[19]
[19]
Pulgar. Cronica.
The king and his commanders saw the imminent
peril of the moment, and made face to the Moors,
each commander guarding his quarter and repelling
all assaults, while the tents were struck and the
artillery
and ammunition conveyed away. The king,
with a handful of cavaliers, galloped to a rising
ground, exposed to the fire of the enemy, calling
upon the flying troops and endeavoring in vain to
rally them. Setting upon the Moors, he and his
cavaliers charged them so vigorously, that they put
a squadron to flight, slaying many with their swords
and lances, and driving others into the river, where
they were drowned. The Moors, however, were
soon reinforced, and returned in great numbers.
The king was in danger of being surrounded, and
twice owed his safety to the valor of Don Juan de
Ribera, Senior of Montemayor.
The marques of Cadiz beheld, from a distance, the
peril of his sovereign. Summoning about seventy
horsemen to follow him, he galloped to the spot,
11
threw himself between the king and the enemy, and,
hurling his lance, transpierced one of the most daring
of the Moors. For some time, he remained with no
other weapon than his sword; his horse was wounded
by an arrow, and many of his followers slain; but he
succeeded in beating off the Moors, and rescuing the
king from imminent jeopardy, whom he then
prevailed
upon to retire to less dangerous ground.
The marques continued, throughout the day, to
expose himself to the repeated assaults of the enemy;
he was ever found in the place of the greatest
danger
,
and through his bravery a great part of the army
and camp was preserved from destruction.
[20]
[20]
Cura de los Palacios, c. 58.
It was a perilous day for the commanders; for in
a retreat of the kind, it is the noblest cavaliers who
most expose themselves to save their people. The
duke of Medina Celi was struck to the ground, but
rescued by his troops. The count de Tendilla,
whose tents were nearest to the city, received several
wounds, and various other cavaliers of the most
distinguished
note were exposed to fearful jeopardy.
The whole day was passed in bloody skirmishings,
in which the hidalgos and cavaliers of the royal
household distinguished themselves by their bravery;
at length, the encampments being all broken up, and
most of the artillery and baggage removed, the bloody
height of Albohacen was abandoned, and the
neighborhood
of Loxa evacuated. Several tents, a
quantity
of provisions, and a few pieces of artillery, were
left upon the spot, from the want of horses and mules
to carry them off.
Ali Atar hung upon the rear of the retiring army,
and harassed it until it reached Rio Frio; from thence
Ferdinand returned to Cordova, deeply mortified,
though greatly benefited, by the severe lesson he had
received, which served to render him more cautious
in his campaigns and more diffident of fortune. He
sent letters to all parts, excusing his retreat, imputing
it to the small number of his forces, and the
circumstance
that many of them were quotas sent from
various cities, and not in royal pay; in the mean
time, to console his troops for their disappointment,
and to keep up their spirits, he led them upon
another
inroad to lay waste the vega of Granada.
CHAPTER XI.
How Muley Aben Hassan made a foray into the lands
of Medina Sidonia, and how he was received.
Old
Muley Aben Hassan had mustered an army,
and marched to the relief of Loxa; but arrived too
latethe last squadron of Ferdinand had already
passed over the border. They have come and
gone, said he, like a summer cloud, and all their
vaunting has been mere empty thunder. He turned
to make another attempt upon Alhama, the garrison
of which was in the utmost consternation at the
retreat of Ferdinand, and would have deserted the
place, had it not been for the courage and
perseverance
of the alcayde Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero.
That brave and loyal commander cheered up the
spirits of his men, and kept the old Moorish king at
bay, until the approach of Ferdinand, on his second
incursion into the vega, obliged him to make an
unwilling
retreat to Malaga.
Muley Aben Hassan felt that it would be in vain,
with his inferior force, to oppose the powerful army
of the christian monarch; but to remain idle and see
his territories laid waste, would ruin him in the
estimation
of his people. If we cannot parry, said
he, we can strike; if we cannot keep our own lands
from being ravaged, we can ravage the lands of the
enemy. He inquired and learnt that most of the
chivalry of Andalusia, in their eagerness for a foray,
had marched off with the king, and left their own
country almost defenceless. The territories of the
duke of Medina Sidonia were particularly unguarded:
here were vast plains of pasturage, covered with
flocks and herdsthe very country for a hasty
inroad
.
The old monarch had a bitter grudge against
the duke, for having foiled him at Alhama. I'll
give this cavalier a lesson, said he, exultingly, that
will cure him of his love of campaigning. So he
prepared in all haste for a foray into the country
about Medina Sidonia.
Muley Aben Hassan sallied out of Malaga with
fifteen hundred horse and six thousand foot, and took
the way by the sea-coast, marching through Estiponia,
and entering the christian country between Gibraltar
and Castellar. The only person that was likely to
molest him on this route, was one Pedro de Vargas;
a shrewd, hardy, and vigilant soldier, alcayde of
Gibraltar, and who lay ensconced in his old warrior
rock as in a citadel. Muley Aben Hassan knew
the watchful and daring character of the man, but
had ascertained that his garrison was too small to
enable him to make a sally, or at least to insure him
any success. Still he pursued his march, with great
silence and caution; sent parties in advance, to
explore
every pass where a foe might lie in ambush;
cast many an anxious eye towards the old rock of
Gibraltar, as its cloud-capped summit was seen
towering
in the distance on his left; nor did he feel
entirely
at ease, until he had passed through the broken
Vol. I. H
and mountainous country of Castellar, and descended
into the plains. Here he encamped on the banks of
the Celemin. From hence he sent four hundred
corredors, or fleet horsemen, armed with lances, who
were to station themselves near Algeziras, and to
keep a strict watch across the bay, upon the opposite
fortress of Gibraltar. If the alcayde attempted to
sally forth, they were to waylay and attack him,
being
almost four times his supposed force; and were
to send swift tidings to the camp. In the mean time,
two hundred corredors were sent to scour that vast
plain called the Campia de Tarifa, abounding with
flocks and herds; and two hundred more were to
ravage the lands about Medina Sidonia. Muley
Aben Hassan remained with the main body of the
army, as a rallying point, on the banks of the Celemin.
The foraging parties scoured the country to such
effect, that they came driving vast flocks and herds
before them, enough to supply the place of all that
had been swept from the vega of Granada. The
troops which had kept watch upon the rock of
Gibraltar
,
returned with word that they had not seen a
christian helmet stirring. The old king congratulated
himself upon the secrecy and promptness with which
he had conducted his foray, and upon having baffled
the vigilance of Pedro de Vargas.
Muley Aben Hassan had not been so secret as he
imagined; the watchful Pedro de Vargas had received
notice of his movements. His garrison was barely
sufficient for the defence of the place, and he feared
to take the field and leave his fortress unguarded.
Luckily, at this juncture, there arrived in the harbor
of Gibraltar a squadron of the armed galleys stationed
in the Strait, and commanded by Carlos de Valera.
The alcayde immediately prevailed upon him to
guard the place during his absence, and sallied forth
at midnight with seventy horse. He made for the
town of Castellar, which is strongly posted on a steep
height, knowing that the Moorish king would have
to return by this place. He ordered alarm-fires to
be lighted upon the mountains, to give notice that
the Moors were on the ravage, that the peasants
might drive their flocks and herds to places of refuge;
and he sent couriers, riding like mad, in every
direction
,
summoning the fighting men of the neighborhood
to meet him at Castellar.
Muley Aben Hassan saw, by the fires blazing about
the mountains, that the country was rising. He struck
his tents, and pushed forward as rapidly as possible
for the border; but he was incumbered with booty,
and with the vast cavalgada swept from the pastures
of the Campia de Tarifa. His scouts brought him
word that there were troops in the field, but he made
light of the intelligence, knowing that they could
only be those of the alcayde of Gibraltar, and that
he had not more than a hundred horsemen in his
garrison
.
He threw in advance two hundred and fifty
of his bravest troops, and with them the alcaydes of
Marabella and Casares. Behind this vanguard was
a great cavalgada of cattle; and in the rear marched
the king, with the main force of his little army.
It was near the middle of a sultry summer day,
that they approached Castellar. De Vargas was on
the watch, and beheld, by an immense cloud of dust,
that they were descending one of the heights of that
wild and broken country. The vanguard and rear
guard were above half a league asunder, with the
cavalgada between them; and a long and close forest
hid them from each other. De Vargas saw that they
could render but little assistance to each other in
case of a sudden attack, and might be easily thrown
in confusion. He chose fifty of his bravest horsemen,
and, making a circuit, took his post secretly in a
narrow glen opening into a defile between two rocky
heights, through which the Moors had to pass. It
was his intention to suffer the vanguard and the
cavalgada to pass, and to fall upon the rear.
While thus lying perdue, six Moorish scouts, well
mounted and well armed, entered the glen,
examining
every place that might conceal an enemy. Some
of the christians advised that they should slay these
six men, and retreat to Gibraltar. No, said De
Vargas, I have come out for higher game than
these; and I hope, by the aid of God and Santiago,
to do good work this day. I know these Moors well,
and doubt not but that they may readily be thrown
into confusion.
By this time, the six horsemen approached so near
that they were on the point of discovering the
christian
ambush. De Vargas gave the word, and ten
horsemen rushed forth upon them: in an instant,
four of the Moors rolled in the dust; the other two
put spurs to their steeds, and fled towards their army,
pursued by the ten christians. About eighty of the
Moorish vanguard came galloping to the relief of
their companions; the christians turned, and fled
towards their ambush. De Vargas kept his men
concealed, until the fugitives and their pursuers
came clattering pell-mell into the glen. At a signal
trumpet, his men sallied forth with great heat and
in close array. The Moors almost rushed upon
their weapons, before they perceived them; forty of
the infidels were overthrown, the rest turned their
backs. Forward! cried De Vargas; let us give
the vanguard a brush, before it can be joined by the
rear. So saying, he pursued the flying Moors down
hill, and came with such force and fury upon the
advance guard as to overturn many of them at the
first encounter. As he wheeled off with his men,
the Moors discharged their lances; upon which he
returned to the charge, and made great slaughter.
The Moors fought valiantly for a short time, until the
alcaydes of Marabella and Casares were slain, when
they gave way and fled for the rear guard. In their
flight, they passed through the cavalgada of cattle,
threw the whole in confusion, and raised such a cloud
of dust that the christians could no longer distinguish
objects. Fearing that the king and the main body
might be at hand, and finding that De Vargas was
badly wounded, they contented themselves with
despoiling
the slain and taking above twenty-eight
horses, and then retreated to Castellar.
When the routed Moors came flying back upon
the rear guard, Muley Aben Hassan feared that the
H 2 12
people of Xeres were in arms. Several of his
followers
advised him to abandon the cavalgada, and
retreat by another road. No, said the old king,
he is no true soldier who gives up his booty
without
fighting. Putting spurs to his horse, he
galloped
forward through the centre of the cavalgada,
driving the cattle to the right and left. When he
reached the field of battle, he found it strewed with
the bodies of upwards of one hundred Moors, among
which were those of the two alcaydes. Enraged at
the sight, he summoned all his cross-bow-men and
cavalry, pushed on to the very gates of Castellar, and
set fire to two houses close to the walls. Pedro de
Vargas was too severely wounded to sally forth in
person; but he ordered out his troops, and there was
brisk skirmishing under the walls, until the king drew
off and returned to the scene of the recent encounter.
Here he had the bodies of the principal warriors laid
across mules, to be interred honorably at Malaga;
the rest of the slain were buried on the field of battle.
Then, gathering together the scattered cavalgada, he
paraded it slowly, in an immense line, past the walls
of Castellar, by way of taunting his foe.
With all his fierceness, old Muley Aben Hassan
had a gleam of warlike courtesy, and admired the
hardy and soldierlike character of Pedro de Vargas.
He summoned two christian captives, and demanded
what were the revenues of the alcayde of Gibraltar.
They told him that, among other things, he was
entitled
to one out of every drove of cattle that passed
his boundaries. Allah forbid, cried the old
monarch
,
that so brave a cavalier should be defrauded
of his dues.
He immediately chose twelve of the finest cattle,
from the twelve droves which formed the cavalgada.
These he gave in charge to an alfaqui, to deliver to
Pedro de Vargas. Tell him, said he, that I
crave his pardon for not having sent these cattle
sooner; but I have this moment learnt the nature of
his rights, and I hasten to satisfy them, with the
punctuality due to so worthy a cavalier. Tell him,
at the same time, that I had no idea the alcayde of
Gibraltar was so active and vigilant in collecting his
tolls.
The brave alcayde relished the stern soldierlike
pleasantry of the old Moorish monarch. He ordered
a rich silken vest, and a scarlet mantle, to be given
to the alfaqui, and dismissed him with great courtesy.
Tell his majesty, said he, that I kiss his hands
for the honor he has done me, and regret that my
scanty force has not permitted me to give him a more
signal reception, on his coming into these parts. Had
three hundred horsemen, whom I have been
promised
from Xeres, arrived in time, I might have served
up an entertainment more befitting such a monarch.
I trust, however, they will arrive in the course of
the night, in which case his majesty may be sure of
a royal regale at the dawning.
Muley Aben Hassan shook his head, when he
received
the reply of De Vargas. Allah preserve
us, said he, from any visitation of these hard riders
of Xeres! a handful of troops, acquainted with the
wild passes of these mountains, may destroy an army
encumbered as ours is with booty.
It was some relief to the king, however, to learn
that the hardy alcayde of Gibraltar was too severely
wounded to take the field in person. He immediately
beat a retreat, with all speed, before the close of day,
hurrying with such precipitation, that the cavalgada
was frequently broken, and scattered among the
rugged defiles of the mountains; and above five
thousand
of the cattle turned back, and were regained by
the christians. Muley Aben Hassan returned
triumphantly
with the residue to Malaga, glorying in
the spoils of the duke of Medina Sidonia.
King Ferdinand was mortified at finding his
incursion
into the vega of Granada counterbalanced by
this inroad into his dominions, and saw that there
were two sides to the game of war, as to all other
games. The only one who reaped real glory, in this
series of inroads and skirmishings, was Pedro de
Vargas, the stout alcayde of Gibraltar.
[21]
[21]
Alonzo de Paleneca, 1. 28. c. 3.
CHAPTER XII.
Foray of Spanish cavaliers among the mountains
of Malaga.
The
foray of old Muley Aben Hassan had touched
the pride of the Andalusian chivalry, and they
determined
on retaliation. For this purpose, a number
of the most distinguished cavaliers assembled at
Antiquera, in the month of March, 1483. The
leaders
of the enterprise were, the gallant marques of
Cadiz; Don Pedro Henriquez, adelantado of
Andalusia
;
Don Juan de Silva, count of Cifuentes, and
bearer of the royal standard, who commanded in
Seville; Don Alonzo de Cardevas, Master of the
religious and military order of Santiago; and Don
Alonzo de Aguilar. Several other cavaliers of note
hastened to take part in the enterprise; and in a
little while, about twenty-seven hundred horse, and
several companies of foot, were assembled within
the old warlike city of Antiquera, comprising the
very flower of Andalusian chivalry.
A council of war was held by the chiefs, to
determine
in what quarter they should strike a blow.
The rival Moorish kings were waging civil war with
each other, in the vicinity of Granada; and the
whole country lay open to inroads. Various plans
were proposed by the different cavaliers. The
marques
of Cadiz was desirous of scaling the walls of
Zahara, and regaining possession of that important
fortress. The Master of Santiago, however, suggested
a wider range and a still more important object. He
had received information from his adalides, who
were apostate Moors, that an incursion might be
safely made into a mountainous region near Malaga,
called the Axarquia. Here were valleys of pasture
land, well stocked with flocks and herds; and there
were numerous villages and hamlets, which would
be an easy prey. The city of Malaga was too weakly
garrisoned, and had too few cavalry, to send forth
any force in opposition; nay, he added, they might
even extend their ravages to its very gates, and
peradventure
carry that wealthy place by sudden
assault
.
The adventurous spirits of the cavaliers were
inflamed
by this suggestion; in their sanguine
confidence
,
they already beheld Malaga in their power,
and they were eager for the enterprise. The
marques
of Cadiz endeavored to interpose a little cool
caution. He likewise had apostate adalides, the
most intelligent and experienced on the borders;
among these, he placed especial reliance on one
named Luis Amar, who knew all the mountains and
valleys of the country. He had received from him
a particular account of these mountains of the
Axarquia
.
[22]
[22]
Pulgar, in his Chronicle, reverses the case, and makes the
marques of Cadiz recommend the expedition to the Axarquia;
but Fray Antonio Agapida is supported in his statement by that
most veracious and contemporary chronicler, Andres Bernaldes,
curate of Los Palacios.
Their savage and broken nature was a
sufficient
defence for the fierce people who inhabited
them, who, manning their rocks, and their
tremendous
passes, which were often nothing more than the
deep dry beds of torrents, might set whole armies at
defiance. Even if vanquished, they afforded no spoil
to the victor. Their houses were little better than
bare walls, and they would drive off their scanty
flocks and herds to the fastnesses of the mountains.
The sober counsel of the marques, however, was
overruled. The cavaliers, accustomed to mountain
warfare, considered themselves and their horses equal
to any wild and rugged expedition, and were flushed
with the idea of terminating their foray by a brilliant
assault upon Malaga.
Leaving all heavy baggage at Antiquera, and all
such as had horses too weak for this mountain
scramble
,
they set forth, full of spirit and confidence. Don
Alonzo de Aguilar, and the adelantado of Andalusia,
led the squadron of advance. The count of
Cifuentes
followed, with certain of the chivalry of
Seville
.
Then came the battalion of the most valiant
Roderigo Ponce de Leon, marques of Cadiz: he
was accompanied by several of his brothers and
nephews, and many cavaliers, who sought distinction
under his banner; and this family band attracted
universal attention and applause, as they paraded in
martial state through the streets of Antiquera. The
rear guard was led by Don Alonzo Cardenas, Master
of Santiago, and was composed of the knights of his
order, and the cavaliers of Ecija, with certain
men-at-arms
of the Holy Brotherhood, whom the king
had placed under his command. The army was
attended
by a great train of mules, laden with
provisions
for a few days' supply, until they should be
able to forage among the Moorish villages. Never
did a more gallant and self-confident little army tread
the earth. It was composed of men full of health
and vigor, to whom war was a pastime and delight.
They had spared no expense in their equipments, for
never was the pomp of war carried to a higher pitch
than among the proud chivalry of Spain. Cased in
armor richly inlaid and embossed, decked with rich
surcoats and waving plumes, and superbly mounted
on Andalusian steeds, they pranced out of Antiquera
with banners flying, and their various devices and
armorial bearings ostentatiously displayed; and in
the confidence of their hopes, promised the
inhabitants
to enrich them with the spoils of Malaga.
In the rear of this warlike pageant, followed a
peaceful band, intent upon profiting by the
anticipated
victories. They were not the customary wretches
that hover about armies to plunder and strip the
dead, but goodly and substantial traders from Seville,
Cordova, and other cities of traffic. They rode
sleek mules, and were clad in goodly raiment, with
long leathern purses at their girdles, well filled with
pistoles and other golden coin. They had heard of
the spoils wasted by the soldiery at the capture of
Alhama, and were provided with moneys to buy up
the jewels and precious stones, the vessels of gold
and silver, and the rich silks and cloths, that should
form the plunder of Malaga. The proud cavaliers
eyed these sons of traffic with great disdain, but
permitted
them to follow for the convenience of the
troops, who might otherwise be overburthened with
booty.
It had been intended to conduct this expedition
with great celerity and secrecy; but the noise of
their preparations had already reached the city of
Malaga. The garrison, it is true, was weak; but it
possessed a commander who was himself a host.
This was Muley Abdallah, commonly called El
Zagal
,
or the valiant. He was younger brother of
Muley
Aben Hassan, and general of the few forces
which remained faithful to the old monarch. He
possessed equal fierceness of spirit with his brother,
and surpassed him in craft and vigilance. His very
name was a war-cry among his soldiery, who had the
most extravagant opinion of his prowess.
El Zagal suspected that Malaga was the object of
this noisy expedition. He consulted with old Bexir,
a veteran Moor, who governed the city. If this
army of marauders should reach Malaga, said he,
we should hardly be able to keep them without its
walls. I will throw myself, with a small force, into
the mountains; rouse the peasantry, take possession
of the passes, and endeavor to give these Spanish
cavaliers sufficient entertainment upon the road.
It was on a Wednesday, that the pranking army of
high-mettled warriors issued forth from the ancient
gates of Antiquera. They marched all day and
night, making their way, secretly as they supposed,
through the passes of the mountains. As the tract
Vol. I. I 13
of country they intended to maraud was far in the
Moorish territories, near the coast of the
Mediterranean
,
they did not arrive there until late in the
following
day. In passing through these stern and lofty
mountains, their path was often along the bottom of
a barranco, or deep rocky valley, with a scanty
stream dashing along it, among the loose rocks and
stones, which it had broken and rolled down, in the
time of its autumnal violence. Sometimes their road
was a mere rambla, or dry bed of a torrent, cut deep
into the mountains, and filled with their shattered
fragments. These barrancos and ramblas were
overhung
by immense cliffs and precipices; forming the
lurking-places of ambuscades, during the wars
between
the Moors and Spaniards, as in after times
they have become the favorite haunts of robbers to
waylay the unfortunate traveller.
As the sun went down, the cavaliers came to a
lofty part of the mountains, commanding to the right
a distant glimpse of a part of the fair vega of
Malaga
,
with the blue Mediterranean beyond; and they
hailed it with exultation, as a glimpse of the promised
land. As the night closed in, they reached the chain
of little valleys and hamlets, locked up among these
rocky heights, and known among the Moors by the
name of the Axarquia. Here their vaunting hopes
were destined to meet with the first disappointment.
The inhabitants had heard of their approach; they
had conveyed away their cattle and effects, and,
with their wives and children, had taken refuge in
the towers and fastnesses of the mountains.
Enraged at their disappointment, the troops set fire
to the deserted houses, and pressed forward, hoping
for better fortune as they advanced. Don Alonzo
de Aguilar, and the other cavaliers in the vanguard,
spread out their forces to lay waste the country;
capturing a few lingering herds of cattle, with the
Moorish peasants who were driving them to some
place of safety.
While this marauding party carried fire and sword
in the advance, and lit up the mountain cliffs with
the flames of the hamlets, the Master of Santiago,
who brought up the rear guard, maintained strict
order, keeping his knights together in martial array,
ready for attack or defence, should an enemy appear.
The men-at-arms of the Holy Brotherhood
attempted
to roam in quest of booty; but he called them
back, and rebuked them severely.
At length they came to a part of the mountain
completely broken up by barrancos and ramblas, of
vast depth, and shagged with rocks and precipices.
It was impossible to maintain the order of march;
the horses had no room for action, and were scarcely
manageable, having to scramble from rock to rock,
and up and down frightful declivities, where there
was scarce footing for a mountain goat. Passing by
a burning village, the light of the flames revealed
their perplexed situation. The Moors, who had
taken refuge in a watch-tower on an impending
height, shouted with exultation, when they looked
down upon these glistening cavaliers struggling and
stumbling among the rocks. Sallying forth from their
tower, they took possession of the cliffs which
overhung
the ravine, and hurled darts and stones upon
the enemy. It was with the utmost grief of heart
that the good Master of Santiago beheld his brave
men falling like helpless victims around him, without
the means of resistance or revenge. The confusion
of his followers was increased by the shouts of the
Moors, multiplied by the echoes of every crag and
cliff, as if they were surrounded by innumerable
foes. Being entirely ignorant of the country, in their
struggles to extricate themselves they plunged into
other glens and defiles, where they were still more
exposed to danger. In this extremity, the master of
Santiago dispatched messengers in search of succor.
The marques of Cadiz, like a loyal companion in
arms, hastened to his aid with his cavalry; his
approach
checked the assaults of the enemy, and the
Master was at length enabled to extricate his troops
from the defile.
In the mean time, Don Alonzo de Aguilar and his
companions, in their eager advance, had likewise got
entangled in deep glens, and the dry beds of torrents,
where they had been severely galled by the insulting
attacks of a handful of Moorish peasants, posted on
the impending precipices. The proud spirit of De
Aguilar was incensed at having the game of war thus
turned upon him, and his gallant forces domineered
over by mountain boors, whom he had thought to
drive, like their own cattle, to Antiquera. Hearing,
however, that his friend the marques of Cadiz, and
the Master of Santiago, were engaged with the
enemy, he disregarded his own danger, and, calling
together his troops, returned to assist them, or rather
to partake their perils. Being once more assembled
together, the cavaliers held a hasty council, amidst
the hurling of stones and the whistling of arrows;
and their resolves were quickened, by the sight, from
time to time, of some gallant companion in arms laid
low. They determined that there was no spoil in
this part of the country, to repay for the
extraordinary
peril; and that it was better to abandon the
herds they had already taken, which only
embarrassed
their march, and to retreat with all speed to
less dangerous ground.
The adalides, or guides, were ordered to lead the
way out of this place of carnage. These, thinking
to conduct them by the most secure route, led them
by a steep and rocky pass, difficult for the
foot-soldiers
,
but almost impracticable to the cavalry. It
was overhung with precipices, from whence showers
of stones and arrows were poured upon them,
accompanied
by savage yells, which appalled the
stoutest
heart. In some places, they could pass but one
at a time, and were often transpierced, horse and
rider, by the Moorish darts, impeding the progress
of their comrades by their dying struggles. The
surrounding precipices were lit up by a thousand
alarm-fires; every crag and cliff had its flame, by
the light of which they beheld their foes, bounding
from rock to rock, and looking more like fiends than
mortal men.
Either through terror and confusion, or through
I 2
real ignorance of the country, their guides, instead
of conducting them out of the mountains, led them
deeper into their fatal recesses. The morning dawned
upon them in a narrow rambla, its bottom formed of
broken rocks, where once had raved along the
mountain
torrent; while above, there beetled great arid
cliffs, over the brows of which they beheld the
turbaned
heads of their fierce and exulting foes. What
a different appearance did the unfortunate cavaliers
present, from that of the gallant band that marched
so vauntingly out of Antiquera! Covered with dust,
and blood, and wounds, and haggard with fatigue and
horror, they looked like victims rather than like
warriors
.
Many of their banners were lost, and not a
trumpet was heard to rally up their sinking spirits.
The men turned with imploring eyes to their
commanders
;
while the hearts of the cavaliers were
ready to burst with rage and grief, at the merciless
havoc made among their faithful followers.
All day, they made ineffectual attempts to
extricate
themselves from the mountains. Columns of
smoke rose from the heights, where, in the preceding
night, had blazed the alarm-fire. The mountaineers
assembled from every direction; they swarmed at
every pass, getting in the advance of the christians,
and garrisoning the cliffs like so many towers and
battlements.
Night closed again upon the christians, when they
were shut up in a narrow valley traversed by a deep
stream, and surrounded by precipices which seemed
to reach the skies, and on which blazed and flared
the alarm-fires. Suddenly a new cry was heard
resounding
along the valley: El Zagal! El Zagal!
echoed from cliff to cliff. What cry is that? said
the Master of Santiago. It is the war-cry of El
Zagal, the Moorish general, said an old Castilian
soldier: he must be coming in person, with the
troops of Malaga.
The worthy Master turned to his knights: Let
us die, said he, making a road with our hearts,
since we cannot with our swords. Let us scale the
mountain, and sell our lives dearly, instead of
staying
here to be tamely butchered.
So saying, he turned his steed against the
mountain
,
and spurred him up its flinty side. Horse and foot
followed his example, eager, if they could not escape,
to have at least a dying blow at the enemy. As they
struggled up the height, a tremendous storm of darts
and stones was showered upon them by the Moors.
Sometimes a fragment of rock came bounding and
thundering down, plowing its way through the
centre
of their host. The foot-soldiers, faint with
weariness
and hunger, or crippled by wounds, held by the
tails and manes of the horses to aid them in their
ascent
;
while the horses, losing their foothold among the
loose stones, or receiving some sudden wound,
tumbled
down the steep declivity, steed, rider, and
soldier
,
rolling from crag to crag, until they were dashed
to pieces in the valley. In this desperate struggle,
the alferez or standard-bearer of the Master, with
his standard, was lost; as were many of his relations
and his dearest friends. At length he succeeded in
attaining the crest of the mountain; but it was only
to be plunged in new difficulties. A wilderness of
rocks and rugged dells lay before him, beset by cruel
foes. Having neither banner nor trumpet by which
to rally his troops, they wandered apart, each intent
upon saving himself from the precipices of the
mountains
,
and the darts of the enemy. When the pious
Master of Santiago beheld the scattered fragments
of his late gallant force, he could not restrain his
grief. Oh God! exclaimed he, great is thine
anger this day against thy servants. Thou hast
converted
the cowardice of these infidels into desperate
valor, and hast made peasants and boors victorious
over armed men of battle.
He would fain have kept with his foot-soldiers,
and, gathering them together, have made head against
the enemy; but those around him entreated him to
think only of his personal safety. To remain was
to perish, without striking a blow; to escape was to
preserve a life that might be devoted to vengeance
on the Moors. The Master reluctantly yielded to
the advice. Oh Lord of hosts! exclaimed he
again, from thy wrath do I fly; not from these
infidels
:
they are but instruments in thy hands, to
chastise us for our sins. So saying, he sent the
guides in the advance, and, putting spurs to his
horse, dashed through a defile of the mountains,
before the Moors could intercept him. The moment
the Master put his horse to speed, his troops
scattered
in all directions. Some endeavored to follow
his traces, but were confounded among the
intricacies
of the mountain. They fled hither and thither,
many perishing among the precipices, others being
slain by the Moors, and others taken prisoners.
The gallant marques of Cadiz, guided by his-trusty
adalid, Luis Amar, had ascended a different part of
the mountain. He was followed by his friend, Don
Alonzo de Aguilar, the adelantado, and the count of
Cifuentes; but, in the darkness and confusion, the
bands of these commanders became separated from
each other. When the marques attained the
summit
,
he looked around for his companions in arms;
but they were no longer following him, and there
was no trumpet to summon them. It was a
consolation
to the marques, however, that his brothers, and
several of his relations, with a number of his
retainers
,
were still with him: he called his brothers by
name, and their replies gave comfort to his heart.
His guide now led the way into another valley,
where he would be less exposed to danger: when
he had reached the bottom of it, the marques paused
to collect his scattered followers, and to give time
for his fellow-commanders to rejoin him. Here he
was suddenly assailed by the troops of El Zagal,
aided by the mountaineers from the cliffs. The
christians, exhausted and terrified, lost all presence
of mind: most of them fled, and were either slain
or taken captive. The marques and his valiant
brothers, with a few tried friends, made a stout
resistance
.
His horse was killed under him; his
brothers, Don Diego and Don Lope, with his two
nephews Don Lorenzo and Don Manuel, were one
14
by one swept from his side, either transfixed with
darts and lances by the soldiers of El Zagal, or
crushed by stones from the heights. The marques
was a veteran warrior, and had been in many a
bloody battle; but never before had death fallen so
thick and close around him. When he saw his
remaining
brother, Don Beltram, struck out of his
saddle
by a fragment of a rock, and his horse running
wildly about without his rider, he gave a cry of
anguish
,
and stood bewildered and aghast. A few
faithful
followers surrounded him, and entreated him to
fly for his life. He would still have remained, to
have shared the fortunes of his friend Don Alonzo
de Aguilar, and his other companions in arms; but
the forces of El Zagal were between him and them,
and death was whistling by on every wind.
Reluctantly
,
therefore, he consented to fly. Another horse
was brought him: his faithful adalid guided him by
one of the steepest paths, which lasted for four
leagues; the enemy still hanging on his traces, and
thinning the scanty ranks of his followers. At length
the marques reached the extremity of the mountain
defiles, and, with a haggard remnant of his men,
escaped
by dint of hoof to Antiquera.
The count of Cifuentes, with a few of his
retainers
,
in attempting to follow the marques of Cadiz,
wandered into a narrow pass, where they were
completely
surrounded by the band of El Zagal.
Finding
all attempts at escape impossible, and resistance
vain, the worthy count surrendered himself prisoner,
as did also his brother Don Pedro de Silva, and the
few of his retainers who survived.
The dawn of day found Don Alonzo de Aguilar,
with a handful of his followers, still among the
mountains. They had attempted to follow the
marques
of Cadiz, but had been obliged to pause and
defend themselves against the thickening forces of
the enemy. They at length traversed the mountain,
and reached the same valley where the marques had
made his last disastrous stand. Wearied and
perplexed
,
they sheltered themselves in a natural grotto,
under an overhanging rock, which kept off the darts
of the enemy; while a bubbling fountain gave them
the means of slaking their raging thirst, and
refreshing
their exhausted steeds. As day broke, the scene
of slaughter unfolded its horrors. There lay the
noble brothers and nephews of the gallant marques,
transfixed with darts, or gashed and bruised with
unseemly
wounds; while many other gallant cavaliers
lay stretched out dead and dying around, some of
them partly stripped and plundered by the Moors.
De Aguilar was a pious knight, but his piety was not
humble and resigned, like that of the worthy Master
of Santiago. He imprecated holy curses upon the
infidels, for having thus laid low the flower of
christian
chivalry; and he vowed in his heart bitter
vengeance upon the surrounding country.
By degrees, the little force of De Aguilar was
augmented by numbers of fugitives, who issued from
caves and chasms, where they had taken refuge in the
night. A little band of mounted knights was gradually
formed; and the Moors having abandoned the heights
to collect the spoils of the slain, this gallant but
forlorn
squadron was enabled to retreat to Antiquera.
This disastrous affair lasted from Thursday
evening
,
throughout Friday, the twenty-first of March,
the festival of St. Benedict. It is still recorded in
Spanish calendars, as the defeat of the mountains of
Malaga; and the spot where the greatest slaughter
took place, is pointed out to the present day, and is
called
la Cuesta de la Matanza
, or The Hill of the
Massacre. The principal leaders who survived,
returned
to Antiquera. Many of the knights took
refuge in Alhama, and other towns: many wandered
about the mountains for eight days, living on roots
and herbs, hiding themselves during the day, and
sallying forth at night. So enfeebled and
disheartened
were they, that they offered no resistance if
attacked
.
Three or four soldiers would surrender to
a Moorish peasant; and even the women of Malaga
sallied forth and made prisoners. Some were thrown
into the dungeons of frontier towns, others led
captive
to Granada; but by far the greater number were
conducted to Malaga, the city they had threatened to
attack. Two hundred and fifty principal cavaliers,
alcaydes, commanders, and hidalgos, of generous
blood, were confined in the Alcazaba, or citadel of
Malaga, to await their ransom; and five hundred and
seventy of the common soldiery were crowded in an
enclosure or court-yard of the Alcazaba, to be sold
as slaves.
[23]
[23]
Cura de los Palacios.
Great spoils were collected of splendid armor and
weapons taken from the slain, or thrown away by the
cavaliers in their flight; and many horses,
magnificently
caparisoned, together with numerous standards
all which were paraded in triumph into the
Moorish
towns.
The merchants also, who had come with the army,
intending to traffic in the spoils of the Moors, were
themselves made objects of traffic. Several of them
were driven like cattle, before the Moorish viragos,
to the market of Malaga; and in spite of all their
adroitness in trade, and their attempts to buy
themselves
off at a cheap ransom, they were unable to
purchase their freedom without such draughts upon
their money-bags at home, as drained them to the
very bottom.
Vol. I. K
CHAPTER XIII.
Effects of the disasters among the mountains of Malaga.
The
people of Antiquera had scarcely
recovered
from the tumult of excitement and admiration,
caused by the departure of the gallant band of
cavaliers
upon their foray, when they beheld the
scattered
wrecks flying for refuge to their walls. Day
after day, and hour after hour, brought some
wretched
fugitive, in whose battered plight, and haggard,
wobegone demeanor, it was almost impossible to
recognise the warrior whom they had lately seen to
issue so gaily and gloriously from their gates.
The arrival of the marques of Cadiz, almost alone,
covered with dust and blood, his armor shattered
and defaced, his countenance the picture of despair,
filled every heart with sorrow, for he was greatly
beloved by the people. The multitude asked where
was the band of brothers which had rallied round
him as he went forth to the field; and when they
heard that they had, one by one, been slaughtered at
his side, they hushed their voices, or spake to each
other only in whispers as he passed, gazing at him in
silent sympathy. No one attempted to console him
in so great an affliction, nor did the good marques
speak ever a word, but, shutting himself up, brooded
in lonely anguish over his misfortune. It was only
the arrival of Don Alonzo de Aguilar that gave him
a gleam of consolation, for, amidst the shafts of death
that had fallen so thickly among his family, he
rejoiced
to find that his chosen friend and brother in
arms had escaped uninjured.
For several days every eye was turned, in an agony
of suspense, towards the Moorish border, anxiously
looking, in every fugitive from the mountains, for the
lineaments of some friend or relation, whose fate was
yet a mystery. At length every hope and doubt
subsided
into certainty; the whole extent of this great
calamity was known, spreading grief and
consternation
throughout the land, and laying desolate the
pride and hopes of palaces. It was a sorrow that
visited the marble hall and silken pillow. Stately
dames mourned over the loss of their sons, the joy
and glory of their age; and many a fair cheek was
blanched with wo, that had lately mantled with secret
admiration. All Andalusia, says a historian of the
time, was overwhelmed by a great affliction; there
was no drying of the eyes which wept in her.
[24]
[24]
Cura de los Palacios.
Fear and trembling reigned, for a time, along the
frontier. Their spear seemed broken, their buckler
cleft in twain: every border town dreaded an attack,
and the mother caught her infant to her bosom when
the watch-dog howled in the night, fancying it the
war-cry of the Moor. All, for a time, seemed lost;
and despondency even found its way to the royal
breasts of Ferdinand and Isabella, amidst the
splendors
of their court.
Great, on the other hand, was the joy of the Moors,
when they saw whole legions of christian warriors
brought captive into their towns, by rude mountain
peasantry. They thought it the work of Allah in
favor of the faithful. But when they recognised,
among the captives thus dejected and broken down,
some of the proudest of christian chivalry; when
they saw several of the banners and devices of the
noblest houses of Spain, which they had been
accustomed
to behold in the foremost of the battle, now
trailed ignominiously through their streets; when, in
short, they witnessed the arrival of the count of
Cifuentes
,
the royal standard-bearer of Spain, with his
gallant brother Don Pedro de Silva, brought
prisoners
into the gates of Granada, there were no bounds
to their exultation. They thought that the days of
their ancient glory were about to return, and that
they were to renew their career of triumph over the
unbelievers.
The christian historians of the time are sorely
perplexed
to account for this misfortune; and why so
many christian knights, fighting in the cause of the
holy faith, should thus miraculously, as it were, be
given captive to a handful of infidel boors; for we
are assured, that all this rout and destruction was
effected by five hundred foot and fifty horse, and
those mere mountaineers, without science or
discipline
.
[25]
[25]
Cura de los Palacios.
It was intended, observes one
historiographer
,
as a lesson to their confidence and vain-glory;
overrating their own prowess, and thinking that so
chosen a band of chivalry had but to appear in the
land of the enemy, and conquer. It was to teach
them that the race is not to the swift, nor the battle
to the strong, but that God alone giveth the victory.
The worthy father Fray Antonio Agapida,
however
,
asserts it to be a punishment for the avarice of
the Spanish warriors. They did not enter the
kingdom
of the infidels with the pure spirit of christian
knights, zealous only for the glory of the faith, but
rather as greedy men of traffic, to enrich themselves
by vending the spoils of the infidels. Instead of
preparing
themselves by confession and communion, and
executing their testaments, and making donations and
bequests to churches and convents, they thought only
of arranging bargains and sales of their anticipated
booty. Instead of taking with them holy monks to
aid them with their prayers, they were followed by
a train of trading men, to keep alive their worldly
and sordid ideas, and to turn what ought to be holy
triumphs into scenes of brawling traffic. Such is
the opinion of the excellent Agapida, in which he is
joined by that most worthy and upright of
chroniclers
,
the curate of Los Palacios. Agapida
comforts
himself, however, with the reflection, that this
visitation was meant in mercy, to try the Castilian
heart, and to extract, from its present humiliation,
the elements of future success, as gold is extracted
from amidst the impurities of earth; and in this
reflection
he is supported by the venerable historian
Pedro Abarca, of the society of Jesuits.
[26]
[26]
Abarca. Annales de Aragon, Rey 30. cap. 2.  7.
K 2 15
CHAPTER XIV.
How King Boabdil el Chico marched over the border.
The
defeat of the christian cavaliers among the
mountains of Malaga, and the successful inroad of
Muley Aben Hassan into the lands of Medina Sidonia,
had produced a favorable effect on the fortunes of
the old monarch. The inconstant populace began to
shout forth his name in the streets, and to sneer at
the inactivity of his son Boabdil el Chico. The latter,
though in the flower of his age, and distinguished for
vigor and dexterity in jousts and tournaments, had
never yet fleshed his weapon in the field of battle;
and it was murmured that he preferred the silken
repose
of the cool halls of the Alhambra, to the fatigue
and danger of the foray, and the hard encampments
of the mountains.
The popularity of these rival kings depended upon
their success against the christians, and Boabdil el
Chico found it necessary to strike some signal blow
to counterbalance the late triumph of his father. He
was further incited by the fierce old Moor, his
father-in-law
,
Ali Atar, alcayde of Loxa, with whom the
coals of wrath against the christians still burned
among the ashes of age, and had lately been blown
into a flame by the attack made by Ferdinand on the
city under his command.
Ali Atar informed Boabdil that the late
discomfiture
of the christian knights had stripped Andalusia
of the prime of her chivalry, and broken the spirit
of the country. All the frontier of Cordova and
Ecija now lay open to inroad; but he especially
pointed out the city of Lucena as an object of attack,
being feebly garrisoned, and lying in a country rich
in pasturage, abounding in cattle and grain, in oil and
wine. The fiery old Moor spoke from thorough
information
;
for he had made many an incursion into
these parts, and his very name was a terror
throughout
the country. It had become a by-word in the
garrison of Loxa to call Lucena the garden of Ali
Atar, for he was accustomed to forage its fertile
territories
for all his supplies.
Boabdil el Chico listened to the persuasions of this
veteran of the borders. He assembled a force of
nine thousand foot and seven hundred horse, most
of them his own adherents, but many the partisans
of his father; for both factions, however they might
fight among themselves, were ready to unite in any
expedition against the christians. Many of the most
illustrious and valiant of the Moorish nobility
assembled
around his standard, magnificently arrayed in
sumptuous armor and rich embroidery, as though
they were going to a festival or a tilt of canes, rather
than an enterprise of iron war. Boabdil's mother,
the sultana Ayxa la Horra, armed him for the field,
and gave him her benediction as she girded his
scimitar
to his side. His favorite wife Morayma wept, as
she thought of the evils that might befall him. Why
dost thou weep, daughter of Ali Atar? said the
high-minded
Ayxa: these tears become not the daughter
of a warrior, nor the wife of a king. Believe me,
there lurks more danger for a monarch within the
strong walls of a palace, than within the frail curtains
of a tent. It is by perils in the field, that thy husband
must purchase security on his throne.
But Morayma still hung upon his neck, with tears
and sad forebodings; and when he departed from the
Alhambra, she betook herself to her mirador, which
looks out over the vega. From thence she watched
the army, as it went, in shining order, along the road
which leads to Loxa; and every burst of warlike
melody that came swelling on the breeze, was
answered
by a gush of sorrow.
As the royal cavalcade issued from the palace and
descended through the streets of Granada, the
populace
greeted their youthful sovereign with shouts,
and anticipated success that should wither the laurels
of his father. In passing through the gate of Elvira,
however, the king accidentally broke his lance against
the arch. At this, certain of his nobles turned pale,
and entreated him to turn back, for they regarded it
as an evil omen. Boabdil scoffed at their fears, for
ne considered them mere idle fancies; or rather,
(says Fray Antonio Agapida,) he was an incredulous
pagan, puffed up with confidence and vain-glory. He
refused to take another spear, but drew forth his
scimitar, and led the way (adds Agapida) in an
arrogant
and haughty style, as though he would set both
heaven and earth at defiance. Another evil omen
was sent, to deter him from his enterprise: arriving
at the rambla, or dry ravine of Beyro, which is
scarcely a bow-shot from the city, a fox ran through
the whole army, and close by the person of the king;
and, though a thousand bolts were discharged at it,
escaped uninjured to the mountains. The principal
courtiers about Boabdil now reiterated their
remonstrances
against proceeding; for they considered
these occurrences as mysterious portents of disasters
to their army: the king, however, was not to be
dismayed
,
but continued to march forward.
[27]
[27]
Marmol. Rebel. de los Moros, lib. 1. c. xii. fol. 14.
At Loxa, the royal army was reinforced by old
Ali Atar, with the chosen horsemen of his garrison,
and many of the bravest warriors of the border
towns. The people of Loxa shouted with
exultation
,
when they beheld Ali Atar, armed at all points,
and once more mounted on his Barbary steed, which
had often borne him over the borders. The veteran
warrior, with nearly a century of years upon his
head, had all the fire and animation of youth, at the
prospect of a foray, and careered from rank to rank
with the velocity of an Arab of the desert. The
populace watched the army, as it paraded over the
bridge, and wound into the passes of the mountains;
and still their eyes were fixed upon the pennon of
Ali Atar, as if it bore with it an assurance of victory.
The Moorish army entered the christian frontier
by forced marches, hastily ravaging the country,
driving off the flocks and herds, and making captives
of the inhabitants. They pressed on furiously, and
made the latter part of their march in the night, that
they might elude observation, and come upon
Lucena
by surprise. Boabdil was inexperienced in the
art of war, but he had a veteran counsellor in his old
father-in-law; for Ali Atar knew every secret of the
country, and, as he prowled through it, his eye ranged
over the land, uniting, in its glare, the craft of the
fox with the sanguinary ferocity of the wolf. He
had flattered himself that their march had been so
rapid as to outstrip intelligence, and that Lucena
would be an easy capture; when suddenly he beheld
alarm-fires blazing upon the mountains. We are
discovered, said he to Boabdil el Chico; the
country will be up in arms; we have nothing left
but to strike boldly for Lucena; it is but slightly
garrisoned
,
and we may carry it by assault before it can
receive assistance. The king approved of his
counsel
,
and they marched rapidly for the gate of Lucena.
CHAPTER XV.
How the Count de Cabra sallied forth from his castle, in
quest of King Boabdil.
Don
Diego de Cordova, count of Cabra, was in
the castle of Vaena, which, with the town of the
same name, is situated on a lofty sun-burnt hill on
the frontier of the kingdom of Cordova, and but a
few leagues from Lucena. The range of mountains
of Horquera lie between them. The castle of Vaena
was strong, and well furnished with arms, and the
count had a numerous band of vassals and retainers;
for it behoved the noblemen of the frontiers, in those
times, to be well prepared with man and horse, with
lance and buckler, to resist the sudden incursions of
the Moors. The count of Cabra was a hardy and
experienced warrior, shrewd in council, prompt in
action, rapid and fearless in the field. He was one
of the bravest cavaliers for an inroad, and had been
quickened and sharpened, in thought and action, by
living on the borders.
On the night of the 20th of April, 1483, the count
was about to retire to rest, when the watchman from
the turret brought him word that there were
alarm-fires
on the mountains of Horquera, and that they
were made on the signal-tower overhanging the defile
through which the road passes to Cabra and Lucena.
The count ascended the battlement, and beheld
five lights blazing on the tower,a sign that there
was a Moorish army attacking some place on the
frontier. The count instantly ordered the alarm-bells
to be sounded, and dispatched couriers to rouse the
commanders of the neighboring towns. He ordered
all his retainers to prepare for action, and sent a
trumpet through the town, summoning the men to
assemble at the castle-gate at daybreak, armed and
equipped for the field.
Throughout the remainder of the night, the castle
resounded with the din of preparation. Every house
in the town was in equal bustle; for in these frontier
towns, every house had its warrior, and the lance
and buckler were ever hanging against the wall,
ready to be snatched down for instant service.
Nothing
was heard but the din of armorers, the shoeing
of studs, and furbishing up of weapons; and, all
night long, the alarm-fires kept blazing on the
mountains
.
When the morning dawned, the count of Cabra
sallied forth, at the head of two hundred and fifty
cavaliers, of the best families of Vaena, all well
appointed
,
exercised in arms, and experienced in the
warfare of the borders. There were, besides, twelve
hundred foot-soldiers, all brave and well seasoned
men of the same town. The count ordered them to
hasten forward, whoever could make most speed,
taking the road to Cabra, which was three leagues
distant. That they might not loiter on the road, he
allowed none of them to break their fast until they
arrived at that place. The provident count
dispatched
couriers in advance, and the little army, on
reaching
Cabra, found tables spread with food and
refreshments
,
at the gates of the town. Here they were
joined by Don Alonzo de Cordova, Senior of
Zuheros
.
Having made a hearty repast, they were on the
point of resuming their march, when the count
discovered
,
that, in the hurry of his departure from
home, he had forgotten to bring the standard of
Vaena, which for upwards of eighty years had always
been borne to battle by his family. It was now noon,
and there was not time to return: he took, therefore,
the standard of Cabra, the device of which is a goat,
and which had not been seen in the wars for the
last half century. When about to depart, a courier
came galloping at full speed, bringing missives to the
count from his nephew, Don Diego Hernandez de
Cordova, Senior of Lucena and alcayde de los
Donzeles
,
entreating him to hasten to his aid, as his town
was beset by the Moorish king Boabdil el Chico,
with a powerful army, who were actually setting fire
to the gates.
The count put his little army instantly in
movement
for Lucena, which is only one league from
Cabra; he was fired with the idea of having the
Moorish king in person to contend with. By the
time he reached Lucena, the Moors had desisted
from the attack, and were ravaging the surrounding
country. He entered the town with a few of his
cavaliers, and was received with joy by his nephew,
whose whole force consisted but of eighty horse and
Vol. I. L 16
three hundred foot. Don Diego Hernandez de
Cordova
was a young man, yet he was a prudent,
careful
,
and capable officer. Having learnt, the evening
before, that the Moors had passed the frontiers, he
had gathered within his walls all the women and
children from the environs; had armed the men, sent
couriers in all directions for succor, and had lighted
alarm-fires on the mountains.
Boabdil had arrived with his army at daybreak,
and had sent in a message threatening to put the
garrison
to the sword, if the place were not instantly
surrendered. The messenger was a Moor of
Granada
,
named Hamet, whom Don Diego had formerly
known: he contrived to amuse him with negotiation,
to gain time for succor to arrive. The fierce old
Ali Atar, losing all patience, had made an assault
upon the town, and stormed like a fury at the gate;
but had been repulsed. Another and more serious
attack was expected, in the course of the night.
When the count de Cabra had heard this account
of the situation of affairs, he turned to his nephew
with his usual alacrity of manner, and proposed that
they should immediately sally forth in quest of the
enemy. The prudent Don Diego remonstrated at
the rashness of attacking so great a force with a mere
handful of men. Nephew, said the count, I
came from Vaena with a determination to fight this
Moorish king, and I will not be disappointed.
At any rate, replied Don Diego, let us wait
but two hours, and we shall have reinforcements
which have been promised me from Rambla,
Santaella
,
Montilla, and other places in the neighborhood.
If we await these, said the hardy count, the
Moors will be off, and all our trouble will have been
in vain. You may await them, if you please; I am
resolved on fighting.
The count paused for no reply; but, in his prompt
and rapid manner, sallied forth to his men. The
young alcayde de los Donzeles, though more prudent
than his ardent uncle, was equally brave; he
determined
to stand by him in his rash enterprise, and,
summoning his little force, marched forth to join the
count, who was already on the move. They then
proceeded together in quest of the enemy.
The Moorish army had ceased ravaging the
country
,
and were not to be seen,the neighborhood
being hilly, and broken with deep ravines. The
count dispatched six scouts on horseback to
reconnoitre
,
ordering them to return with all speed when
they should have discovered the enemy, and by no
means to engage in skirmishing with stragglers. The
scouts, ascending a high hill, beheld the Moorish
army in a valley behind it, the cavalry ranged in five
battalions keeping guard, while the foot-soldiers were
seated on the grass making a repast. They returned
immediately, with the intelligence.
The count now ordered the troops to march in the
direction of the enemy. He and his nephew
ascended
the hill, and saw that the five battalions of
Moorish cavalry had been formed into two, one of
about nine hundred lances, the other of about six
hundred. The whole force seemed prepared to
march for the frontier. The foot-soldiers were
already
under way, with many prisoners, and a great
train of mules and beasts of burden, laden with booty.
At a distance was Boabdil el Chico: they could not
distinguish his person, but they knew him by his
superb
white charger, magnificently caparisoned, and
by his being surrounded by a numerous guard,
sumptuously
armed and attired. Old Ali Atar was
careering
about the valley with his usual impatience,
hurrying
the march of the loitering troops.
The eyes of the count de Cabra glistened with
eager joy, as he beheld the royal prize within his
reach. The immense disparity of their forces never
entered into his mind. By Santiago! said he to
his nephew, as they hastened down the hill, had
we waited for more forces, the Moorish king and his
army would have escaped us!
The count now harangued his men, to inspirit them
to this hazardous encounter. He told them not to
be dismayed at the number of the Moors, for God
often permitted the few to conquer the many; and
he had great confidence, that, through the divine aid,
they were that day to achieve a signal victory, which
should win them both riches and renown. He
commanded
that no man should hurl his lance at the
enemy, but should keep it in his hands, and strike as
many blows with it as he could. He warned them,
also, never to shout except when the Moors did;
for, when both armies shouted together, there was
no perceiving which made the most noise and was
the strongest. He desired his uncle Lope de
Mendoza
,
and Diego Cabrera, alcayde of Menica, to
alight and enter on foot in the battalion of infantry,
to animate them to the combat. He appointed also
the alcayde of Vaena and Diego de Clavijo, a
cavalier
of his household, to remain in the rear, and not
to permit any one to lag behind, either to despoil
the dead, or for any other purpose.
Such were the orders given by this most adroit,
active, and intrepid cavalier, to his little army,
supplying
,
by admirable sagacity and subtle management,
the want of a more numerous force. His orders
being given, and all arrangements made, he threw
aside his lance, drew his sword, and commanded his
standard to be advanced against the enemy.
L 2
CHAPTER XIV.
The Battle of Lucena.
The
Moorish king had descried the Spanish forces
at a distance, although a slight fog prevented his
seeing them distinctly, and ascertaining their
numbers
.
His old father-in-law, Ali Atar, was by his
side, who, being a veteran marauder, was well
acquainted
with all the standards and armorial bearings
of the frontiers. When the king beheld the ancient
and long-disused banner of Cabra emerging from the
mist, he turned to Ali Atar, and demanded whose
ensign it was. The old borderer was for once at a
loss, for the banner had not been displayed in battle
in his time. Sire, replied he, after a pause,
I have been considering that standard, but do not
know it. It appears to be a dog, which device is
borne by the towns of Baeza and Ubeda. If it be
so, all Andalusia is in movement against you; for it
is not probable that any single commander or
community
would venture to attack you. I would advise
you, therefore, to retire.
The count de Cabra, in winding down the hill
towards the Moors, found himself on much lower
ground than the enemy: he ordered in all haste that
his standard should be taken back, so as to gain the
vantage ground. The Moors, mistaking this for a
retreat, rushed impetuously towards the christians.
The latter, having gained the height proposed,
charged
down upon them at the same moment, with the
battle-cry of Santiago! and, dealing the first blows,
laid many of the Moorish cavaliers in the dust.
The Moors, thus checked in their tumultuous
assault
,
were thrown into confusion, and began to give
way, the christians following hard upon them.
Boabdil
el Chico endeavored to rally them. Hold!
hold! for shame! cried he; let us not fly, at least
until we know our enemy. The Moorish chivalry
were stung by this reproof, and turned to make
front, with the valor of men who feel that they are
fighting under their monarch's eye.
At this moment, Lorenzo de Porres, alcayde of
Luque, arrived with fifty horse and one hundred foot,
sounding an Italian trumpet from among a copse of
oak trees, which concealed his force. The quick
ear of old Ali Atar caught the note. That is an
Italian trumpet, said he to the king; the whole
world seems in arms against your majesty!
The trumpet of Lorenzo de Porres was answered
by that of the count de Cabra, in another direction,
and it seemed to the Moors as if they were between
two armies. Don Lorenzo, sallying from among
the oaks, now charged upon the enemy: the latter
did not wait to ascertain the force of this new foe;
the confusion, the variety of alarums, the attacks
from opposite quarters, the obscurity of the fog, all
conspired to deceive them as to the number of their
adversaries. Broken and dismayed, they retreated
fighting; and nothing but the presence and
remonstrance
of the king prevented their retreat from
becoming
a headlong flight.
This skirmishing retreat lasted for about three
leagues. Many were the acts of individual prowess
between christian and Moorish knights, and the way
was strewed with the flower of the king's guards
and of his royal household. At length they came to
the rivulet of Mingonzales, the verdant banks of
which were covered with willows and tamarisks.
It was swoln by recent rain, and was now a deep
and turbid torrent.
Here the king made a courageous stand with a small
body of cavalry, while his baggage crossed the stream.
None but the choicest and most loyal of his guards
stood by their monarch, in this hour of extremity.
The foot-soldiers took to flight, the moment they
passed the ford; many of the horsemen, partaking
of the general panic, gave reins to their steeds and
scoured for the frontier. The little host of devoted
cavaliers now serried their forces in front of their
monarch, to protect his retreat. They fought hand
to hand with the christian warriors, disdaining to
yield or to ask for quarter. The ground was covered
with the dead and dying. The king, having retreated
along the river banks, and gained some distance from
the scene of combat, looked back, and saw the loyal
band at length give way. They crossed the ford,
followed pell-mell by the enemy, and several of them
were struck down into the stream.
The king now dismounted from his white charger,
whose color and rich caparison made him too con
spicuous, and endeavored to conceal himself among
the thickets which fringed the river. A soldier of
Lucena, named Martin Hurtado, discovered him, and
attacked him with a pike. The king defended
himself
with scimitar and target, until another soldier
assailed him, and he saw a third approaching.
Perceiving
that further resistance would be vain, he
drew back and called upon them to desist, offering
them a noble ransom. One of the soldiers rushed
forward to seize him, but the king struck him to the
earth with a blow of his scimitar.
Don Diego Fernandez de Cordova coming up at
this moment, the men said to him, Seor, here is a
Moor that we have taken, who seems to be a man
of rank, and offers a large ransom.
Slaves! exclaimed king Boabdil, you have not
taken me. I surrender to this cavalier.
Don Diego received him with knightly courtesy.
He perceived him to be a person of high rank; but
the king concealed his quality, and gave himself out
as the son of Aben Aleyzar, a nobleman of the royal
household.
[28]
[28]
Garibay, lib. 40. c. 31.
Don Diego gave him in charge of five
soldiers, to conduct him to the castle of Lucena;
then, putting spurs to his horse, he hastened to rejoin
the count de Cabra, who was in hot pursuit of the
enemy. He overtook him at a stream called
Rianaul
;
and they continued to press on the skirts of
the flying army, during the remainder of the day.
The pursuit was almost as hazardous as the battle;
17
for, had the enemy at any time recovered from their
panic, they might, by a sudden reaction, have
overwhelmed
the small force of their pursuers. To guard
against this peril, the wary count kept his battalion
always in close order, and had a body of a hundred
chosen lancers in the advance. The Moors kept up
a Parthian retreat; several times, they turned to
make battle; but, seeing this solid body of steeled
warriors pressing upon them, they again took to
flight.
The main retreat of the army was along the valley
watered by the Xenel, and opening through the
mountains of Algaringo to the city of Loxa. The
alarm-fires of the preceding night had roused the
country; every man snatched sword and buckler
from the wall, and the towns and villages poured
forth their warriors to harass the retreating foe. Ali
Atar kept the main force of the army together, and
turned fiercely from time to time upon his pursuers;
he was like a wolf, hunted through the country he
had often made desolate by his maraudings.
The alarm of this invasion had reached the city
of Antiquera, where were several of the cavaliers
who had escaped from the carnage in the mountains
of Malaga. Their proud minds were festering with
their late disgrace, and their only prayer was for
vengeance on the infidels. No sooner did they hear
of the Moor being over the border, than they
were armed and mounted for action. Don Alonzo
de Aguilar led them forth;a small body of but
forty horsemen, but all cavaliers of prowess, and
thirsting for revenge. They came upon the foe on
the banks of the Xenel, where it winds through the
valleys of Cordova. The river, swelled by the late
rains, was deep and turbulent, and only fordable at
certain places. The main body of the army was
gathered in confusion on the banks, endeavoring to
ford the stream, protected by the cavalry of Ali Atar.
No sooner did the little band of Alonzo de Aguilar
come in sight of the Moors, than fury flashed from
their eyes. Remember the mountains of Malaga!
they cried to each other, as they rushed to combat.
Their charge was desperate, but was gallantly
resisted
.
A scrambling and bloody fight ensued, hand
to hand and sword to sword, sometimes on land,
sometimes in the water. Many were lanced on the
banks; others, throwing themselves into the river,
sunk with the weight of their armor, and were
drowned; some, grappling together, fell from their
horses, but continued their struggle in the waves,
and helm and turban rolled together down the
stream. The Moors were far greater in number, and
among them were many warriors of rank; but they
were disheartened by defeat, while the christians
were excited even to desperation.
Ali Atar alone preserved all his fire and energy,
amid his reverses. He had been enraged at the
defeat
of the army, the loss of the king, and the
ignominious
flight he had been obliged to make through
a country which had so often been the scene of his
exploits: but to be thus impeded in his flight, and
barassed and insulted by a mere handful of warriors,
roused the violent passions of the old Moor to
perfect
frenzy. He had marked Don Alonzo de Aguilar
dealing his blows (says Agapida,) with the pious
vehemence of a righteous knight, who knows that in
every wound inflicted upon the infidels, he is doing
God service. Ali Atar spurred his steed along the
bank of the river, to come upon Don Alonzo by
surprise. The back of the warrior was towards him;
and, collecting all his force, the Moor hurled his
lance to transfix him on the spot. The lance was
not thrown with the usual accuracy of Ali Atar: it
tore away a part of the cuirass of Don Alonzo, but
failed to inflict a wound. The Moor rushed upon
Don Alonzo with his scimitar; but the latter was on
the alert, and parried his blow. They fought
desperately
upon the borders of the river, alternately
pressing
each other into the stream, and fighting their way
again up the bank. Ali Atar was repeatedly
wounded
;
and Don Alonzo, having pity on his age, would
have spared his life: he called upon him to surrender.
Never, cried Ali Atar, to a christian dog! The
words were scarce out of his mouth, when the sword
of Don Alonzo clove his turbaned head, and sank
deep into the brain. He fell dead, without a groan;
his body rolled into the Xenel, nor was it ever found
and recognised.
[29]
[29]
Cura de los Palacios.
Thus fell Ali Atar, who had long
been the terror of Andalusia. As he had hated and
warred upon the christians all his life, so he died in
the very act of bitter hostility.
The fall of Ali Atar put an end to the transient
stand of the cavalry. Horse and foot mingled
together
,
in the desperate struggle across the Xenel;
and many were trampled down, and perished
beneath
the waves. Don Alonzo and his band
continued
to harass them until they crossed the frontier;
and every blow, struck home to the Moors, seemed
to lighten the load of humiliation and sorrow which
had weighed heavy on their hearts.
In this disastrous rout, the Moors lost upwards of
five thousand killed and made prisoners; many of
whom were of the most noble lineages of Granada:
numbers fled to rocks and mountains, where they
were subsequently taken.
This battle was called, by some, the battle of
Lucena; by others, the battle of the Moorish king,
because of the capture of Boabdil. Twenty-two
banners fell into the hands of the christians, and
were carried to Vaena, and hung up in the church;
where (says a historian of after times,) they remain
to this day. Once a year, on the day of St. George,
they are borne about in procession, by the
inhabitants
,
who at the same time give thanks to God for
this signal victory granted to their forefathers.
Great was the triumph of the count de Cabra,
when, on returning from the pursuit of the enemy,
he found that the Moorish king had fallen into his
hands. When the unfortunate Boabdil was brought
before him, however, and he beheld him a dejected
captive, whom but shortly before he had seen in
royal splendor surrounded by his army, the generous
Vol. I. M
heart of the count was touched by sympathy. He
said every thing that became a courteous and
christian
knight, to comfort him; observing that the same
mutability of things which had suddenly destroyed
his recent prosperity, might cause his present
misfortunes
as rapidly to pass away; since in this world
nothing is stable, and even sorrow has its allotted
term.
CHAPTER XVII.
Lamentations of the Moors, for the battle of Lucena.
The
sentinels looked out from the watch-towers
of Loxa, along the valley of the Xenel, which passes
through the mountains of Algaringo. They looked
to behold the king returning in triumph, at the head
of his shining host, laden with the spoil of the
unbeliever
.
They looked to behold the standard of their
warlike idol, the fierce Ali Atar, borne by the
chivalry
of Loxa, ever foremost in the wars of the border.
In the evening of the 21st of April, they descried
a single horseman urging his faltering steed along the
banks of the Xenel. As he drew near, they
perceived
,
by the flash of arms, that he was a warrior;
and on nearer approach, by the richness of his armor
and the caparison of his steed, they knew him to be
a warrior of rank.
He reached Loxa, faint and aghast; his Arabian
courser covered with foam, and dust, and blood,
panting and staggering with fatigue, and gashed with
wounds. Having brought his master in safety, he
sunk down and died before the gate of the city. The
soldiers at the gate gathered round the cavalier, as
he stood mute and melancholy by his expiring steed:
they knew him to be the gallant Cidi Caleb, nephew
of the chief alfaqui of the Albaycin of Granada. When
the people of Loxa beheld this noble cavalier, thus
alone, haggard and dejected, their hearts were filled
with fearful forebodings.
Cavalier, said they, how fares it with the king
and army?
He cast his hand mournfully towards the land of
the christians. There they lie! exclaimed he.
The heavens have fallen upon them. All are lost!
all dead!
[30]
[30]
Cura de los Palacios.
Upon this, there was a great cry of consternation
among the people, and loud wailings of women: for
the flower of the youth of Loxa were with the army.
An old Moorish soldier, scarred in many a border
battle, stood leaning on his lance by the gateway.
Where is Ali Atar? demanded he, eagerly. If
he lives, the army cannot be lost.
I saw his turban cleaved by the christian sword,
replied Cidi Caleb. His body is floating in the Xenel.
When the soldier heard these words, he smote his
breast and threw dust upon his head; for he was an
old follower of Ali Atar.
The noble Cidi Caleb gave himself no repose, but,
mounting another steed, hastened to carry the
disastrous
tidings to Granada. As he passed through the
villages and hamlets, he spread sorrow around; for
their chosen men had followed the king to the wars.
When he entered the gates of Granada, and
announced
the loss of the king and army, a voice of
horror went throughout the city. Every one thought
but of his own share in the general calamity, and
crowded round the bearer of ill tidings. One asked
after a father, another after a brother, some after a
lover, and many a mother after her son. His replies
were still of wounds and death. To one he replied,
I saw thy father pierced with a lance, as he
defended
the person of the king. To another, Thy brother
fell wounded under the hoofs of the horses; but there
was no time to aid him, for the christian cavalry
were upon us. To another, I saw the horse of
thy lover, covered with blood and galloping without
his rider. To another, Thy son fought by my side,
on the banks of the Xenel: we were surrounded by
the enemy, and driven into the stream. I heard him
cry upon Allah, in the midst of the waters: when I
reached the other bank, he was no longer by my side.
The noble Cidi Caleb passed on, leaving all
Granada
in lamentation: he urged his steed up the steep
avenue of trees and fountains that leads to the
Alhambra
,
nor stopped until he arrived before the gate
of Justice. Ayxa, the mother of Boabdil, and
Morayma
,
his beloved and tender wife, and daily watched
from the tower of the Gomeres, to behold his
triumphant
return. Who shall describe their affliction,
when they heard the tidings of Cidi Caleb? The
sultana
Ayxa spake not much, but sate as one entranced
in wo. Every now and then, a deep sigh burst forth,
but she raised her eyes to heaven: It is the will of
Allah! said she, and with these words endeavored
to repress the agonies of a mother's sorrow. The
tender Morayma threw herself on the earth, and gave
way to the full turbulence of her feelings, bewailing
M 2 18
her husband and her father. The high-minded Ayxa
rebuked the violence of her grief: Moderate these
transports, my daughter, said she; remember
magnanimity
should be the attribute of princes; it
becomes
not them to give way to clamorous sorrow,
like common and vulgar minds. But Morayma could
only deplore her loss, with the anguish of a tender
woman. She shut herself up in her mirador, and
gazed all day, with streaming eyes, upon the vega.
Every object before her recalled the causes of her
affliction
.
The river Xenel, which ran shining amidst
the groves and gardens, was the same on whose banks
had perished her father, Ali Atar; before her lay the
road to Loxa, by which Boabdil had departed, in
martial state, surrounded by the chivalry of Granada.
Ever and anon, she would burst into an agony of
grief. Alas! my father! she would exclaim; the
river runs smiling before me, that covers thy mangled
remains: who will gather them to an honored tomb,
in the land of the unbeliever? And thou, oh Boabdil,
light of my eyes! joy of my heart! life of my life!
wo the day, and wo the hour, that I saw thee depart
from these walls. The road by which thou hast
departed
is solitary; never will it be gladdened by thy
return! the mountain thou hast traversed lies like a
cloud in the distance, and all beyond it is darkness.
The royal minstrels were summoned to assuage
the sorrows of the queen: they attuned their
instruments
to cheerful strains; but in a little while the
anguish of their hearts prevailed, and turned their
songs to lamentations.
Beautiful Granada! they exclaimed, how is
thy glory faded! The Vivarrambla no longer echoes
to the tramp of steed and sound of trumpet; no longer
is it crowded with thy youthful nobles, eager to
display
their prowess in the tourney and the festive tilt
of reeds. Alas! the flower of thy chivalry lies low
in a foreign land! the soft note of the lute is no longer
heard in thy moonlight streets; the lively castanet is
silent upon thy hills; and the graceful dance of the
Zambra is no more seen beneath thy bowers.
Behold
,
the Alhambra is forlorn and desolate! in vain
do the orange and myrtle breathe their perfumes into
its silken chambers; in vain does the nightingale sing
within its groves; in vain are its marble halls refreshed
by the sound of fountains and the gush of limpid rills.
Alas! the countenance of the king no longer shines
within those halls: the light of the Alhambra is set
for ever!
Thus all Granada, say the Arabian chroniclers,
gave itself up to lamentation: there was nothing but
the voice of wailing, from the palace to the cottage.
All joined to deplore their youthful monarch, cut
down in the freshness and promise of his youth;
many feared that the prediction of the astrologers
was about to be fulfilled, and that the downfall of the
kingdom would follow the death of Boabdil; while
all declared, that had he survived, he was the very
sovereign calculated to restore the realm to its
ancient
prosperity and glory.
CHAPTER XVIII.
How Muley Aben Hassan profited by the misfortunes of
his son Boabdil.
An
unfortunate death atones, with the world, for
a multitude of errors. While the populace thought
their youthful monarch had perished in the field,
nothing could exceed their grief for his loss, and
their adoration of his memory: when, however, they
learnt that he was still alive, and had surrendered
himself captive to the christians, their feelings
underwent
an instant change. They decried his talents
as a commander, his courage as a soldier; they railed
at his expedition, as rash and ill conducted; and they
reviled him for not having dared to die on the field
of battle, rather than surrender to the enemy.
The alfaquis, as usual, mingled with the populace,
and artfully guided their discontents. Behold,
exclaimed they, the prediction is accomplished,
which was pronounced at the birth of Boabdil. He
has been seated on the throne, and the kingdom has
suffered downfall and disgrace by his defeat and
captivity
.
Comfort yourselves, O Moslems! The evil
day has passed by; the fates are satisfied: the sceptre
which has been broken in the feeble hand of Boabdil,
is destined to resume its former power and sway in
the vigorous grasp of Aben Hassan.
The people were struck with the wisdom of these
words: they rejoiced that the baleful prediction,
which had so long hung over them, was at an end;
and declared, that none but Muley Aben Hassan had
the valor and capacity necessary for the protection
of the kingdom, in this time of trouble.
The longer the captivity of Boabdil continued, the
greater grew the popularity of his father. One city
after another renewed allegiance to him; for power
attracts power, and fortune creates fortune. At
length he was enabled to return to Granada, and
establish himself once more in the Alhambra. At
his approach, his repudiated spouse, the sultana
Ayxa, gathered together the family and treasures of
her captive son, and retired, with a handful of the
nobles, into the Albaycin, the rival quarter of the
city, the inhabitants of which still retained feelings
of loyalty to Boabdil. Here she fortified herself, and
held the semblance of a court in the name of her
son. The fierce Muley Aben Hassan would have
willingly carried fire and sword into this factious
quarter of the capital; but he dared not confide in
his new and uncertain popularity. Many of the
nobles detested him for his past cruelty; and a large
portion of the soldiery, beside many of the people of
his own party, respected the virtues of Ayxa la Horra,
and pitied the misfortunes of Boabdil.
Granada therefore presented the singular spectacle
of two sovereignties within the same city. The old
king fortified himself in the lofty towers of the
Alhambra
,
as much against his own subjects as against
the christians; while Ayxa, with the zeal of a
mother's
affection, which waxes warmer and warmer
towards her offspring when in adversity, still
maintained
the standard of Boabdil on the rival fortress
of the Alcazaba, and kept his powerful faction alive
within the walls of the Albaycin.
CHAPTER XIX.
Captivity of Boabdil el Chico.
The
unfortunate Boabdil remained a prisoner,
closely guarded, in the castle of Vaena. From the
towers of his prison, he beheld the town below filled
with armed men; and the lofty hill on which it was
built, girdled by massive walls and ramparts, on
which a vigilant watch was maintained night and
day. The mountains around were studded with
watch-towers, overlooking the lonely roads which
led to Granada, so that a turban could not stir over
the border without the alarm being given, and the
whole country put on the alert. Boabdil saw that
there was no hope of escape from such a fortress,
and that any attempt to rescue him would be equally
in vain. His heart was filled with anxiety, as he
thought on the confusion and ruin which his captivity
must cause in his affairs; while sorrows of a softer
kind overcame his fortitude, as he thought on the
evils it might bring upon his family.
The count de Cabra, though he maintained the
most vigilant guard over his royal prisoner, yet
treated
him with profound deference; he had appointed
the noblest apartments in the castle for his abode,
and sought in every way to cheer him during his
captivity. A few days only had passed away, when
missives arrived from the Castilian sovereigns.
Ferdinand
had been transported with joy at hearing of
the capture of the Moorish monarch, seeing the deep
and politic uses that might be made of such an
event; but the magnanimous spirit of Isabella was
filled with compassion for the unfortunate captive.
Their messages to Boabdil were full of sympathy
and consolation, breathing that high and gentle
courtesy
which dwells in noble minds.
This magnanimity in his foe cheered the dejected
spirit of the captive monarch. Tell my sovereigns,
the king and queen, said he to the messenger, that
I cannot be unhappy, being in the power of such
high and mighty princes, especially since they
partake
so largely of that grace and goodness which
Allah bestows upon the monarchs whom he greatly
loves. Tell them further, that I had long thought of
submitting myself to their sway, to receive the
kingdom
of Granada from their hands, in the same
manner
that my ancestor received it from king John II.,
father to the gracious queen. My greatest sorrow, in
this my captivity, is, that I must appear to do that
from force, which I would fain have done from
inclination
.
In the mean time, Muley Aben Hassan, finding the
faction of his son still formidable in Granada, was
anxious to consolidate his power, by gaining
possession
of the person of Boabdil. For this purpose, he
sent an embassy to the Catholic monarchs, offering
large terms for the ransom, or rather the purchase, of
his son; proposing, among other conditions, to release
the count of Cifuentes and nine other of his most
distinguished captives, and to enter into a treaty of
confederacy with the sovereigns. Neither did the
implacable father make any scruple of testifying his
indifference whether his son were delivered up alive
or dead, so that his person were placed assuredly
within his power.
The humane heart of Isabella revolted at the idea
of giving up the unfortunate prince into the hands of
his most unnatural and inveterate enemy: a
disdainful
refusal was therefore returned to the old monarch,
whose message had been couched in a vaunting
spirit. He was informed that the Castilian
sovereigns
would listen to no proposals of peace from
Muley Aben Hassan, until he should lay down his
arms, and offer them in all humility.
Overtures in a different spirit were made by the
mother of Boabdil, the Sultana Ayxa la Horra, with
the concurrence of the party which still remained
faithful to him. It was thereby proposed, that
Mahomet
Abdalla, otherwise called Boabdil, should hold
his crown as vassal to the Castilian sovereigns,
paying
an annual tribute, and releasing seventy christian
captives annually, for five years: that he should,
moreover, pay a large sum, upon the spot, for his
ransom, and at the same time give freedom to four
hundred christians to be chosen by the king: that he
should also engage to be always ready to render
military
aid, and should come to the Cortes, or
assemblage
of nobles and distinguished vassals of the
crown, whenever summoned. His only son, and the
sons of twelve distinguished Moorish houses, were
to be delivered as hostages.
Vol. I. N 19
King Ferdinand was at Cordova, when he received
this proposition. Queen Isabella was absent at the
time. He was anxious to consult her in so
momentous
an affair; or rather, he was fearful of proceeding
too precipitately, and not drawing from this fortunate
event all the advantage of which it was susceptible.
Without returning any reply, therefore, to the
mission
,
he sent missives to the castle of Vaena, where
Boabdil remained in courteous durance of the brave
count de Cabra, ordering that the captive monarch
should be brought to Cordova.
The count de Cabra set out, with his illustrious
prisoner; but when he arrived at Cordova, king
Ferdinand declined seeing the Moorish monarch.
He was still undetermined what course to pursue,
whether to retain him prisoner, set him at liberty on
ransom, or treat him with politic magnanimity; and
each course would require a different kind of
reception
.
Until this point should be resolved, therefore,
he gave him in charge to Martin de Alarcon, alcayde
of the ancient fortress of Porcuna, with orders to
guard him strictly, but to treat him with the
distinction
and deference due unto a prince. These
commands
were strictly obeyed; and, with the exception
of being restrained in his liberty, the monarch was as
nobly entertained as he could have been in his regal
palace at Granada.
In the mean time, Ferdinand availed himself of
this critical moment, while Granada was distracted
with factions and dissensions, and before he had
concluded
any treaty with Boabdil, to make a puissant
and ostentatious inroad into the very heart of the
kingdom, at the head of his most illustrious nobles.
He sacked and destroyed several towns and castles,
and extended his ravages to the very gates of
Granada
.
Old Muley Aben Hassan did not venture to
oppose him. His city was filled with troops, but he
was uncertain of their affection. He dreaded, that
should he sally forth, the gates of Granada might be
closed against him by the faction of the Albaycin.
The old Moor stood on the lofty tower of the
Alhambra, (says Antonio Agapida,) grinding his
teeth, and foaming like a tiger shut up in his cage,
as he beheld the glittering battalions of the christians
wheeling about the vega, and the standard of the
cross shining forth from among the smoke of infidel
villages and hamlets. The most Catholic king (
continues
Agapida,) would gladly have continued this
righteous ravage, but his munitions began to fail.
Satisfied, therefore, with having laid waste the
country
of the enemy, and insulted old Muley Aben
Hassan
in his very capital, he returned to Cordova
covered
with laurels, and his army laden with spoils; and
now bethought himself of coming to an immediate
decision, in regard to his royal prisoner.
CHAPTER XX.
Of the treatment of Boabdil by the Castilian Sovereigns.
A stately
convention was held by king
Ferdinand
in the ancient city of Cordova, composed of
several of the most reverend prelates and renowned
cavaliers of the kingdom, to determine upon the fate
of the unfortunate Boabdil.
Don Alonzo de Cordena, the worthy Master of
Santiago, was one of the first who gave his counsel.
He was a pious and zealous knight, rigid in his
devotion
to the faith; and his holy zeal had been inflamed
to peculiar vehemence, since his disastrous crusade
among the mountains of Malaga. He inveighed with
ardor against any compromise or compact with the
infidels: the object of this war, he observed, was not
the subjection of the Moors, but their utter expulsion
from the land; so that there might no longer remain
a single stain of Mahometanism throughout christian
Spain. He gave it as his opinion, therefore, that the
captive king ought not to be set at liberty.
Roderigo Ponce de Leon, the valiant marques of
Cadiz, on the contrary, spoke warmly for the release
of Boabdil. He pronounced it a measure of sound
policy, even if done without conditions. It would
tend to keep up the civil war in Granada, which was
as a fire consuming the entrails of the enemy, and
effecting more for the interests of Spain, without
expense, than all the conquests of its arms.
The grand cardinal of Spain, Don Pedro
Gonzalez
de Mendoza, coincided in opinion with the
marques
of Cadiz. Nay, (added that pious prelate and
politic statesman,) it would be sound wisdom to
furnish
the Moor with men and money, and all other
necessaries, to promote the civil war in Granada: by
this means would be produced great benefit to the
service of God, since we are assured by his infallible
word, that a kingdom divided against itself cannot
stand.
[31]
[31]
Salazar. Cronica del Gran Cardinal, p. 188.
Ferdinand weighed these counsels in his mind, but
was slow in coming to a decision; he was religiously
attentive to his own interests, (observes Fray Antonio
Agapida,) knowing himself to be but an instrument
of Providence in this holy war, and that, therefore,
in consulting his own advantage he was promoting
the interests of the faith. The opinion of queen
Isabella relieved him from his perplexity. That
high-minded princess was zealous for the promotion
of the faith, but not for the extermination of the
infidels
.
The Moorish kings had held their thrones as
vassals to her progenitors; she was content at
present
to accord the same privilege, and that the royal
prisoner should be liberated on condition of
becoming
a vassal to the crown. By this means might be
effected the deliverance of many christian captives,
who were languishing in Moorish chains.
King Ferdinand adopted the magnanimous measure
recommended by the queen; but he accompanied it
N 2
with several shrewd conditions; exacting tribute,
military services, and safe passage and maintenance
for christian troops, throughout the places which
should adhere to Boabdil. The captive king readily
submitted to these stipulations, and swore, after the
manner of his faith, to observe them with exactitude.
A truce was arranged for two years, during which
the Castilian sovereigns engaged to maintain him on
his throne, and to assist him in recovering all places
which he had lost during his captivity.
When Boabdil el Chico had solemnly agreed to
this arrangement, in the castle of Porcuna,
preparations
were made to receive him in Cordova in regal
style. Superb steeds richly caparisoned, and
raiment
of brocade, and silk, and the most costly cloths,
with all other articles of sumptuous array, were
furnished
to him and to fifty Moorish cavaliers, who had
come to treat for his ransom, that he might appear
in state befitting the monarch of Granada, and the
most distinguished vassal of the Castilian sovereigns.
Money also was advanced to maintain him in suitable
grandeur, during his residence at the Castilian court,
and his return to his dominions. Finally, it was
ordered
by the sovereigns, that when he came to
Cordova
,
all the nobles and dignitaries of the court
should go forth to receive him.
A question now arose among certain of those
ancient
and experienced men, who grow gray about a
court in the profound study of forms and ceremonials,
with whom a point of punctilio is as a vast political
right, and who contract a sublime and awful idea of
the external dignity of the throne. Certain of these
court sages propounded the momentous question,
whether the Moorish monarch, coming to do
homage
as a vassal, ought not to kneel and kiss the hand
of the king. This was immediately decided in the
affirmative, by a large number of ancient cavaliers,
accustomed (says Antonio Agapida,) to the lofty
punctilio of our most dignified court and
transcendant
sovereigns. The king, therefore, was informed
by those who arranged the ceremonials, that when
the Moorish monarch appeared in his presence, he
was expected to extend his royal hand to receive the
kiss of homage.
I should certainly do so, replied king Ferdinand,
were he at liberty, and in his own kingdom; but I
certainly shall not do so, seeing that he is a prisoner
and in mine.
The courtiers loudly applauded the magnanimity
of this reply; though many condemned it in secret,
as savoring of too much generosity towards an
infidel
;
and the worthy Jesuit, Fray Antonio Agapida,
fully concurs in their opinion.
The Moorish king entered Cordova with his little
train of faithful knights, and escorted by all the
nobility and chivalry of the Castilian court. He was
conducted, with great state and ceremony, to the
royal palace. When he came in presence of
Ferdinand
,
he knelt and offered to kiss his hand, not
merely in homage as his subject, but in gratitude for
his liberty. Ferdinand declined the token of
vassalage
,
and raised him graciously from the earth. An
interpreter began, in the name of Boabdil, to laud
the magnanimity of the Castilian monarch, and to
promise the most implicit submission. Enough,
said king Ferdinand, interrupting the interpreter in
the midst of his harangue: there is no need of
these compliments. I trust in his integrity, that he
will do every thing becoming a good man and a
good king. With these words, he received Boabdil
el Chico into his royal friendship and protection.
CHAPTER XXI.
Return of Boabdil from captivity.
In
the month of August, a noble Moor, of the race
of the Abencerrages, arrived with a splendid retinue
at the city of Cordova, bringing with him the son of
Boabdil el Chico, and other of the noble youth of
Granada, as hostages for the fulfilment of the terms
of ransom. When the Moorish king beheld his son,
his only child, who was to remain in his stead, a sort
of captive in a hostile land, he folded him in his arms
and wept over him. Wo the day that I was born!
exclaimed he, and evil the stars that presided at my
birth! Well was I called El Zogoybi, or the unlucky;
for sorrow is heaped upon me by my father, and
sorrow
do I transmit to my son! The afflicted heart
of Boabdil, however, was soothed by the kindness
of the christian sovereigns, who received the hostage
prince with a tenderness suited to his age, and a
distinction
worthy of his rank. They delivered him in
charge to the worthy alcayde Martin de Alarcon, who
had treated his father with such courtesy during his
confinement in the castle of Porcuna, giving orders,
that, after the departure of the latter, his son should
be entertained with great honor and princely
attention
,
in the same fortress.
On the 2d of September, a guard of honor
assembled
at the gate of the mansion of Boabdil, to escort
20
him to the frontiers of his kingdom. He pressed his
child to his heart at parting, but he uttered not a
word; for there were many christian eyes, to behold
his emotion. He mounted his steed, and never
turned
his head to look again upon the youth; but those
who were near him observed the vehement struggle
that shook his frame, wherein the anguish of the father
had well nigh subdued the studied equanimity of the
king.
Boabdil el Chico and king Ferdinand sallied forth,
side by side, from Cordova, amidst the acclamations
of a prodigious multitude. When they were a short
distance from the city, they separated, with many
gracious expressions on the part of the Castilian
monarch, and many thankful acknowledgments from
his late captive, whose heart had been humbled by
adversity. Ferdinand departed for Guadalupe, and
Boabdil for Granada. The latter was accompanied
by a guard of honor; and the viceroys of Andalusia,
and the generals on the frontier, were ordered to
furnish him with escorts, and to show him all possible
honor on his journey. In this way he was conducted
in royal state through the country he had entered to
ravage, and was placed in safety in his own
dominions
.
He was met on the frontier by the principal nobles
and cavaliers of his court, who had been secretly sent
by his mother, the sultana Ayxa, to escort him to the
capital. The heart of Boabdil was lifted up for a
moment, when he found himself on his own
territories
,
surrounded by Moslem knights, with his own
standards waving over his head; and he began to
doubt the predictions of the astrologers: he soon
found cause, however, to moderate his exultation.
The loyal train which had come to welcome him,
was but scanty in number, and he missed many of
his most zealous and obsequious courtiers. He had
returned, indeed, to his kingdom, but it was no longer
the devoted kingdom he had left. The story of his
vassalage to the christian sovereigns, had been made
use of by his father to ruin him with the people. He
had been represented as a traitor to his country, a
renegado to his faith, and as leagued with the enemies
of both, to subdue the Moslems of Spain to the yoke
of christian bondage. In this way, the mind of the
public had been turned from him; the greater part
of the nobility had thronged round the throne of his
father in the Alhambra; and his mother, the resolute
sultana Ayxa, with difficulty maintained her faction
in the opposite towers of the Alcazaba.
Such was the melancholy picture of affairs given
to Boabdil by the courtiers who had come forth to
meet him. They even informed him that it would
be an enterprise of difficulty and danger to make his
way back to the capital, and regain the little court
which still remained faithful to him in the heart of
the city. The old tiger, Muley Aben Hassan, lay
couched within the Alhambra, and the walls and
gates of the city were strongly guarded by his troops.
Boabdil shook his head, at these tidings. He called
to mind the ill omen of his breaking his lance against
the gate of Elvira, when issuing forth so vain-gloriously
with his army, which he now saw clearly had
foreboded
the destruction of that army on which he had
so confidently relied. Henceforth, said he, let
no man have the impiety to scoff at omens.
Boabdil approached his capital by stealth, and in
the night, prowling about its walls, like an enemy
seeking to destroy, rather than a monarch returning
to his throne. At length he seized upon a
posterngate
of the Albaycin,that part of the city which
had always been in his favor; he passed rapidly
through the streets before the populace were aroused
from their sleep, and reached in safety the fortress
of the Alcazaba. Here he was received into the
embraces of his intrepid mother, and his favorite wife
Morayma. The transports of the latter, on the safe
return of her husband, were mingled with tears; for
she thought of her father, Ali Atar, who had fallen in
his cause, and of her only son, who was left a hostage
in the hands of the christians.
The heart of Boabdil, softened by his misfortunes,
was moved by the changes in every thing round him;
but his mother called up his spirit. This, said
she, is no time for tears and fondness. A king must
think of his sceptre and his throne, and not yield to
softness like common men. Thou hast done well,
my son, in throwing thyself resolutely into Granada:
it must depend upon thyself, whether thou remain
here a king or a captive.
The old king Muley Aben Hassan had retired to
his couch that night, in one of the strongest towers
of the Alhambra; but his restless anxiety kept him
from repose. In the first watch of the night, he
heard a shout faintly rising from the quarter of the
Albaycin, which is on the opposite side of the deep
valley of the Darro. Shortly afterwards, horsemen
came galloping up the hill that leads to the main gate
of the Alhambra, spreading the alarm that Boabdil
had entered the city and possessed himself of the
Alcazaba.
In the first transports of his rage, the old king
would have struck the messenger to earth. He
hastily summoned his counsellors and commanders,
exhorting them to stand by him in this critical
moment
;
and, during the night, made every preparation
to enter the Albaycin sword in hand in the morning.
In the mean time, the sultana Ayxa had taken
prompt and vigorous measures to strengthen her
party. The Albaycin was the part of the city filled
by the lower orders. The return of Boabdil was
proclaimed throughout the streets, and large sums
of money were distributed among the populace. The
nobles, assembled in the Alcazaba, were promised
honors and rewards by Boabdil, as soon as he should
be firmly seated on the throne. These well-timed
measures had the customary effect; and, by
day-break
,
all the motley populace of the Albaycin were
in arms.
A doleful day succeeded. All Granada was a scene
of tumult and horror. Drums and trumpets resounded
in every part; all business was interrupted; the shops
were shut, the doors barricadoed. Armed bands
paraded the streets, some shouting for Boabdil, and
Vol. I. O
some for Muley Aben Hassan. When they
encountered
each other, they fought furiously and without
mercy; every public square became a scene of battle.
The great mass of the lower orders was in favor of
Boabdil, but it was a multitude without discipline or
lofty spirit; part of the people was regularly armed,
but the greater number had sallied forth with the
implements of their trade. The troops of the old
king, among whom were many cavaliers of pride and
valor, soon drove the populace from the squares.
They fortified themselves, however, in the streets
and lanes, which they barricadoed. They made
fortresses of their houses, and fought desperately from
the windows and the roofs, and many a warrior of the
highest blood of Granada was laid low by plebeian
hands and plebeian weapons, in this civic brawl.
It was impossible that such violent convulsions
should last long, in the heart of a city. The people
soon longed for repose, and a return to their
peaceful
occupations; and the cavaliers detested these
conflicts with the multitude, in which there were all
the horrors of war without its laurels. By the
interference
of the alfaquis, an armistice was at length
effected. Boabdil was persuaded that there was no
dependence upon the inconstant favor of the
multitude
,
and was prevailed upon to quit a capital where
he could only maintain a precarious seat upon his
throne by a perpetual and bloody struggle. He fixed
his court at the city of Almeria, which was entirely
devoted to him, and which, at that time, vied with
Granada in splendor and importance. This
compromise
of grandeur for tranquillity, however, was
sorely against the counsels of his proud-spirited
mother
,
the sultana Ayxa. Granada appeared, in her eyes,
the only legitimate seat of dominion; and she
observed
,
with a smile of disdain, that he was not
worthy of being called a monarch, who was not
master of his capital.
CHAPTER XXII.
Foray of the Moorish Alcaydes, and battle of Lopera.
Though
Muley Aben Hassan had regained
undivided
sway over the city of Granada, and the alfaquis,
by his command, had denounced his son Boabdil as
an apostate, and as one doomed by Heaven to
misfortune
,
still the latter had many adherents among the
common people. Whenever, therefore, any act of
the old monarch was displeasing to the turbulent
multitude, they were prone to give him a hint of the
slippery nature of his standing, by shouting out the
name of Boabdil el Chico. Long experience had
instructed Muley Aben Hassan in the character of
the inconstant people over whom he ruled. Alla
Achbar! exclaimed he, God is great; but a
successful
inroad into the country of the unbelievers,
will make more converts to my cause than a
thousand
texts of the Koran, expounded by ten thousand
alfaquis.
At this time king Ferdinand was absent from
Andalusia
on a distant expedition, with many of his
troops. The moment was favorable for a foray, and
Muley Aben Hassan cast about his thoughts for a
leader to conduct it. Ali Atar, the terror of the
border, the scourge of Andalusia, was dead; but there
was another veteran general, scarce inferior to him
for predatory warfare. This was old Bexir, the gray
and crafty alcayde of Malaga; and the people under
his command were ripe for an expedition of the kind.
The signal defeat and slaughter of the Spanish knights
in the neighboring mountains had filled the people
of Malaga with vanity and self-conceit. They had
attributed to their own valor the defeat which had
been caused by the nature of the country. Many of
them wore the armor and paraded in public with the
horses of the unfortunate cavaliers slain on that
occasion
,
which they vauntingly displayed as the trophies
of their boasted victory. They had talked themselves
into a contempt for the chivalry of Andalusia, and
were impatient for an opportunity to overrun a
country defended by such troops. This, Muley Aben
Hassan considered a favorable state of mind to insure
a daring inroad, and he sent orders to old Bexir to
gather together his people and the choicest warriors
of the borders, and to carry fire and sword into the
very heart of Andalusia. The wary old Bexir
immediately
dispatched his emissaries among the alcaydes
of the border towns, calling upon them to assemble
with their troops at the city of Ronda, close upon
the christian frontier.
Ronda was the most virulent nest of Moorish
depredators
in the whole border country. It was situated
in the midst of the wild Serrania, or chain of
mountains
of the same name, which are uncommonly lofty,
broken, and precipitous. It stood on an almost
isolated rock, nearly encircled by a deep valley, or
rather chasm, through which ran the beautiful river
called Rio Verde. The Moors of this city were the
O 2 21
most active, robust, and warlike of all the
mountaineers
,
and their very children discharged the
cross-bow
with unerring aim. They were incessantly
harassing the rich plains of Andalusia; their city
abounded with christian spoils, and their deep
dungeons
were crowded with christian captives, who
might sigh in vain for deliverance from this
impregnable
fortress. Such was Ronda in the time of the
Moors; and it has ever retained something of the
same character, even to the present day. Its
inhabitants
continue to be among the boldest, fiercest, and
most adventurous of the Andalusian mountaineers;
and the Serrania de Ronda is famous as the most
dangerous
resort of the bandit and the contrabandista.
Hamet Zeli, surnamed El Zegri, was the
commander
of this belligerent city and its fierce
inhabitants
.
He was of the tribe of the Zegries, and one
of the most proud and daring of that warlike race.
Beside the inhabitants of Ronda, he had a legion of
African Moors in his immediate service. They were
of the tribe of the Gomeres, mercenary troops, whose
hot African blood had not yet been tempered by the
softer living of Spain, and whose whole business was
to fight. These he kept always well armed and well
appointed. The rich pasturage of the valley of
Ronda produced a breed of horses famous for strength
and speed; no cavalry, therefore, was better mounted
than the band of Gomeres. Rapid on the march,
fierce in the attack, it would sweep down upon the
Andalusian plains like a sudden blast from the
mountains
,
and pass away as suddenly, before there was
time for pursuit.
There was nothing that stirred up the spirit of the
Moors of the frontiers more thoroughly than the idea
of a foray. The summons of Bexir was gladly obeyed
by the alcaydes of the border towns, and in a little
while there was a force of fifteen hundred horse and
four thousand foot, the very pith and marrow of the
surrounding country, assembled within the walls of
Ronda. The people of the place anticipated with
eagerness the rich spoils of Andalusia, that were soon
to crowd their gates; throughout the day, the city
resounded with the noise of kettle-drum and trumpet;
the high-mettled steeds stamped and neighed in their
stalls, as if they shared the impatience for the foray;
while the christian captives sighed, as the varied din
of preparation reached to their rocky dungeons,
denoting
that a fresh ravage was preparing against their
countrymen.
The infidel host sallied forth full of spirits,
anticipating
an easy ravage and abundant booty. They
encouraged each other in a contempt for the prowess
of the foe. Many of the warriors of Malaga, and of
some of the mountain towns, had insultingly arrayed
themselves in the splendid armor of the christian
knights slain or taken prisoners in the famous
massacre
,
and some of them rode the Andalusian steeds
which had been captured on that occasion.
The wary Bexir had concerted his plans so secretly
and expeditiously, that the christian towns of
Andalusia
had not the least suspicion of the storm that had
gathered beyond the mountains. The vast and rocky
range of the Serrania de Ronda extended like a screen,
covering all their movements from observation.
The army made its way as rapidly as the rugged
nature of the mountains would permit, guided by
Hamet el Zegri, the bold alcayde of Ronda, who
knew every pass and defile: not a drum, nor the
clash of a cymbal, nor the blast of a trumpet, was
permitted to be heard. The mass of war rolled
quietly on as the gathering cloud to the brow of the
mountains, intending to burst down like the
thunderbolt
upon the plain.
Never let the most wary commander fancy himself
secure from discovery; for rocks have eyes, and trees
have ears, and the birds of the air have tongues, to
betray the most secret enterprise. There chanced
at this time to be six christian scouts, prowling about
the savage heights of the Serrania de Ronda. They
were of that kind of lawless ruffians who infest the
borders of belligerent countries, ready at any time to
fight for pay, or prowl for plunder. The wild
mountain
passes of Spain have ever abounded with loose
rambling vagabonds of the kind,soldiers in war,
robbers in peace; guides, guards, smugglers, or
cutthroats
,
according to the circumstances of the case.
These six marauders (says Fray Antonio Agapida)
were on this occasion chosen instruments, sanctified
by the righteousness of their cause. They were
lurking among the mountains, to entrap Moorish
cattle or Moorish prisoners, both of which were
equally saleable in the christian market. They had
ascended one of the loftiest cliffs, and were looking
out like birds of prey, ready to pounce upon any
thing that might offer in the valley, when they
descried
the Moorish army emerging from a mountain
glen. They watched it in silence as it wound below
them, remarking the standards of the various towns
and the pennons of the commanders. They hovered
about it on its march, skulking from cliff to cliff, until
they saw the route by which it intended to enter the
christian country. They then dispersed, each
making
his way by the secret passes of the mountains to
some different alcayde, that they might spread the
alarm far and wide, and each get a separate reward.
One hastened to Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero,
the same valiant alcayde who had repulsed Muley
Aben Hassan from the walls of Alhama, and who
now commanded at Ecija, in the absence of the
Master of Santiago. Others roused the town of
Utrera, and the places of that neighborhood, putting
them all on the alert.
Puerto Carrero was a cavalier of consummate vigor
and activity. He immediately sent couriers to the
alcaydes of the neighboring fortresses; to Herman
Carrello, captain of a body of the Holy Brotherhood,
and to certain knights of the order of Alcantara.
Puerto Carrero was the first to take the field.
Knowing
the hard and hungry service of these border
scampers, he made every man take a hearty repast,
and see that his horse was well shod and perfectly
appointed. Then all being refreshed and in valiant
heart, he sallied forth to seek the Moors. He had
but a handful of men, the retainers of his household
and troops of his captaincy; but they were well
armed and mounted, and accustomed to the sudden
rouses of the border; men whom the cry of Arm
and out! to horse and to the field! was sufficient
at any time to put in a fever of animation.
While the northern part of Andalusia was thus on
the alert, one of the scouts had hastened southward
to the city of Xeres, and given the alarm to the
valiant marques of Cadiz. When the marques heard
that the Moor was over the border, and that the
standard of Malaga was in the advance, his heart
bounded with a momentary joy; for he remembered
the massacre in the mountains, where his valiant
brothers had been mangled before his eyes. The
very authors of his calamity were now at hand, and
he flattered himself that the day of vengeance had
arrived. He made a hasty levy of his retainers and
of the fighting men of Xeres, and hurried off with
three hundred horse and two hundred foot, all
resolute
men and panting for revenge.
In the mean time, the veteran Bexir had
accomplished
his march, as he imagined, undiscovered.
From the openings of the craggy defiles, he pointed
out the fertile plains of Andalusia, and regaled the
eyes of his soldiery with the rich country they were
about to ravage. The fierce Gomeres of Ronda
were flushed with joy at the sight; and even their
steeds seemed to prick up their ears and snuff the
breeze, as they beheld the scenes of their frequent
forays.
When they came to where the mountain defile
opened into the low land, Bexir divided his force
into three parts: one, composed of foot-soldiers and
of such as were weakly mounted, he left to guard
the pass, being too experienced a veteran not to know
the importance of securing a retreat: a second body
he placed in ambush, among the groves and thickets
on the banks of the river Lopera: the third,
consisting
of light cavalry, he sent forth to ravage the
Campi
a,
or great plain of Utrera. Most of this latter
force was composed of the fiery Gomeres of Ronda,
mounted on the fleet steeds bred among the
mountains
.
It was led by the bold alcayde Hamet el
Zegri, who was ever eager to be foremost in the
forage. Little suspecting that the country on both
sides was on the alarm, and rushing from all
directions
to close upon them in rear, this fiery troop
dashed forward until they came within two leagues
of Utrera. Here they scattered themselves about
the plain, careering round the great herds of cattle
and flocks of sheep, and sweeping them into droves,
to be hurried to the mountains.
While they were thus dispersed in every direction,
a troop of horse and body of foot from Utrera came
suddenly upon them. The Moors rallied together in
small parties, and endeavored to defend themselves;
but they were without a leader, for Hamet el Zegri
was at a distance, having, like a hawk, made a wide
circuit in pursuit of prey. The marauders soon gave
way and fled towards the ambush on the banks of the
Lopera, being hotly pursued by the men of Utrera.
When they reached the Lopera, the Moors in
ambush
rushed forth with furious cries; and the
fugitives
,
recovering courage from this reinforcement,
rallied and turned upon their pursuers. The
christians
stood their ground, though greatly inferior in
number. Their lances were soon broken, and they
came to sharp work with sword and scimitar. The
christians fought valiantly, but were in danger of
being overwhelmed. The bold Hamet had collected
a handful of his scattered Gomeres, and, leaving his
prey, had galloped towards the scene of action. His
little troop of horsemen had reached the crest of a
rising ground at no great distance, when trumpets
were heard in another direction, and Luis Fernandez
Puerto Carrero and his followers came galloping into
the field, and charged upon the infidels in flank.
The Moors were astounded at finding war thus
breaking upon them, from various quarters of what
they had expected to find an unguarded country.
They fought for a short time with desperation, and
resisted a vehement assault from the knights of
Alcantara
,
and the men-at-arms of the Holy Brotherhood.
At length the veteran Bexir was struck from his
horse by Puerto Carrero, and taken prisoner, and the
whole force gave way and fled. In their flight, they
separated, and took two roads to the mountains,
thinking, by dividing their forces, to distract the
enemy. The christians were too few to separate.
Puerto Carrero kept them together, pursuing one
division of the enemy with great slaughter. This
battle took place at the fountain of the fig-tree, near
to the Lopera. Six hundred Moorish cavaliers were
slain, and many taken prisoners. Much spoil was
collected on the field, with which the christians
returned
in triumph to their homes.
The larger body of the enemy had retreated along
a road leading more to the south, by the banks of the
Guadalete. When they reached that river, the sound
of pursuit had died away, and they rallied to breathe
and refresh themselves on the margin of the stream.
Their force was reduced to about a thousand horse,
and a confused multitude of foot. While they were
scattered and partly dismounted on the banks of the
Guadalete, a fresh storm of war burst upon them
from an opposite direction. It was the marques of
Cadiz, leading on his household troops and the
fighting
men of Xeres. When the christian warriors
came in sight of the Moors, they were roused to fury
at beholding many of them arrayed in the armor of
the cavaliers who had been slain among the
mountains
of Malaga. Nay, some who had been in that
defeat beheld their own armor, which they had cast
away in their flight, to enable themselves to climb
the mountains. Exasperated at the sight, they
rushed
upon the foe with the ferocity of tigers, rather
than the temperate courage of cavaliers. Each man
felt as if he were avenging the death of a relative, or
wiping out his own disgrace. The good marques,
himself, beheld a powerful Moor bestriding the horse
of his brother Beltran: giving a cry of rage and
anguish
at the sight, he rushed through the thickest of
the enemy, attacked the Moor with resistless fury,
Vol. I. P 22
and after a short combat, hurled him breathless to
the earth.
The Moors, already vanquished in spirit, could not
withstand the assault of men thus madly excited.
They soon gave way, and fled for the defile of the
Serrania de Ronda, where the body of troops had
been stationed to secure a retreat. These, seeing
them come galloping wildly up the defile, with
christian
banners in pursuit, and the flash of weapons at
their deadly work, thought all Andalusia was upon
them, and fled without awaiting an attack. The
pursuit continued among glens and defiles; for the
christian warriors, eager for revenge, had no
compassion
on the foe.
When the pursuit was over, the marques of Cadiz
and his followers reposed themselves upon the banks
of the Guadalete, where they divided the spoil.
Among this were found many rich corselets, helmets,
and weapons,the Moorish trophies of the defeat in
the mountains of Malaga. Several were claimed by
their owners; others were known to have belonged
to noble cavaliers, who had been slain or taken
prisoners. There were several horses also, richly
caparisoned, which had pranced proudly with the
unfortunate warriors, as they sallied out of Antiquera
upon that fatal expedition. Thus the exultation of
the victors was dashed with melancholy, and many a
knight was seen lamenting over the helmet or
corselet
of some loved companion in arms.
The good marques of Cadiz was resting under a
tree on the banks of the Guadalete, when the horse
which had belonged to his slaughtered brother
Beltran
was brought to him. He laid his hand upon
the mane, and looked wistfully at the empty saddle.
His bosom heaved with violent agitation, and his lip
quivered and was pale. Ay de mi! mi hermano!
(wo is me! my brother!) was all that he said; for the
grief of a warrior has not many words. He looked
round on the field strewn with the bodies of the
enemy
,
and in the bitterness of his wo he felt consoled
by the idea that his brother had not been unrevenged.
Note
.En el despojo de la Batalla se ireron muchas ricas
corazas e capacetes, i barberas de las que se habian perdido en el
Axarquia, e otras muchas armas, e algunes fueron conocidas de
sus Dueos que las havian dejado por fuir, e otras fueron
conocidas
,
que eran mui sealadas de hombres principales que havian
quedado muertos e cautivos, i fueron tornados muchos de los
mismos Cavallos con sus ricas sillas, de los que quedaron en la
Axarquia, e fueron conocidos cuios eran.
Cura de Palacios
, cap. 67.
CHAPTER XXII.
Retreat of Hamet el Zegri, Alcayde of Ronda.
The
bold alcayde of Ronda, Hamet el Zegri, had
careered wide over the Campia of Utrera,
encompassing
the flocks and herds, when he heard the
burst of war at a distance. There were with him
but a handful of his Gomeres. He saw the scamper
and pursuit afar off, and beheld the christian
horsemen
spurring madly on towards the ambuscade on
the banks of the Lopera. Hamet tossed his hand
triumphantly aloft, for his men to follow him. The
christian dogs are ours! said he, as he put spurs to
his horse, to take the enemy in rear.
The little band, which followed Hamet, scarcely
amounted to thirty horsemen. They spurred across
the plain, and reached a rising ground, just as the
force of Puerto Carrero had charged, with sound of
trumpet, upon the flank of the party in ambush.
Hamet beheld the headlong rout of the army, with
rage and consternation. He found the country was
pouring forth its legions from every quarter, and
perceived that there was no safety but in precipitate
flight.
But which way to fly? An army was between
him and the mountain pass; all the forces of the
neighborhood were rushing to the borders; the whole
route by which he had come, was by this time
occupied
by the foe. He checked his steed, rose in the
stirrups, and rolled a stern and thoughtful eye over
the country; then sinking into his saddle, he seemed
to commune a moment with himself. Turning
quickly
to his troop, he singled out a renegado christian,
a traitor to his religion and his king. Come hither,
said Hamet. Thou knowest all the secret passes
of the country. I do, replied the renegado.
Dost thou know any circuitous route, solitary and
untravelled, by which we can pass wide within these
troops, and reach the Serrania? The renegado
paused: Such a route I know, but it is full of peril,
for it leads through the heart of the christian land.
'Tis well, said Hamet; the more dangerous in
appearance, the less it will be suspected. Now
hearken to me. Ride by my side. Thou seest this
purse of gold, and this scimitar. Take us, by the
route thou hast mentioned, safe to the pass of the
Serrania, and this purse shall be thy reward; betray
us, and this scimitar shall cleave thee to the
saddle-bow
.
[32]
[32]
Cura de los Palacios. Ubi. sup.
The renegado obeyed, trembling. They turned off
from the direct road to the mountains, and struck
southward towards Lebrixa, passing by the most
solitary roads, and along those deep ramblas and
ravines by which the country is intersected. It was
indeed a daring course. Every now and then they
heard the distant sound of trumpets, and the
alarm-bells
of towns and villages, and found that the war
was still hurrying to the borders. They hid
themselves
P 2
in thickets, and in the dry beds of rivers, until
the danger had passed by, and then resumed their
course. Hamet el Zegri rode on in silence, his hand
upon his scimitar and his eye upon the renegado
guide, prepared to sacrifice him on the least sign of
treachery; while his band followed, gnawing their
lips with rage, at having thus to skulk through a
country they had come to ravage.
When night fell, they struck into more practicable
roads, always keeping wide of the villages and
hamlets
,
lest the watch-dogs should betray them. In this
way, they passed in deep midnight by Areos, crossed
the Guadalete, and effected their retreat to the
mountains. The day dawned, as they made their
way up the savage defiles. Their comrades had been
hunted up these very glens by the enemy. Every
now and then, they came to where there had been a
partial fight, or a slaughter of the fugitives; and the
rocks were red with blood, and strewed with
mangled
bodies. The alcayde of Ronda was almost
frantic with rage, at seeing many of his bravest
warriors
lying stiff and stark, a prey to the hawks and
vultures of the mountains. Now and then some
wretched Moor would crawl out of a cave or glen,
whither he had fled for refuge; for in the retreat,
many of the horsemen had abandoned their steeds,
thrown away their armor, and clambered up the
cliffs, where they could not be pursued by the
christian
cavalry.
The Moorish army had sallied forth from Ronda,
amidst shouts and acclamations; but wailings were
heard within its walls, as the alcayde and his broken
band returned without banner or trumpet, and
haggard
with famine and fatigue. The tidings of their
disaster had preceded them, borne by the fugitives
of the army. No one ventured to speak to the stern
Hamet el Zegri, as he entered the city; for they saw
a dark cloud gathered upon his brow.
It seemed (says the pious Antonio Agapida) as if
heaven meted out this defeat in exact retribution for
the ills inflicted upon the christian warriors in the
heights of Malaga. It was equally signal and
disastrous
.
Of the brilliant array of Moorish chivalry,
which had descended so confidently into Andalusia,
not more than two hundred escaped. The choicest
troops of the frontier were either taken or
destroyed
;
the Moorish garrisons enfeebled; and many
alcaydes
and cavaliers of noble lineage carried into
captivity, who were afterwards obliged to redeem
themselves with heavy ransoms.
This was called the battle of Lopera, and was
fought on the 17th of September, 1483. Ferdinand
and Isabella were at Vittoria in Old Castile, when
they received news of the victory, and the standards
taken from the enemy. They celebrated the event
with processions, illuminations, and other festivities.
Ferdinand sent to the marques of Cadiz the royal
raiment which he had worn on that day, and
conferred
on him, and on all those who should inherit
his title, the privilege of wearing royal robes on our
Lady's day, in September, in commemoration of this
victory.
[33]
[33]
Mariana, Abarca, Zurita, Pulgar, &c.
Queen Isabella was equally mindful of the great
services of Don Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero.
Besides many encomiums and favors, she sent to his
wife the royal vestments and robe of brocade which
she had worn on the same day, to be worn by her,
during her life, on the anniversary of that battle.**
CHAPTER XXIV.
Of the reception at court of the Count de Cabra and the
Alcayde de los Donzeles.
In
the midst of the bustle of warlike affairs, the
worthy chronicler Fray Antonio Agapida pauses
to note, with curious accuracy, the distinguished
reception given to the count de Cabra and his
nephew, the alcayde de los Donzeles, at the stately
and ceremonious court of the Castilian sovereigns,
in reward for the capture of the Moorish king
Boabdil
.
The court (he observes) was held at the time
in the ancient Moorish palace of the city of
Cordova
,
and the ceremonials were arranged by that
venerable prelate Don Pedro Gonzalez de Mendoza,
bishop of Toledo and grand cardinal of Spain.
It was on Wednesday, the 14th of October, (
continues
the precise Antonio Agapida,) that the good
count de Cabra, according to arrangement, appeared
at the gate of Cordova. Here he was met by the
grand cardinal, and the duke of Villahermosa,
illegitimate
brother of the king, together with many of the
first grandees and prelates of the kingdom. By this
august train was he attended to the palace, amidst
triumphant strains of martial music, and the shouts
of a prodigious multitude.
When the count arrived in the presence of the
sovereigns, who were seated in state on a dais or
raised part of the hall of audience, they both arose.
23
The king advanced exactly five steps toward the count,
who knelt and kissed his majesty's hand; but the king
would not receive him as a mere vassal, but
embraced
him with affectionate cordiality. The queen,
also advanced two steps, and received the count with
a countenance full of sweetness and benignity: after
he had kissed her hand, the king and queen returned
to their thrones, and, cushions being brought, they
ordered the count de Cabra to be seated in their
presence. This last circumstance is written in large
letters, and followed by several notes of admiration,
in the manuscript of the worthy Fray Antonio
Agapida
,
who considers the extraordinary privilege of
sitting in presence of the Catholic sovereigns an
honor well worth fighting for.
The good count took his seat at a short distance
from the king, and near him was seated the duke of
Najera, then the bishop of Palencia, then the count
of Aguilar, the count Luna, and Don Gutierre de
Cardonas, senior commander of Leon.
On the side of the queen were seated the grand
cardinal of Spain, the duke of Villahermosa, the
count of Monte Rey, and the bishops of Jaen and
Cuenca, each in the order in which they are named.
The Infanta Isabella was prevented, by indisposition,
from attending the ceremony.
And now festive music resounded through the hall,
and twenty ladies of the queen's retinue entered,
magnificently attired; upon which twenty youthful
cavaliers, very gay and galliard in their array,
stepped
forth, and, each seeking his fair partner, they
commenced a stately dance. The court in the mean
time, (observes Fray Antonio Agapida,) looked on
with lofty and becoming gravity.
When the dance was concluded, the king and
queen rose to retire to supper, and dismissed the
count with many gracious expressions. He was then
attended by all the grandees present to the palace of
the grand cardinal, where they partook of a
sumptuous
banquet.
On the following Saturday, the alcayde de los
Donzeles was received, likewise, with great honors;
but the ceremonies were so arranged, as to be a
degree
less in dignity than those shown to his uncle;
the latter being considered the principal actor in this
great achievement. Thus the grand cardinal and
the duke of Villahermosa did not meet him at the
gate of the city, but received him in the palace, and
entertained him in conversation until summoned to
the sovereigns.
When the alcayde de los Donzeles entered the
presence chamber, the king and queen rose from
their chairs, but without advancing. They greeted
him graciously, and commanded him to be seated
next to the count de Cabra.
The Infanta Isabella came forth to this reception,
and took her seat beside the queen. When the court
were all seated, the music again sounded through the
hall, and the twenty ladies came forth as on the
preceding
occasion, richly attired, but in different
raiment
.
They danced, as before; and the Infanta
Isabella, taking a young Portuguese damsel for a
partner
,
joined in the dance. When this was concluded,
the king and queen dismissed the alcayde de los
Donzeles with great courtesy, and the court broke up.
The worthy Fray Antonio Agapida here indulges
in a long eulogy on the scrupulous discrimination of
the Castilian court, in the distribution of its honors
and rewards, by which means every smile, and
gesture
,
and word of the sovereigns, had its certain
value, and conveyed its equivalent of joy to the heart
of the subject;a matter well worthy the study
(says he) of all monarchs, who are too apt to
distribute
honors with a heedless caprice that renders
them of no avail.
On the following Sunday, both the count de Cabra
and the alcayde de los Donzeles were invited to sup
with the sovereigns. The court that evening was
attended by the highest nobility, arrayed with that
cost and splendor for which the Spanish nobility of
those days were renowned.
Before supper, there was a stately and
ceremonious
dance, befitting the dignity of so august a court.
The king led forth the queen, in grave and graceful
measure; the count de Cabra was honored with the
hand of the Infanta Isabella; and the alcayde de los
Donzeles danced with a daughter of the marques de
Astorga.
The dance being concluded, the royal party
repaired
to the supper-table, which was placed on an
elevated part of the saloon. Here, in full view of
the court, the count de Cabra and the alcayde de los
Donzeles supped at the same table with the king,
the queen, and the Infanta. The royal family were
served by the marques of Villena. The cupbearer
to the king was his nephew Fadrigue de Toledo, son
to the duke of Alva. Don Alexis de Estaiga had
the honor of fulfilling that office for the queen, and
Tello de Aguilar for the Infanta. Other cavaliers of
rank and distinction waited on the count and the
alcayde de los Donzeles. At one o'clock, the two
distinguished guests were dismissed with many
courteous
expressions by the sovereigns.
Such (says Fray Antonio Agapida) were the great
honors paid at our most exalted and ceremonious
court, to these renowned cavaliers: but the gratitude
of the sovereigns did not end here. A few days
afterwards, they bestowed upon them large revenues
for life, and others to descend to their heirs, with the
privilege for them and their descendants to prefix the
title of Don to their names. They gave them,
moreover
,
as armorial bearings, a Moor's head crowned,
with a golden chain round the neck, in a sanguine
field, and twenty-two banners round the margin of
the escutcheon. Their descendants, of the houses
of Cabra and Cordova, continue to bear these arms
at the present day, in memorial of the victory of
Lucena and the capture of Boabdil el Chico.
[34]
[34]
The account given by Fray Antonio Agapida of this
ceremonial
,
so characteristic of the old Spanish court, agrees in almost
every particular with an ancient manuscript, made up from the
chronicles of the curate of los Palacios and other old Spanish
writers.
Vol. I. Q
CHAPTER XXV.
How the Marques of Cadiz concerted to surprise
Zahara, and the result of his enterprise.
The
valiant Roderigo Ponce de Leon, marques
of Cadiz, was one of the most vigilant of
commanders
.
He kept in his pay a number of converted
Moors, to serve as adalides, or armed guides. These
mongrel christians were of great service, in procuring
information. Availing themselves of their Moorish
character and tongue, they penetrated into the
enemy's
country, prowled about the castles and
fortresses
,
noticed the state of the walls, the gates and
towers, the strength of their garrison, and the
vigilance
or negligence of their commanders. All this
they reported minutely to the marques, who thus
knew the state of every fortress upon the frontier,
and when it might be attacked with advantage.
Beside
the various towns and cities over which he held
a feudal sway, he had always an armed force about
him, ready for the field. A host of retainers fed in
his hall, who were ready to follow him to danger and
death itself, without inquiring who or why they
fought. The armories of his castles were supplied
with helms and cuirasses and weapons of all kinds,
ready burnished for use; and his stables were filled
with hardy steeds, that could stand a mountain
scamper.
The marques was aware that the late defeat of the
Moors on the banks of the Lopera, had weakened
their whole frontier; for many of the castles and
fortresses had lost their alcaydes, and their choicest
troops. He sent out his war-hounds, therefore, upon
the range, to ascertain where a successful blow might
be struck; and they soon returned, with word that
Zahara was weakly garrisoned and short of
provisions
.
This was the very fortress, which, about two
years before, had been stormed by Muley Aben
Hassan; and its capture had been the first blow of
this eventful war. It had ever since remained a
thorn in the side of Andalusia. All the christians
had been carried away captive, and no civil
population
had been introduced in their stead. There were
no women or children in the place. It was kept
up as a mere military post, commanding one of the
most important passes of the mountains, and was a
strong-hold of Moorish marauders. The marques was
animated by the idea of regaining this fortress for his
sovereigns, and wresting from the old Moorish king
this boasted trophy of his prowess. He sent missives
therefore to the brave Luis Fernandez Puerto
Carrero
,
who had distinguished himself in the late
victory
,
and to Juan Almaraz, captain of the
men-at-arms
of the Holy Brotherhood, informing them of
his designs, and inviting them to meet him with their
forces on the banks of the Gaudalete.
It was on the day (says Fray Antonio Agapida) of
the glorious apostles St. Simon and Judas, the
twenty-eighth
of October, in the year of grace one
thousand
four hundred and eighty three, that this chosen
band of christian soldiers assembled suddenly and
secretly at the appointed place. Their forces, when
united, amounted to six hundred horse and fifteen
hundred foot. Their gathering place was at the
entrance
of the defile leading to Zahara. That ancient
town, renowned in Moorish warfare, is situated in
one of the roughest passes of the Serrania de Ronda.
It is built round the craggy cone of a hill, on the lofty
summit of which is a strong castle. The country
around is broken into deep barrancas or ravines,
some of which approach its very walls. The place
had until recently been considered impregnable; but
(as the worthy Fray Antonio Agapida observes) the
walls of impregnable fortresses, like the virtue of
self-confident saints, have their weak points of attack.
The marques of Cadiz advanced with his little
army in the dead of the night, marching silently into
the deep and dark defiles of the mountains, and
stealing
up the ravines which extended to the walls of the
town. Their approach was so noiseless, that the
Moorish sentinels upon the walls heard not a voice
or a footfall. The marques was accompanied by his
old escalador, Ortega de Prado, who had
distinguished
himself at the scaling of Alhama. This hardy
veteran was stationed, with ten men, furnished with
scaling-ladders, in a cavity among the rocks, close to
the walls. At a little distance, seventy men were
hid in a ravine, to be at hand to second him, when
he should have fixed his ladders. The rest of the
troops were concealed in another ravine,
commanding
a fair approach to the gate of the fortress. A
shrewd and wary adalid, well acquainted with the
place, was appointed to give signals; and was so
stationed, that he could be seen by the various
parties
in ambush, but was hidden from the garrison.
The remainder of the night passed away in
profound
quiet. The Moorish sentinels could be heard
tranquilly patrolling the walls, in perfect security.
The day dawned, and the rising sun began to shine
against the lofty peaks of the Serrania de Ronda.
The sentinels looked from their battlements over a
savage but quiet mountain country, where not a
human
being was stirring; they little dreamt of the
mischief that lay lurking in every ravine and chasm
of the rocks around them. Apprehending no danger
of surprise in broad day, the greater part of the
soldiers
abandoned the walls and towers, and descended
into the city.
By orders of the marques, a small body of light
cavalry passed along the glen, and, turning round a
point of rock, showed themselves before the town:
they skirred the fields almost to the gates, as if by
way of bravado, and to defy the garrison to a
skirmish
.
The Moors were not slow in replying to it.
About seventy horse, and a number of foot who had
guarded the walls, sallied forth impetuously, thinking
to make easy prey of these insolent marauders. The
christian horsemen fled for the ravine; the Moors
pursued them down the hill, until they heard a great
shouting and tumult behind them. Looking round,
Q 2 24
they beheld their town assailed, and a scaling party
mounting the walls sword in hand. Wheeling about,
they galloped furiously for the gate; the marques of
Cadiz and Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero rushed
forth at the same time with their ambuscade, and
endeavored
to cut them off; but the Moors succeeded
in throwing themselves within the walls.
While Puerto Carrero stormed at the gate, the
marques put spurs to his horse and galloped to the
support of Ortega de Prado and his scaling party.
He arrived at a moment of imminent peril, when the
party was assailed by fifty Moors, armed with
cuirasses
and lances, who were on the point of thrusting
them from the walls. The marques sprang from his
horse, mounted a ladder, sword in hand, followed by
a number of his troops, and made a vigorous attack
upon the enemy.
[35]
[35]
Cura de los Palacios, c. 68.
They were soon driven from the
walls, and the gates and towers remained in
possession
of the christians. The Moors defended
themselves
for a short time in the streets, but at length
took refuge in the castle, the walls of which were
strong, and capable of holding out until relief should
arrive. The marques had no desire to carry on a
seige, and he had not provisions sufficient for many
prisoners; he granted them, therefore, favorable terms.
They were permitted, on leaving their arms behind
them, to march out with as much of their effects as
they could carry; and it was stipulated that they
should pass over to Barbary. The marques remained
in the place until both town and castle were put in a
perfect state of defence, and strongly garrisoned.
Thus did Zahara return once more into possession
of the christians, to the great confusion of old Muley
Aben Hassan, who, having paid the penalty of his
ill-timed violence, was now deprived of its vaunted
fruits. The Castilian sovereigns were so gratified by
this achievement of the valiant Ponce de Leon, that
they authorized him thenceforth to entitle himself
duke of Cadiz and marques of Zahara. The warrior,
however, was so proud of the original title, under
which he had so often signalized himself, that he
gave it the precedence, and always signed himself
marques, duke of Cadiz. As the reader may have
acquired the same predilection, we shall continue to
call him by his ancient title.
CHAPTER XXVI.
Of the fortress of Alhama, and how wisely it was
governed
by the Count de Tendilla.
In
this part of his chronicle, the worthy father
Fray Antonio Agapida indulges in triumphant
exultation
over the downfall of Zahara: Heaven sometimes
speaks (says he) through the mouths of false prophets,
for the confusion of the wicked. By the fall of this
fortress was the prediction of the santon of Granada
in some measure fulfilled, that the ruins of Zahara
should fall upon the heads of the infidels.
Our zealous chronicler scoffs at the Moorish
alcayde
,
who lost his fortress by surprise in broad
daylight
;
and contrasts the vigilance of the christian
governor of Alhama, the town taken in retaliation
for the storming of Zahara.
The important post of Alhama was at this time
confided by king Ferdinand to Don Inigo Lopez de
Mendoza, count of Tendilla, a cavalier of noble
blood, brother to the grand cardinal of Spain. He
had been instructed by the king, not merely to
maintain
his post, but also to make sallies and lay waste
the surrounding country. His fortress was critically
situated. It was within seven leagues of Granada,
and at no great distance from the warlike city of
Loxa. It was nestled in the lap of the mountains,
commanding the high-road to Malaga and a view
over the extensive vega. Thus situated, in the heart
of the enemy's country, surrounded by foes ready to
assail him, and a rich country for him to ravage, it
behoved this cavalier to be for ever on the alert.
He was in fact an experienced veteran, a shrewd
and wary officer, and a commander amazingly prompt
and fertile in expedients.
On assuming the command, he found that the
garrison
consisted but of one thousand men, horse and
foot. They were hardy troops, seasoned in rough
mountain campaigning, but reckless and dissolute, as
soldiers are apt to be when accustomed to predatory
warfare. They would fight hard for booty, and then
gamble it heedlessly away, or squander it in licentious
revelling. Alhama abounded with hawking, sharping,
idle hangers-on, eager to profit by the vices and follies
of the garrison. The soldiers were oftener gambling
and dancing beneath the walls, than keeping watch
upon the battlements; and nothing was heard, from
morning till night, but the noisy contest of cards and
dice, mingled with the sound of the bolero or
fandango
,
the drowsy strumming of the guitar, and the
rattling of the castanets; while often the whole was
interrupted by the loud brawl, and fierce and bloody
contest.
The count of Tendilla set himself vigorously to
reform these excesses; he knew that laxity of morals
is generally attended by neglect of duty, and that the
least breach of discipline in the exposed situation of
his fortress might be fatal. Here is but a handful
of men, said he; it is necessary that each man
should be a hero.
He endeavored to awaken a proper ambition in
the minds of his soldiers, and to instil into them the
high principles of chivalry. A just war, he
observed
,
is often rendered wicked and disastrous by
the manner in which it is conducted; for the
rightcousness
of the cause is not sufficient to sanction the
profligacy of the means, and the want of order and
subordination among the troops may bring ruin and
disgrace upon the best concerted plans. But we
cannot describe the character and conduct of this
renowned commander in more forcible language than
that of Fray Antonio Agapida, excepting that the
pious father places in the foreground of his virtues
his hatred of the Moors. The count de Tendilla,
says he, was a mirror of christian knighthood
watchful, abstemious, chaste, devout, and thoroughly
filled with the spirit of the cause. He labored
incessantly
and strenuously for the glory of the faith,
and the prosperity of their most catholic majesties;
and, above all, he hated the infidels with a pure and
holy hatred. This worthy cavalier discountenanced
all idleness, rioting, chambering, and wantonness,
among his soldiery. He kept them constantly to the
exercise of arms, making them adroit in the use of
their weapons and management of their steeds, and
prompt for the field at a moment's notice. He
permitted
no sound of lute or harp, or song, or other
loose minstrelsy, to be heard in his fortress,
debauching
the ear and softening the valor of the soldier; no
other music was allowed but the wholesome rolling
of the drum and braying of the trumpet, and such
like spirit-stirring instruments as fill the mind with
thoughts of iron war. All wandering minstrels,
sharping
pedlars, sturdy trulls, and other camp trumpery,
were ordered to pack up their baggage, and were
drummed out of the gates of Alhama. In place of
such lewd rabble, he introduced a train of holy friars
to inspirit his people by exhortation, and prayer,
and choral chanting, and to spur them on to fight the
good fight of faith. All games of chance were
prohibited
,
except the game of war; and this he labored,
by vigilance and vigor, to reduce to a game of
certainty
.
Heaven smiled upon the efforts of this
righteous
cavalier. His men became soldiers at all points,
and terrors to the Moors. The good count never set
forth on a ravage, without observing the rites of
confession
,
absolution, and communion, and obliging his
followers to do the same. Their banners were blessed
by the holy friars whom he maintained in Alhama;
and in this way success was secured to his arms, and
he was enabled to lay waste the land of the heathen.
The fortress of Alhama (continues Fray Antonio
Agapida) overlooked from its lofty site a great part
of the fertile vega, watered by the Cazin and the
Xenel: from this he made frequent sallies, sweeping
away the flocks and herds from the pasture, the
laborer
from the field, and the convoy from the road;
so that it was said by the Moors, that a beetle could
not crawl across the vega without being seen by
count Tendilla. The peasantry, therefore, were fain
to betake themselves to watch-towers and fortified
hamlets, where they shut up their cattle, garnered
their corn, and sheltered their wives and children.
Even there they were not safe; the count would
storm these rustic fortresses with fire and sword;
make captives of their inhabitants; carry off the corn,
the oil, the silks, and cattle; and leave the ruins
blazing and smoking, within the very sight of Granada.
It was a pleasing and refreshing sight, continues
the good father, to behold this pious knight and his
followers returning from one of these crusades,
leaving
the rich land of the infidel in smoking desolation
behind them; to behold the long line of mules and
asses, laden with the plunder of the Gentilesthe
hosts of captive Moors, men, women, and children
droves of sturdy beeves, lowing kine, and bleating
sheep; all winding up the steep acclivity to the gates
of Alhama, pricked on by the Catholic soldiery. His
garrison thus thrived on the fat of the land and the
spoil of the infidel; nor was he unmindful of the pious
fathers, whose blessings crowned his enterprises with
success. A large portion of the spoil was always
dedicated to the church; and the good friars were
ever ready at the gate to hail him on his return, and
receive the share allotted them. Beside these
allotments
,
he made many votive offerings, either in time
of peril or on the eve of a foray; and the chapels of
Alhama were resplendent with chalices, crosses, and
other precious gifts made by this Catholic cavalier.
Thus eloquently does the venerable Fray Antonio
Agapida dilate in praise of the good count de
Tendilla
;
and other historians of equal veracity, but less
unction, agree in pronouncing him one of the ablest
of Spanish generals. So terrible in fact did he become
in the land, that the Moorish peasantry could not
venture a league from Granada or Loxa to labor in
the fields, without peril of being carried into
captivity
.
The people of Granada clamored against
Muley Aben Hassan, for suffering his lands to be
thus outraged and insulted, and demanded to have
this bold marauder shut up in his fortress. The old
monarch was roused by their remonstrances. He
sent forth powerful troops of horse, to protect the
country, during the season that the husbandmen
were abroad in the fields. These troops patrolled
in formidable squadrons in the neighborhood of
Alhama
,
keeping strict watch upon its gates; so that it
was impossible for the christians to make a sally,
without being seen and intercepted.
While Alhama was thus blockaded by a roving
force of Moorish cavalry, the inhabitants were
awakened one night by a tremendous crash, that
shook the fortress to its foundations. The garrison
flew to arms, supposing it some assault of the enemy.
The alarm proved to have been caused by the
rupture
of a portion of the wall, which, undermined by
heavy rains, had suddenly given way, leaving a large
chasm yawning towards the plain.
The count de Tendilla was for a time in great
anxiety. Should this breach be discovered by the
blockading horsemen, they would arouse the country,
Granada and Loxa would pour out an overwhelming
Vol. I. R 25
force, and they would find his walls ready sapped for
an assault. In this fearful emergency, the count
displayed
his noted talent for expedients. He ordered
a quantity of linen cloth to be stretched in front of
the breach, painted in imitation of stone, and
indented
with battlements, so as at a distance to resemble
the other parts of the wall: behind this screen he
employed workmen, day and night, in repairing the
fracture. No one was permitted to leave the fortress,
lest information of its defenceless plight should be
carried to the Moor. Light squadrons of the enemy
were seen hovering about the plain, but never
approached
near enough to discover the deception;
and thus, in the course of a few days, the wall was
rebuilt stronger than before.
There was another expedient of this shrewd
veteran
,
which greatly excites the marvel of Agapida.
It happened, he observes, that this Catholic
cavalier at one time was destitute of gold and silver,
wherewith to pay the wages of his troops; and the
soldiers murmured greatly, seeing that they had not
the means of purchasing necessaries from the people
of the town. In this dilemma, what does this most
sagacious commander? He takes me a number of
little morsels of paper, on the which he inscribes
various sums, large and small, according to the nature
of the case, and signs me them with his own hand and
name. These did he give to the soldiery, in earnest
of their pay. `How!' you will say, `are soldiers to
be paid with scraps of paper?' Even so, I answer,
and well paid too, as I will presently make manifest:
for the good count issued a proclamation, ordering
the inhabitants of Alhama to take these morsels of
paper for the full amount thereon inscribed,
promising
to redeem them at a future time with silver and
gold, and threatening severe punishment to all who
should refuse. The people, having full confidence
in his word, and trusting that he would be as willing
to perform the one promise as he certainly was able
to perform the other, took those curious morsels of
paper without hesitation or demur. Thus, by a subtle
and most miraculous kind of alchymy, did this
Catholic
cavalier turn worthless paper into precious gold,
and make his late impoverished garrison abound in
money!
It is but just to add, that the count de Tendilla
redeemed his promises, like a loyal knight; and this
miracle as it appeared in the eyes of Fray Antonio
Agapida, is the first instance on record of paper
money, which has since inundated the civilized world
with unbounded opulence.
CHAPTER XXVII.
Foray of Christian Knights into the territory of the Moors.
The
Spanish cavaliers who had survived the
memorable massacre among the mountains of Malaga,
although they had repeatedly avenged the death of
their companions, yet could not forget the horror
and humiliation of their defeat. Nothing would satisfy
them but to undertake a second expedition of the
kind, to carry fire and sword throughout a wide part
of the Moorish territories, and to leave all those
regions
which had triumphed in their disaster a black
and burning monument of their vengeance. Their
wishes accorded with the policy of the king, who
desired to lay waste the country and destroy the
resources
of the enemy; every assistance was therefore
given to promote and accomplish their enterprise.
In the spring of 1484, the ancient city of Antiquera
again resounded with arms; numbers of the same
cavaliers who had assembled there so gaily the
preceding
year, again came wheeling into the gates with
their steeled and shining warriors, but with a more
dark and solemn brow than on that disastrous
occasion
,
for they had the recollection of their slaughtered
friends present to their minds, whose deaths they
were to avenge.
In a little while there was a chosen force of six
thousand horse and twelve thousand foot assembled
in Antiquera, many of them the very flower of
Spanish
chivalry, troops of the established military and
religious orders, and of the Holy Brotherhood.
Every precaution had been taken to furnish this
army with all things needful for its extensive and
perilous inroad. Numerous surgeons accompanied
it, who were to attend upon all the sick and wounded,
without charge, being paid for their services by the
queen. Isabella, also, in her considerate humanity,
provided six spacious tents furnished with beds and
all things needful for the wounded and infirm. These
continued to be used in all great expeditions
throughout
the war, and were called the Queen's Hospital.
The worthy father, Fray Antonio Agapida, vaunts
this benignant provision of the queen, as the first
introduction of a regular camp hospital in
campaigning
service.
Thus thoroughly prepared, the cavaliers issued
forth from Antiquera in splended and terrible array,
but with less exulting confidence and vaunting
ostentation
than on their former foray; and this was the
order of the army. Don Alonzo de Aguilar led the
advance guard, accompanied by Don Diego
Fernandez
de Cordova, the alcayde de los Donzeles, and
Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero, count of Palma,
with their household troops. They were followed
by Juan de Merlo, Juan de Almara, and Carlos de
Biezman, of the Holy Brotherhood, with the
men-atarms
of their captaincies.
The second battalion was commanded by the
marques
of Cadiz and the Master of Santiago, with the
R 2
cavaliers of Santiago and the troops of the house of
Ponce Leon: with these also went the senior
commander
of Calatrava and the knights of that order,
and various other cavaliers and their retainers.
The right wing of this second battalion was led by
Gonsalvo de Cordova, afterwards renowned as grand
captain of Spain; the left wing, by Diego Lopez de
Avila. They were accompanied by several
distinguished
cavaliers, and certain captains of the Holy
Brotherhood, with their men-at-arms.
The duke of Medina Sidonia and the count de
Cabra commanded the third battalion, with the
troops of their respective houses. They were
accompanied
by other commanders of note, with their
forces.
The rear guard was brought up by the senior
commander and knights of Alcantara, followed by
the Andalusian chivalry from Xerez, Ecija, and
Carmona
.
Such was the army that issued forth from the gates
of Antiquera, on one of the most extensive
talas
, or
devastating inroads, that ever laid waste the kingdom
of Granada.
The army entered the Moorish territory by the
way of Alora, destroying all the cornifields, vineyards,
and orchards, and plantations of olives, round that
city. It then proceeded through the rich valleys and
fertile uplands of Coin, Cazarabonela, Almexia, and
Cartama; and in ten days, all those fertile regions
were a smoking and frightful desert. From hence it
pursued its slow and destructive course, like the
stream of lava of a volcano, through the regions of
Papiana and Alhendin, and so on to the vega of
Malaga
,
laying waste the groves of olives and almonds,
and the fields of grain, and destroying every green
thing. The Moors of some of those places interceded
in vain for their groves and fields, offering to deliver
up their christian captives. One part of the army
blockaded the towns, while the other ravaged the
surrounding country. Sometimes the Moors sallied
forth desperately to defend their property, but were
driven back to their gates with slaughter, and their
suburbs pillaged and burnt. It was an awful spectacle
at night to behold the volumes of black smoke mingled
with lurid flames that rose from the burning suburbs,
and the women on the walls of the town wringing
their hands and shrieking at the desolation of their
dwellings.
The destroying army, on arriving at the sea-coast,
found vessels lying off shore laden with all kinds of
provisions and munitions for its use, which had been
sent from Seville and Xerez: it was thus enabled to
continue its desolating career. Advancing to the
neighborhood of Malaga, it was bravely assailed by
the Moors of that city, and there was severe
skirmishing
for a whole day; but while the main part of the
army encountered the enemy, the rest ravaged the
whole vega and destroyed all the mills. As the object
of the expedition was not to capture places, but
merely
to burn, ravage, and destroy, the host, satisfied
with the mischief they had done in the vega, turned
their backs upon Malaga, and again entered the
mountains. They passed by Coin, and through the
regions of Allazayna, and Gatero, and Alhaurin; all
which were likewise desolated. In this way did they
make the circuit of that chain of rich and verdant
valleys, the glory of those mountains and the pride
and delight of the Moors. For forty days did they
continue on like a consuming fire, leaving a smoking
and howling waste to mark their course, until, weary
with the work of destruction, and having fully sated
their revenge for the massacre of the Axarquia, they
returned in triumph to the meadows of Antiquera.
In the month of June, king Ferdinand took
command
in person of this destructive army; he increased
its force, and added to its means of mischief
several
lombards and other heavy artillery, intended for
the battering of towns, and managed by engineers
from France and Germany. With these, the marques
of Cadiz assured the king, he would soon be able to
reduce the Moorish fortresses. They were only
calculated
for defence against the engines anciently used
in warfare. Their walls and towers were high and
thin, depending for security on their rough and rocky
situations. The stone and iron balls thundered from
the lombards would soon tumble them in ruins upon
the heads of their defenders.
The fate of Alora speedily proved the truth of this
opinion. It was strongly posted on a rock washed
by a river. The artillery soon battered down two
of the towers and a part of the wall. The Moors
were thrown into consternation at the vehemence
of the assault, and the effect of those tremendous en
gines upon their vaunted bulwarks. The roaring of
the artillery and the tumbling of the walls terrified
the women, who beset the alcayde with vociferous
supplications to surrender. The place was given up
on the 20th of June, on condition that the inhabitants
might depart with their effects. The people of
Malaga
,
as yet unacquainted with the power of this
battering
ordnance, were so incensed at those of Alora
for what they considered a tame surrender, that they
would not admit them into their city.
A similar fate attended the town of Setenil, built
on a lofty rock and esteemed impregnable. Many
times had it been besieged under former christian
kings, but never had it been taken. Even now, for
several days the artillery was directed against it
without effect, and many of the cavaliers murmured
at the marques of Cadiz for having counselled the
king to attack this unconquerable place.
[36]
[36]
Cura de los Palacios.
On the same night that these reproaches were
uttered
,
the marques directed the artillery himself: he
levelled the lombards at the bottom of the walls,
and at the gates. In a little while, the gates were
battered to pieces, a great breach was effected in the
walls, and the Moors were fain to capitulate.
Twenty-four
christian captives, who had been taken in the
defeat of the mountains of Malaga, were rescued
from the dungeons of this fortress, and hailed the
marques of Cadiz as their deliverer.
Needless is it to mention the capture of various
26
other places, which surrendered without waiting to
be attacked. The Moors had always shown great
bravery and perseverance in defending their towns;
they were formidable in their sallies and skirmishes,
and patient in enduring hunger and thirst when
besieged
;
but this terrible ordnance, which demolished
their walls with such ease and rapidity, overwhelmed
them with confusion and dismay, and rendered vain
all resistance. King Ferdinand was so struck with
the effect of this artillery, that he ordered the number
of lombards to be increased; and these potent engines
had henceforth a great influence on the fortunes of
this war.
The last operation of this year, so disastrous to the
Moors, was an inroad by king Ferdinand, in the latter
part of summer, into the vega, in which he ravaged
the country, burnt two villages near to Granada, and
destroyed the mills near the very gates of the city.
Old Muley Aben Hassan was overwhelmed with
dismay at this desolation, which, during the whole
year, had been raging throughout his territories, and
had now reached to the walls of his capital. His
fierce spirit was broken by misfortunes and infirmity;
he offered to purchase a peace, and to hold his crown
as a tributary vassal. Ferdinand would listen to no
propositions: the absolute conquest of Granada was
the great object of this war, and he was resolved
never to rest content without its complete fulfilment.
Having supplied and strengthened the garrisons of
the places he had taken in the heart of the Moorish
territories, he enjoined their commanders to render
every assistance to the younger Moorish king, in the
civil war against his father. He then returned with
his army to Cordova, in great triumph, closing a
series of ravaging campaigns, that had filled the
kingdom
of Granada with grief and consternation.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
Attempt of El Zagal to surprise Boabdil in Almeria.
During
this year of sorrow and disaster to the
Moors, the younger king Boabdil, most truly called
the unfortunate, held a diminished and feeble court
in the maritime city of Almeria. He retained little
more than the name of king, and was supported in
even this shadow of royalty, by the countenance and
treasures of the Castilian sovereigns. Still he trusted,
that, in the fluctuation of events, the inconstant
nation
might once more return to his standard, and
replace
him on the throne of the Alhambra.
His mother, the high-spirited sultana Ayxa la
Horra, endeavored to rouse him from this passive
state. It is a feeble mind, said she, that waits
for the turn of fortune's wheel; the brave mind seizes
upon it, and turns it to its purpose. Take the field,
and you may drive danger before you; remain
cowering
at home, and it besieges you in your dwelling.
By a bold enterprise, you may regain your splendid
throne in Granada; by passive forbearance, you will
forfeit even this miserable throne in Almeria.
Boabdil had not the force of soul to follow these
courageous counsels, and in a little time the evils his
mother had predicted fell upon him.
Old Muley Aben Hassan was almost extinguished
by age and infirmity. He had nearly lost his sight,
and was completely bedridden. His brother
Abdallah
,
surnamed El Zagal, or the valiant, the same
who had assisted in the massacre of the Spanish
chivalry among the mountains of Malaga, was
commander-in-chief
of the Moorish armies, and gradually
took upon himself most of the cares of sovereignty.
Among other things, he was particularly zealous in
espousing his brother's quarrel with his son; and he
prosecuted it with such vehemence, that many
affirmed
there was something more than mere fraternal
sympathy at the bottom of his zeal.
The disasters and disgraces inflicted on the country
by the christians during this year, had wounded the
national feelings of the people of Almeria; and many
had felt indignant that Boabdil should remain passive
at such a time, or rather, should appear to make a
common cause with the enemy. His uncle Abdallah
diligently fomented this feeling, by his agents. The
same arts were made use of, that had been successful
in Granada, Boabdil was secretly but actively
denounced
by the alfaquis, as an apostate, leagued with
the christians against his country and his early faith;
the affections of the populace and soldiery were
gradually alienated from him, and a deep conspiracy
concerted for his destruction.
In the month of February, 1485, El Zagal suddenly
appeared before Almeria, at the head of a troop of
horse. The alfaquis were prepared for his arrival,
and the gates were thrown open to him. He entered
with his band, and galloped to the citadel. The
alcayde
would have made resistance; but the garrison
Vol. I. S
put him to death, and received El Zagal with
acclaclamations
.
El Zagal rushed through the apartments
of the Alcazar, but he sought in vain for Boabdil.
He found the sultana Ayxa la Horra in one of the
saloons, with Ben Ahagete, a younger brother of the
monarch, a valiant Abencerrage, and several
attendants
,
who rallied round them to protect them.
Where is the traitor Boabdil? exclaimed El
Zagal. I know no traitor more perfidious than
thyself, exclaimed the intrepid sultana; and I
trust my son is in safety, to take vengeance on thy
treason. The rage of El Zagal was without bounds,
when he learnt that his intended victim had escaped.
In his fury he slew the prince Ben Ahagete, and his
followers fell upon and massacred the Abencerrage
and attendants. As to the proud sultana, she was
borne away prisoner, and loaded with revilings, as
having upheld her son in his rebellion, and fomented
a civil war.
The unfortunate Boabdil had been apprized of his
danger by a faithful soldier, just in time to make his
escape. Throwing himself on one of the fleetest
horses in his stables, and followed by a handful of
adherents
,
he had galloped in the confusion out of the
gates of Almeria. Several of the cavalry of El Zagal,
who were stationed without the walls, perceived his
flight, and attempted to pursue him; their horses
were jaded with travel, and he soon left them far
behind. But, whither was he to fly? Every fortress
and castle in the kingdom of Granada was closed
against him; he knew not whom among the Moors
to trust, for they had been taught to detest him as a
traitor and an apostate. He had no alternative but
to seek refuge among the christians, his hereditary
enemies. With a heavy heart, he turned his horse's
head towards Cordova. He had to lurk, like a
fugitive
,
through a part of his own dominions; nor did
he feel himself secure, until he had passed the
frontier
,
and beheld the mountain barrier of his country
towering behind him. Then it was that he became
conscious of his humiliating statea fugitive from
his throne, an outcast from his nation, a king without
a kingdom. He smote his breast, in an agony of
grief: Evil indeed, exclaimed he, was the day
of my birth, and truly was I named El Zogoybi, the
unlucky.
He entered the gates of Cordova with downcast
countenance, and with a train of but forty followers.
The sovereigns were absent; but the cavaliers of
Andalusia manifested that sympathy in the
misfortunes
of the monarch, that becomes men of lofty and
chivalrous souls. They received him with great
distinction, attended him with the utmost courtesy,
and he was honorably entertained by the civil and
military commanders of that ancient city.
In the mean time, El Zagal put a new alcayde
over Almeria, to govern in the name of his brother;
and, having strongly garrisoned the place, he
repaired
to Malaga, where an attack of the christians was
apprehended. The young monarch being driven
out of the land, and the old monarch blind and
bedridden
,
El Zagal, at the head of the armies, was
virtually
the sovereign of Granada. The people were
pleased with having a new idol to look up to, and a
new name to shout forth; and El Zagal was hailed
with acclamations, as the main hope of the nation.
CHAPTER XXIX.
How King Ferdinand commenced another campaign
against the Moors, and how he laid siege to Coin
and Cartama.
The
great effect of the battering ordnance in
demolishing
the Moorish fortresses in the preceding
year, induced king Ferdinand to procure a powerful
train for the campaign of 1485, in the course of
which he resolved to assault some of the most
formidable holds of the enemy. An army of nine
thousand cavalry and twenty thousand infantry
assembled
at Cordova, early in the spring; and the king
took the field on the 5th of April. It had been
determined
in secret council, to attack the city of
Malaga
,
that ancient and important sea-port, on which
Granada depended for foreign aid and supplies. It
was thought proper previously, however, to get
possession
of various towns and fortresses in the valleys
of Santa Maria and Cartama, through which pass
the roads to Malaga.
The first place assailed was the town of
Benamaquex
.
It had submitted to the Catholic sovereigns
in the preceding year, but had since renounced its
allegiance. King Ferdinand was enraged at the
rebellion
of the inhabitants. I will make their
punishment
,
said he, a terror to others: they shall be
loyal through force, if not through faith. The place
S 2 27
was carried by storm: one hundred and eight of the
principal inhabitants were either put to the sword
or hanged on the battlements; the rest were carried
into captivity.
[37]
[37]
Pulgar, Garibay, Cura de los Palacios.
The towns of Coin and Cartama were besieged
on the same day; the first by a division of the army
led on by the marques of Cadiz, the second by
another
division commanded by Don Alonzo de
Aguilar
and Luis Fernandez Puerto Carrero, the brave
Senior of Palma. The king, with the rest of the
army, remained posted between the two places, to
render assistance to either division. The batteries
opened upon both places at the same time, and the
thunder of the lombards was mutually heard from one
camp to the other. The Moors made frequent
sallies
,
and a valiant defence; but they were
confounded
by the tremendous uproar of the batteries, and
the destruction of their walls. In the mean time, the
alarm-fires gathered together the Moorish
mountaineers
of all the Serrania, who assembled in great
numbers in the city of Monda, about a league from
Coin. They made several attempts to enter the
besieged
town, but in vain: they were each time
intercepted
and driven back by the christians, and were
reduced to gaze at a distance in despair on the
destruction
of the place. While thus situated, there
rode one day into Monda a fierce and haughty
Moorish
chieftain, at the head of a band of swarthy
African
horsemen: it was Hamet el Zegri, the fiery
spirited
alcayde of Ronda, at the head of his band of
Gomeres. He had not yet recovered from the rage
and mortification of his defeat on the banks of the
Lopera, in the disastrous foray of old Bexir, when
he had been obliged to steal back furtively to his
mountains, with the loss of the bravest of his
followers
.
He had ever since panted for revenge. He
now rode among the host of warriors assembled at
Monda. Who among you, cried he, feels pity for
the women and children of Coin, exposed to
captivity
and death? Whoever he is, let him follow me,
who am ready to die as a Moslem for the relief of
Moslems. So saying, he seized a white banner, and,
waving it over his head, rode forth from the town,
followed by the Gomeres. Many of the warriors,
roused by his words and his example, spurred
resolutely
after his banner. The people of Coin, being
prepared for this attempt, sallied forth as they saw
the white banner, and made an attack upon the
christian camp; and in the confusion of the moment,
Hamet and his followers galloped into the gates.
This reinforcement animated the besieged, and
Hamet exhorted them to hold out obstinately in
defence
of life and town. As the Gomeres were
veteran
warriors, the more they were attacked the harder
they fought.
At length, a great breach was made in the walls,
and Ferdinand, who was impatient of the resistance
of the place, ordered the duke of Naxera and the
count of Benavente to enter with their troops; and
as their forces were not sufficient, he sent word to
Luis de Cerda, duke of Medina Celi, to send a part
of his people to their assistance.
The feudal pride of the duke was roused at this
demand. Tell my lord the king, said the haughty
grandee, that I have come to succor him with my
household troops: if my people are ordered to any
place, I am to go with them; but if I am to remain
in the camp, my people must remain with me. For
the troops cannot serve without their commander,
nor their commander without his troops.
The reply of the high-spirited grandee perplexed
the cautious Ferdinand, who knew the jealous pride
of his powerful nobles. In the mean time, the
people
of the camp, having made all preparations for
the assault, were impatient to be led forward. Upon
this, Pero Ruyz de Alarcon put himself at their head,
and, seizing their mantas, or portable bulwarks, and
their other defences, they made a gallant assault, and
fought their way in at the breach. The Moors were
so overcome by the fury of their assault, that they
retreated fighting to the square of the town. Pero
Ruyz de Alarcon thought the place was carried,
when suddenly Hamet and his Gomeres came
scouring
through the streets with wild war-cries, and fell
furiously upon the christians. The latter were in their
turn beaten back, and, while attacked in front by the
Gomeres, were assailed by the inhabitants with all
kinds of missiles from their roofs and windows.
They at length gave way, and retreated through the
breach. Pero Ruyz de Alarcon still maintained his
ground in one of the principal streetsthe few cava
liers that stood by him urged him to fly: No, said
he; I came here to fight, and not to fly. He was
presently surrounded by the Gomeres; his
companions
fled for their lives; the last they saw of him, he
was covered with wounds, but still fighting
desperately
for the fame of a good cavalier.
[38]
[38]
Pulgar, part 3, cap. 42.
The resistance of the inhabitants, though aided by
the valor of the Gomeres, was of no avail. The
battering artillery of the christians demolished their
walls; combustibles were thrown into their town,
which set it on fire in various places; and they were
at length compelled to capitulate. They were
permitted
to depart with their effects, and the Gomeres
with their arms. Hamet el Zegri and his African
band sallied forth, and rode proudly through the
christian camp; nor could the Spanish cavaliers
refrain
from regarding with admiration that haughty
warrior and his devoted and dauntless followers.
The capture of Coin was accompanied by that of
Cartama: the fortifications of the latter were
repaired
and garrisoned; but Coin, being too extensive to
be defended by a moderate force, its walls were
demolished
.
The siege of these places struck such
terror
into the surrounding country, that the Moors of
many of the neighboring towns abandoned their
homes, and fled with such of their effects as they
could carry away; upon which the king gave orders
to demolish their walls and towers.
King Ferdinand now left his camp and his heavy
artillery near Cartama, and proceeded with his
lighter
troops to reconnoitre Malaga. By this time, the
secret plan of attack, arranged in the council of war
at Cordova, was known to all the world. The
vigilant
warrior El Zagal had thrown himself into the
place; he had put all the fortifications, which were
of vast strength, into a state of defence; and had
sent orders to the alcaydes of the mountain towns,
to hasten with their forces to his assistance.
The very day that Ferdinand appeared before the
place, El Zagal sallied forth to receive him, at the
head of a thousand cavalry, the choicest warriors of
Granada. A hot skirmish took place among the
gardens
and olive-trees near the city. Many were killed
on both sides; and this gave the christians a sharp
foretaste of what they might expect, if they
attempted
to besiege the place.
When the skirmish was over, the marques of
Cadiz
had a private conference with the king. He
represented
the difficulty of besieging Malaga with their
present force, especially as their plans had been
discovered
and anticipated, and the whole country was
marching over the mountains to oppose them. The
marques, who had secret intelligence from all
quarters
,
had received a letter from Juceph Xerife, a
Moor of Ronda, of christian lineage, apprizing him
of the situation of that important place and its
garrison
,
which at that moment laid it open to attack;
and the marques was urgent with the king to seize
upon this critical moment, and secure a place which
was one of the most powerful Moorish fortresses on
the frontiers, and in the hands of Hamet el Zegri
had been the scourge of Andalusia. The good
marques
had another motive for his advice, becoming of
a true and loyal knight. In the deep dungeons of
Ronda languished several of his companions in arms,
who had been captured in the defeat in the Axarquia.
To break their chains, and restore them to liberty
and light, he felt to be his peculiar duty, as one of
those who had most promoted that disastrous
enterprise
.
King Ferdinand listened to the advice of the
marques
.
He knew the importance of Ronda, which
was considered one of the keys to the kingdom of
Granada; and he was disposed to punish the
inhabitants
,
for the aid they had rendered to the garrison
of Coin. The siege of Malaga, therefore, was
abandoned
for the present, and preparations made for a
rapid and secret move against the city of Ronda.
CHAPTER XXX.
Siege of Ronda.
The
bold Hamet el Zegri, the alcayde of Ronda,
had returned sullenly to his strong-hold, after the
surrender of Coin. He had fleshed his sword in
battle with the christians, but his thirst for vengeance
was still unsatisfied. Hamet gloried in the strength
of his fortress, and the valor of his people. A fierce
and warlike populace was at his command; his
signal-fires
could summon all the warriors of the
Serrania
;
his Gomeres almost subsisted on the spoils of
Andalusia; and in the rock on which his fortress was
built, were hopeless dungeons, filled with christian
captives, who had been carried off by these
warhawks
of the mountains.
Ronda was considered as impregnable. It was
situated in the heart of wild and rugged mountains,
and perched upon an isolated rock, crested by a
strong citadel, with triple walls and towers. A deep
ravine, or rather a perpendicular chasm of the rocks,
of frightful depth, surrounded three parts of the city;
through this flowed the Rio Verde, or Green river.
There were two suburbs to the city, fortified by
walls and towers, and almost inaccessible, from the
natural asperity of the rocks. Around this rugged
city were deep rich valleys, sheltered by the
mountains
,
refreshed by constant streams, abounding with
grain and the most delicious fruits, and yielding
verdant
meadows, in which was reared a renowned
breed of horses, the best in the whole kingdom for a
foray.
Hamet el Zegri had scarcely returned to Ronda,
when he received intelligence that the christian army
was marching to the siege of Malaga, and orders
from El Zagal to send troops to his assistance.
Hamet sent a part of his garrison for that purpose;
in the mean time, he meditated an expedition to
which he was stimulated by pride and revenge. All
Andalusia was now drained of its troops; there was
an opportunity therefore for an inroad, by which he
might wipe out the disgrace of his defeat at the
battle of Lopera. Apprehending no danger to his
mountain city, now that the storm of war had passed
down into the vega of Malaga, he left but a remnant
of his garrison to man its walls, and, putting himself
at the head of his band of Gomeres, swept down
suddenly into the plains of Andalusia. He careered,
almost without resistance, over those vast campias
or pasture lands, which formed a part of the domains
of the duke of Medina Sidonia. In vain the bells
were rung, and the alarm-fires kindledthe band of
Hamet had passed by, before any force could be
assembled, and was only to be traced, like a
hurricane
,
by the devastation it had made.
Hamet regained in safety the Serrania de Ronda,
exulting in his successful inroad. The mountain
glens were filled with long droves of cattle and flocks
of sheep, from the campias of Medina Sidonia.
There were mules, too, laden with the plunder of
Vol. I. T 28
the villages; and every warrior had some costly
spoil of jewels, for his favorite mistress.
As the Zegri drew near to Ronda, he was roused
from his dream of triumph by the sound of heavy
ordnance bellowing through the mountain defiles.
His heart misgave himhe put spurs to his horse,
and galloped in advance of his lagging cavalgada.
As he proceeded, the noise of the ordnance
increased
,
echoing from cliff to cliff. Spurring his horse up
a craggy height which commanded an extensive
view, he beheld, to his consternation, the country
about Ronda white with the tents of a besieging
army. The royal standard, displayed before a proud
encampment, showed that Ferdinand himself was
present; while the incessant blaze and thunder of
artillery, and the volumes of overhanging smoke,
told the work of destruction that was going on.
The royal army had succeeded in coming upon
Ronda by surprise, during the absence of its alcayde
and most of its garrison; but its inhabitants were
warlike, and defended themselves bravely, trusting
that Hamet and his Gomeres would soon return to
their assistance.
The fancied strength of their bulwarks had been
of little avail against the batteries of the besiegers.
In the space of four days, three towers, and great
masses of the walls which defended the suburbs, were
battered down, and the suburbs taken and plundered.
Lombards and other heavy ordnance were now
levelled
at the walls of the city, and stones and missiles
of all kinds hurled into the streets. The very rock
on which the city stood shook with the thunder of
the artillery; and the christian captives, deep within
its dungeons, hailed the sound as the promise of
deliverance
.
When Hamet el Zegri beheld his city thus
surrounded
and assailed, he called upon his men to
follow
him, and make a desperate attempt to cut their
way through to its relief. They proceeded stealthily
through the mountains, until they came to the nearest
heights above the christian camp. When night fell,
and part of the army was sunk in sleep, they
descended
the rocks, and, rushing suddenly upon the
weakest part of the camp, endeavored to break their
way through and gain the city. The camp was too
strong to be forced; they were driven back to the
crags of the mountains, from whence they defended
themselves by showering down darts and stones upon
their pursuers.
Hamet now lit alarm-fires about the heights: his
standard was joined by the neighboring
mountaineers
,
and by troops from Malaga. Thus reinforced,
he made repeated assaults upon the christians,
cutting
off all stragglers from the camp. All his attempts,
however, to force his way into the city, were
fruitless
;
many of his bravest men were slain, and he
was obliged to retreat into the fastnesses of the
mountains.
In the meanwhile, the distress of Ronda was
hourly increasing. The marques of Cadiz, having
possession of the suburbs, was enabled to approach
to the very foot of the perpendicular precipice rising
from the river, on the summit of which the city is
built. At the foot of this rock is a living fountain of
limpid water, gushing into a great natural basin. A
secret mine led down from within the city to this
fountain, by several hundred steps cut in the solid
rock. From hence the city obtained its chief supply
of water; and these steps were deeply worn by the
weary feet of christian captives, employed in this
painful labor. The marques of Cadiz discovered
this subterranean passage, and directed his pioneers
to countermine in the side of the rock: they pierced
to the shaft, and, stopping it up, deprived the city
of the benefit of this precious fountain.
While the brave marques of Cadiz was thus
pressing
the siege with zeal, and glowing with the
generous
thoughts of soon delivering his companions in
arms from the Moorish dungeons, far other were the
feelings of the alcayde Hamet el Zegri. He smote
his breast and gnashed his teeth in impotent fury, as
he beheld from the mountain cliffs the destruction of
the city. Every thunder of the christian ordnance
seemed to batter against his heart. He saw tower
after tower tumbling by day, and at night the city
blazed like a volcano. They fired not merely
stones from their ordnance, says a chronicler of the
times, but likewise great balls of iron, cast in
moulds, which demolished every thing they struck.
They threw also balls of tow, steeped in pitch and
oil and gunpowder, which, when once on fire, were
not to be extinguished, and which set the houses in
flames. Great was the horror of the inhabitants:
they knew not where to fly for refuge: their houses
were in a blaze, or shattered by the ordnance; the
streets were perilous from the falling ruins and the
bounding balls, which dashed to pieces every thing
they encountered. At night, the city looked like a
fiery furnace; the cries and wailings of the women
were heard between the thunders of the ordnance,
and reached even to the Moors on the opposite
mountains, who answered them by yells of fury and
despair.
All hope of external succor being at an end, the
inhabitants of Ronda were compelled to capitulate.
Ferdinand was easily prevailed upon to grant them
favorable terms. The place was capable of longer
resistance; and he feared for the safety of his camp,
as the forces were daily augmenting on the
mountains
,
and making frequent assaults. The inhabitants
were permitted to depart with their effects, either to
Barbary or elsewhere; and those who chose to
reside
in Spain, had lands assigned them, and were
indulged
in the practice of their religion.
No sooner did the place surrender, than
detachments
were sent to attack the Moors who hovered
about the neighboring mountains. Hamet el Zegri,
however, did not remain to make a fruitless battle.
He gave up the game as lost, and retreated with his
Gomeres, filled with grief and rage, but trusting to
fortune to give him future vengeance.
The first care of the good marques of Cadiz, on
entering Ronda, was to deliver his unfortunate
companions
in arms from the dungeons of the fortress.
T 2
What a difference in their looks from the time when,
flushed with health and hope, and arrayed in military
pomp, they had sallied forth upon the mountain
foray! Many of them were almost naked, with irons
at their ankles, and beards reaching to their waists.
Their meeting with the marques was joyful; yet it
had the look of grief, for their joy was mingled with
many bitter recollections. There was an immense
number of other captives, among whom were
several
young men of noble families, who, with filial
piety, had surrendered themselves prisoners in place
of their fathers.
The captives were all provided with mules, and
sent to the queen at Cordova. The humane heart of
Isabella melted at the sight of the piteous cavalcade.
They were all supplied by her with food and
raiment
,
and money to pay their expenses to their
homes. Their chains were hung as pious trophies
against the exterior of the church of St. Juan de los
Reyes, in Toledo, where the christian traveller may
regale his eyes with the sight of them at this very
day.
Among the Moorish captives was a young infidel
maiden, of great beauty, who desired to become a
christian and to remain in Spain. She had been
inspired
with the light of the true faith, through the
ministry of a young man who had been a captive in
Ronda. He was anxious to complete his good work,
by marrying her. The queen consented to their
pious wishes, having first taken care that the young
maiden should be properly purified by the holy
sacrament of baptism.
Thus this pestilent nest of warfare and infidelity,
the city of Ronda, says the worthy Fray Antonio
Agapida, was converted to the true faith by the
thunder of our artilleryan example which was
soon followed by Casanbonela, Alarbella, and other
towns in these parts, insomuch that in the course of
this expedition no less than seventy-two places were
rescued from the vile sect of Mahomet, and placed
under the benignant domination of the cross.
CHAPTER XXXI.
How the people of Granada invited El Zagal to the
throne, and how he marched to the capital.
The
people of Granada were a versatile, unsteady
race, and exceedingly given to make and unmake
kings. They had, for a long time, vacillated between
old Muley Aben Hassan and his son Boabdil el Chico;
sometimes setting up the one, sometimes the other,
and sometimes both at once, according to the pinch
and pressure of external evils. They found,
however
,
that the evils still went on increasing, in
defiance
of every change, and were at their wits' end to
devise some new combination or arrangement, by
which an efficient government might be wrought out
of two bad kings. When the tidings arrived of the
fall of Ronda, and the consequent ruin of the
frontier
,
a tumultuous assemblage took place in one of
the public squares. As usual, the people attributed
the misfortunes of the country to the faults of their
rulers; for the populace never imagine that any part
of their miseries can originate with themselves. A
crafty alfaqui, named Alyme Mazer, who had
watched
the current of their discontents, rose and
harangued
them: You have been choosing and
changing
,
said he, between two monarchsand who
and what are they? Muley Aben Hassan, for one; a
man worn out by age and infirmities, unable to sally
forth against the foe, even when ravaging to the very
gates of the city:and Boabdil el Chico, for the
other; an apostate, a traitor, a deserter from his
throne, a fugitive among the enemies of his nation, a
man fated to misfortune, and proverbially named
`the unlucky.' In a time of overwhelming war,
like the present, he only is fit to sway a sceptre who
can wield a sword. Would you seek such a man?
You need not look far. Allah has sent such a one,
in this time of distress, to retrieve the fortunes of
Granada. You already know whom I mean. You
know that it can be no other than your general, the
invincible Abdalla, whose surname of El Zagal has
become a watch-word in battle, rousing the courage
of the faithful, and striking terror into the
unbelievers
.
The multitude received the words of the alfaqui
with acclamations; they were delighted with the
idea of a third king over Granada; and Abdalla el
Zagal being of the royal family, and already in the
virtual exercise of royal power, the measure had
nothing in it that appeared either rash or violent. A
deputation was therefore sent to El Zagal at Malaga,
inviting him to repair to Granada to receive the
crown.
El Zagal expressed great surprise and repugnance,
when the mission was announced to him; and
nothing
but his patriotic zeal for the public safety, and
his fraternal eagerness to relieve the aged Aben
Hassan from the cares of government, prevailed upon
him to accept the offer. Leaving, therefore, Rodovan
Vanegas, one of the bravest Moorish generals, in
29
command of Malaga, he departed for Granada,
attended
by three hundred trusty cavaliers.
Old Muley Aben Hassan did not wait for the
arrival
of his brother. Unable any longer to buffet
with the storms of the times, his only solicitude was
to seek some safe and quiet harbor of repose. In one
of the deep valleys which indent the Mediterranean
coast, and which are shut up on the land side by
stupendous mountains, stood the little city of
Almunecar
.
The valley was watered by the limpid river
Frio, and abounded with fruits, with grain and
pasturage
.
The city was strongly fortified, and the
garrison
and alcayde were devoted to the old monarch.
This was the place chosen by Muley Aben Hassan
for his asylum. His first care was to send thither
all his treasures; his next care was to take refuge
there himself; his third, that his sultana Zorayna,
and their two sons, should follow him.
In the mean time, Muley Abdalla el Zagal pursued
his journey towards the capital, attended by his
three hundred cavaliers. The road from Malaga to
Granada winds close by Alhama, and is dominated
by that lofty fortress. This had been a most
perilous
pass for the Moors, during the time that Alhama
was commanded by the count de Tendilla: not a
traveller could escape his eagle eye, and his garrison
was ever ready for a sally. The count de Tendilla,
however, had been relieved from this arduous post,
and it had been given in charge to Don Gutiere de
Padilla, clavero, or treasurer of the order of
Calatrava
;
an easy, indulgent man, who had with him
three hundred gallant knights of his order, besides
other mercenary troops. The garrison had fallen off
in discipline; the cavaliers were hardy in fight and
daring in foray, but confident in themselves and
negligent
of proper precautions. Just before the journey
of El Zagal, a number of these cavaliers, with
several
soldiers of fortune of the garrison, in all about
one hundred and seventy men, had sallied forth to
harass the Moorish country during its present
distracted
state, and, having ravaged the valleys of the
Sierra Nevada, or Snowy Mountains, were returning
to Alhama in gay spirits and laden with booty.
As El Zagal passed through the neighborhood of
Alhama, he recollected the ancient perils of the road,
and sent light cerradors in advance, to inspect each
rock and ravine where a foe might lurk in ambush.
One of these scouts, overlooking a narrow valley
which opened upon the road, descried a troop of
horsemen on the banks of a little stream. They
were dismounted, and had taken the bridles from
their steeds, that they might crop the fresh grass on
the banks of the river. The horsemen were
scattered
about, some reposing in the shades of rocks
and trees, others gambling for the spoil they had
taken: not a sentinel was posted to keep guard;
every thing showed the perfect security of men who
consider themselves beyond the reach of danger.
These careless cavaliers were in fact the knights
of Calatrava, with a part of their companions in
arms, returning from their foray. A part of their
force had passed on with the cavalgada; ninety of
the principal cavaliers had halted to refresh
themselves
in this valley. El Zagal smiled with ferocious
joy, when he heard of their negligent security.
Here will be trophies, said he, to grace our
entrance
into Granada.
Approaching the valley with cautious silence, he
wheeled into it at full speed at the head of his troop,
and attacked the christians so suddenly and furiously,
that they had not time to put the bridles upon their
horses, or even to leap into the saddles. They made
a confused but valiant defence, fighting among the
rocks, and in the rugged bed of the river. Their
defence was useless; seventy-nine were slain, and
the remaining eleven were taken prisoners.
A party of the Moors galloped in pursuit of the
cavalgada: they soon overtook it, winding slowly up
a hill. The horsemen who conveyed it, perceiving
the enemy at a distance, made their escape, and left
the spoil to be retaken by the Moors. El Zagal
gathered together his captives and his booty, and
proceeded, elate with success, to Granada.
He paused before the gate of Elvira, for as yet he
had not been proclaimed king. This ceremony was
immediately performed; for the fame of his recent
exploit had preceded him, and had intoxicated the
minds of the giddy populace. He entered Granada
in a sort of triumph. The eleven captive knights of
Calatrava walked in front: next were paraded the
ninety captured steeds, bearing the armor and
weapons
of their late owners, and led by as many
mounted Moors: then came seventy Moorish horse
men, with as many christian heads hanging at their
saddle-bows: Muley Abdalla el Zagal followed,
surrounded
by a number of distinguished cavaliers
splendidly attired; and the pageant was closed by a
long cavalgada of the flocks and herds, and other
booty, recovered from the christians.
[39]
[39]
Zurita, lib. 20. c. 62. Mariana, Hist. de Espaa. Abarca,
Anales de Aragon.
The populace gazed with almost savage triumph
at these captive cavaliers and the gory heads of
their companions, knowing them to have been
part of the formidable garrison of Alhama, so long
the scourge of Granada and the terror of the vega.
They hailed this petty triumph as an auspicious
opening of the reign of their new monarch; for
several days, the names of Muley Aben Hassan and
Boabdil el Chico were never mentioned but with
contempt, and the whole city resounded with the
praises of El Zagal, or the valiant.
Vol. I. U
CHAPTER XXXII.
How the Count de Cabra attempted to capture another
King, and how he fared in his attempt.
The
elevation of a bold and active veteran to the
throne of Granada, in place of its late bedridden king,
made an important difference in the aspect of the
war, and called for some blow that should dash the
confidence of the Moors in their new monarch, and
animate the christians to fresh exertions.
Don Diego de Cordova, the brave count de Cabra,
was at this time in his castle of Vaena, where he kept
a wary eye upon the frontier. It was now the latter
part of August, and he grieved that the summer should
pass away without an inroad into the country of the
foe. He sent out his scouts on the prowl, and they
brought him word that the important post of Moclin
was but weakly garrisoned. This was a castellated
town, strongly situated upon a high mountain, partly
surrounded by thick forests, and partly girdled by a
river. It defended one of the rugged and solitary
passes, by which the christians were wont to make
their inroads; insomuch that the Moors, in their
figurative way, denominated it the shield of Granada.
The count de Cabra sent word to the monarchs
of the feeble state of the garrison, and gave it as his
opinion, that, by a secret and rapid expedition, the
place might be surprised. King Ferdinand asked
the advice of his counsellors. Some cautioned him
against the sanguine temperament of the count, and
his heedlessness of danger; Moclin, they observed,
was near to Granada, and might be promptly
reinforced
.
The opinion of the count, however,
prevailed
;
the king considering him almost infallible, in
matters of border warfare, since his capture of
Boabdil
el Chico.
The king departed, therefore, from Cordova, and
took post at Alcala la Real, for the purpose of being
near to Moclin. The queen, also, proceeded to
Vaena, accompanied by her children, prince Juan
and the princess Isabella, and her great counsellor
in all matters, public and private, spiritual and
temporal
,
the venerable grand cardinal of Spain.
Nothing could exceed the pride and satisfaction
of the loyal count de Cabra, when he saw this stately
train winding along the dreary mountain roads, and
entering the gates of Vaena. He received his royal
guests with all due ceremony, and lodged them in
the best apartments that the warrior castle afforded,
being the same that had formerly been occupied by
the royal captive Boabdil.
King Ferdinand had concerted a wary plan, to
insure
the success of the enterprise. The count de
Cabra and Don Martin Alonzo de Montemayor were
to set forth with their troops, so as to reach Moclin
by a certain hour, and to intercept all who should
attempt to enter, or should sally from the town. The
Master of Calatrava, the troops of the grand cardinal,
commanded by the count of Buendia, and the forces
of the bishop of Jaen, led by that belligerent prelate,
amounting in all to four thousand horse and six
thousand
foot, were to set off in time to co-operate with
the count de Cabra, so as to surround the town. The
king was to follow with his whole force, and encamp
before the place.
And here the worthy padre Fray Antonio Agapida
breaks forth into a triumphant eulogy of the pious
prelates, who thus mingled personally in these scenes
of warfare. As this was a holy crusade (says he)
undertaken for the advancement of the faith and the
glory of the church, so was it always countenanced
and upheld by saintly men: for the victories of their
most Catholic majesties were not followed, like those
of mere worldly sovereigns, by erecting castles and
towers, and appointing alcaydes and garrisons; but
by the founding of convents and cathedrals, and the
establishment of wealthy bishoprics. Wherefore their
majesties were always surrounded, in court or camp,
in the cabinet or in the field, by a crowd of ghostly
advisers, inspiriting them to the prosecution of this
most righteous war. Nay, the holy men of the church
did not scruple, at times, to buckle on the cuirass over
the cassock, to exchange the crosier for the lance,
and thus, with corporal hands and temporal weapons,
to fight the good fight of the faith.
But to return from this rhapsody of the worthy
friar. The count de Cabra, being instructed in the
complicated arrangements of the king, marched forth
at midnight to execute them punctually. He led his
troops by the little river that winds below Vaena,
and so up the wild defiles of the mountains, marching
all night, and stopping only in the heat of the
following
day, to repose under the shadowy cliffs of a deep
barranca, calculating to arrive at Moclin exactly in
time to co-operate with the other forces.
The troops had scarcely stretched themselves on
the earth to take repose, when a scout arrived,
bringing word that El Zagal had suddenly sallied
out of Granada with a strong force, and had
encamped
in the vicinity of Moclin. It was plain that the
wary Moor had received information of the intended
attack. This, however, was not the idea that
presented
itself to the mind of the count de Cabra. He
had captured one kinghere was a fair opportunity
to secure another. What a triumph, to lodge another
captive monarch in his castle of Vaena!what a
prisoner to deliver into the hands of his royal
mistress
!
Fired with the thoughts, the good count forgot
all the arrangements of the king; or rather, blinded
by former success, he trusted every thing to courage
and fortune, and thought that, by one bold swoop, he
might again bear off the royal prize, and wear his
laurels without competition.
[40]
[40]
Mariana, lib. 25. c. 17. Abarca, Zurita, &c.
His only fear was
that the Master of Calatrava, and the belligerent
bishop, might come up in time to share the glory of
the victory; so, ordering every one to horse, this
hot-spirited cavalier pushed on for Moclin, without
allowing his troops the necessary time for repose.
The evening closed, as the count arrived in the
U 2 30
neighborhood of Moclin. It was the full of the moon,
and a bright and cloudless night. The count was
marching through one of those deep valleys or ravines,
worn in the Spanish mountains by the brief but
tremendous
torrents which prevail during the autumnal
rains. It was walled on each side by lofty and
almost
perpendicular cliffs, but great masses of
moonlight
were thrown into the bottom of the glen,
glittering
on the armor of the shining squadrons, as they
silently passed through it. Suddenly the war-cry of
the Moors rose in various parts of the valley; El
Zagal! El Zagal! was shouted from every cliff,
accompanied
by showers of missiles, that struck down
several of the christian warriors. The count lifted
up his eyes, and beheld, by the light of the moon,
every cliff glistening with Moorish soldiery. The
deadly shower fell thickly round him, and the shining
armor of his followers made them fair objects for the
aim of the enemy. The count saw his brother
Gonzalo
struck dead by his side; his own horse sunk
under him, pierced by four Moorish lances; and he
received a wound in the hand from an arquebuss.
He remembered the horrible massacre of the
mountains
of Malaga, and feared a similar catastrophe.
There was no time to pause. His brother's horse,
freed from his slaughtered rider, was running at
large; seizing the reins, he sprang into the saddle,
called upon his men to follow him, and, wheeling
round, retreated out of the fatal valley.
The Moors, rushing down from the heights,
pursued
the retreating christians. The chase endured
for a league, but it was a league of rough and broken
road, where the christians had to turn and fight at
almost every step. In these short but fierce combats,
the enemy lost many cavaliers of note; but the loss
of the christians was infinitely more grievous,
comprising
numbers of the noblest warriors of Vaena and
its vicinity. Many of the christians, disabled by
wounds or exhausted by fatigue, turned aside and
endeavored to conceal themselves among rocks and
thickets, but never more rejoined their companions,
being slain or captured by the Moors, or perishing in
their wretched retreats.
The arrival of the troops, led by the Master of
Calatrava and the bishop of Jaen, put an end to the
route. El Zagal contented himself with the laurels
he had gained, and, ordering the trumpets to call off
his men from the pursuit, returned in great triumph
to Moclin.
[41]
[41]
Zurita, lib. 20. c. 4. Pulgar, Cronica.
Queen Isabella was at Vaena, awaiting with great
anxiety the result of the expedition. She was in a
stately apartment of the castle, looking towards the
road that winds through the mountains from Moclin,
and regarding the watch-towers that crowned the
neighboring heights, in hopes of favorable signals.
The prince and princess, her children, were with
her, and her venerable counsellor the grand cardinal.
All shared in the anxiety of the moment. At length
couriers were seen riding toward the town. They
entered its gates, but before they reached the castle,
the nature of their tidings was known to the queen,
by the shrieks and wailings that rose from the streets
below. The messengers were soon followed by
wounded fugitives, hastening home to be relieved, or
to die among their friends and families. The whole
town resounded with lamentations; for it had lost
the flower of its youth, and its bravest warriors.
Isabella was a woman of courageous soul, but her
feelings were overpowered by the spectacle of wo
which presented itself on every side; her maternal
heart mourned over the death of so many loyal
subjects
,
who so shortly before had rallied round her
with devoted affection; and, losing her usual
self-command
,
she sunk into deep despondency.
In this gloomy state of mind, a thousand
apprehensions
crowded upon her. She dreaded the confidence
which this success would impart to the Moors: she
feared also for the important fortress of Alhama, the
garrison of which had not been reinforced, since its
foraging party had been cut off by this same El
Zagal. On every side the queen saw danger and
disaster, and feared that a general reverse was about
to attend the Castilian arms.
The grand cardinal comforted her with both
spiritual
and worldly counsel. He told her to recollect
that no country was ever conquered without
occasional
reverses to the conquerors; that the Moors
were a warlike people, fortified in a rough and
mountainous country, where they never could be
conquered by her ancestors,and that in fact her
armies had already, in three years, taken more cities
than those of any of her predecessors had been able
to do in twelve. He concluded by offering himself
to take the field, with three thousand cavalry, his
own retainers, paid and maintained by himself, and
either hasten to the relief of Alhama, or undertake
any other expedition her majesty might command.
The discreet words of the cardinal soothed the spirit
of the queen, who always looked to him for
consolation
;
and she soon recovered her usual equanimity.
Some of the counsellors of Isabella, of that politic
class who seek to rise by the faults of others, were
loud in their censures of the rashness of the count.
The queen defended him, with prompt generosity.
The enterprise, said she, was rash, but not more
rash than that of Lucena, which was crowned with
success, and which we have all applauded as the
height of heroism. Had the count de Cabra
succeeded
in capturing the uncle, as he did the nephew,
who is there that would not have praised him to the
skies?
The magnanimous words of the queen put a stop
to all invidious remarks in her presence; but certain
of the courtiers, who had envied the count the glory
gained by his former achievements, continued to
magnify, among themselves, his present imprudence;
and we are told by Fray Antonio Agapida, that they
sneeringly gave the worthy cavalier the appellation
of count de Cabra, the king-catcher.
Ferdinand had reached the place on the frontier
called the Fountain of the King, within three leagues
of Moclin, when he heard of the late disaster. He
greatly lamented the precipitation of the count, but
forbore to express himself with severity, for he knew
the value of that loyal and valiant cavalier.
[42]
[42]
Abarca, Anales de Aragon.
He
held a council of war, to determine what course was
to be pursued. Some of his cavaliers advised him to
abandon the attempt upon Moclin, the place being
strongly reinforced, and the enemy inspirited by his
recent victory. Certain old Spanish hidalgos
reminded
him that he had but few Castilian troops in
his army, without which staunch soldiery his
predecessors
never presumed to enter the Moorish
territory
;
while others remonstrated that it would be
beneath the dignity of the king to retire from an
enterprise
,
on account of the defeat of a single cavalier
and his retainers. In this way the king was
distracted
by a multitude of counsellors, when fortunately a
letter from the queen put an end to his perplexities.
Proceed we, in the next chapter, to relate what was
the purport of that letter.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
Expedition against the Castles of Cambil and Albahar.
Happy
are those princes, exclaims the worthy
padre Fray Antonio Agapida, who have women
and priests to advise them, for in these dwelleth the
spirit of counsel. While Ferdinand and his captains
were confounding each other in their deliberations
at the Fountain of the King, a quiet but deep little
council of war was held in the state apartment of
the old castle of Vaena, between queen Isabella, the
venerable Pedro Gonzalez de Mendoza, grand
cardinal
of Spain, and Don Garcia Osorio, the
belligerent
bishop of Jaen. This last worthy prelate, who
had exchanged his mitre for a helm, no sooner beheld
the defeat of the enterprise against Moclin, than he
turned the reins of his sleek, stall-fed steed, and
hastened back to Vaena, full of a project for the
employment
of the army, the advancement of the faith,
and the benefit of his own diocese. He knew that
the actions of the king were influenced by the
opinions
of the queen, and that the queen always inclined
a listening ear to the counsels of saintly men: he laid
his plans, therefore, with the customary wisdom of
his cloth, to turn the ideas of the queen into the
proper channel; and this was the purport of the
worthy bishop's suggestions.
The bishopric of Jaen had for a long time been
harassed by two Moorish castles, the scourge and
terror of all that part of the country. They were
situated on the frontiers of the kingdom of Granada,
about four leagues from Jaen, in a deep, narrow,
and rugged valley, surrounded by lofty mountains.
Through this valley runs the Rio Frio, (or Cold
river,) in a deep channel, worn between high
precipitous
banks. On each side of the stream rise two
vast rocks, nearly perpendicular, within a
stone'sthrow
of each other; blocking up the gorge of the
valley. On the summits of these rocks stood the two
formidable castles Cambil and Albahar, fortified with
battlements and towers of great height and thickness.
They were connected together by a bridge, thrown
from rock to rock across the river. The road, which
passed through the valley, traversed this bridge, and
was completely commanded by these castles. They
stood like two giants of romance, guarding the pass,
and dominating the valley.
The kings of Granada, knowing the importance
of these castles, kept them always well garrisoned,
and victualled to stand a siege, with fleet steeds and
hard riders, to forage the country of the christians.
The warlike race of the Abencerrages, the troops
of the royal household, and others of the choicest
chivalry of Granada, made them their strong-holds,
or posts of arms, from whence to sally forth on those
predatory and roving enterprises, which were the
delight of the Moorish cavaliers. As the wealthy
bishopric of Jaen lay immediately at hand, it suffered
more peculiarly from these marauders. They drove
off the fat beeves and the flocks of sheep from the
pastures, and swept the laborers from the field; they
scoured the country to the very gates of Jaen, so
that the citizens could not venture from their walls,
without the risk of being borne off captive to the
dungeons of these castles.
The worthy bishop, like a good pastor, beheld with
grief of heart his fat bishopric daily waxing leaner
and leaner, and poorer and poorer; and his holy ire
was kindled at the thoughts that the possessions of
the church should thus be at the mercy of a crew of
infidels. It was the urgent counsel of the bishop,
therefore, that the military force, thus providentially
assembled in the neighborhood, since it was
apparently
foiled in its attempt upon Moclin, should be
turned against these insolent castles, and the country
delivered from their domination. The grand cardinal
supported the suggestion of the bishop, and declared
that he had long meditated the policy of a measure
of the kind. Their united opinions found favor with
the queen, and she dispatched a letter on the subject
to the king. It came just in time to relieve him from
the distraction of a multitude of counsellors, and he
immediately undertook the reduction of those castles.
The marques of Cadiz was accordingly sent in
advance
,
with two thousand horse, to keep a watch
upon the garrisons, and prevent all entrance or exit,
until the king should arrive with the main army and
the battering artillery. The queen, to be near at
hand in case of need, moved her quarters to the city
Vol. I. X 31
of Jaen, where she was received with martial honors
by the belligerent bishop, who had buckled on his
cuirass and girded on his sword, to fight in the cause
of his diocese.
In the mean time, the marques of Cadiz arrived in
the valley, and completely shut up the Moors within
their walls. The castles were under the command
of Mahomet Lentin Ben Usef, an Abencerrage, and
one of the bravest cavaliers of Granada. In his
garrisons
were many troops of the fierce African tribe
of Gomeres. Mahomet Lentin, confident in the
strength of his fortresses, smiled as he looked down
from his battlements upon the christian cavalry,
perplexed
in the rough and narrow valley. He sent
forth skirmishing parties to harass them, and there
were many sharp combats between small parties and
single knights; but the Moors were driven back to
their castles, and all attempts to send intelligence of
their situation to Granada, were frustrated by the
vigilance of the marques of Cadiz.
At length the legions of the royal army came
pouring
,
with vaunting trumpet and fluttering banner,
along the defiles of the mountains. They halted
before
the castles, but the king could not find room in
the narrow and rugged valley to form his camp: he
had to divide it into three parts, which were posted
on different heights; and his tents whitened the sides
of the neighboring hills. When the encampment was
formed, the army remained gazing idly at the castles.
The artillery was upwards of four leagues in the rear,
and without artillery all attack would be in vain.
The alcayde Mahomet Lentin knew the nature of
the road by which the artillery had to be brought.
It was merely a narrow and rugged path, at times
scaling almost perpendicular crags and precipices,
up which it was utterly impossible for wheel
carriages
to pass; neither was it in the power of man or
beast to draw up the lombards, and other ponderous
ordnance. He felt assured, therefore, that they never
could be brought to the camp; and, without their
aid, what could the christians effect against his
rockbuilt
castles? He scoffed at them therefore, as he saw
their tents by day and their fires by night covering
the surrounding heights. Let them linger here a
little while longer, said he, and the autumnal
torrents
will wash them from the mountains.
While the alcayde was thus closely mewed up
within his walls, and the christians remained inactive
in their camp, he noticed, one calm autumnal day,
the sound of implements of labor echoing among the
mountains, and now and then the crash of a falling
tree, or a thundering report, as if some rock had
been heaved from its bed and hurled into the valley.
The alcayde was on the battlements of his castle,
surrounded by his knights. Methinks, said he,
these christians are making war upon the rocks
and trees of the mountains, since they find our castles
unassailable.
The sounds did not cease even during the night:
every now and then, the Moorish sentinel, as he
paced the battlements, heard some crash echoing
among the heights. The return of day explained the
mystery. Scarcely did the sun shine against the
summits of the mountains, than shouts burst from the
cliffs opposite to the castles, and were answered
from the camp, with joyful sound of kettle-drums
and trumpets.
The astonished Moors lifted up their eyes, and
beheld, as it were, a torrent of war breaking out of
a narrow defile. There was a multitude of men,
with pickaxes, spades, and bars of iron, clearing
away every obstacle; while behind them slowly
moved along great teams of oxen, dragging heavy
ordnance, and all the munitions of battering artillery.
What cannot women and priests effect, when
they unite in council? exclaims again the worthy
Antonio Agapida. The queen had held another
consultation
with the grand cardinal and the belligerent
bishop of Jaen. It was clear that the heavy ordnance
could never be conveyed to the camp by the regular
road of the country; and without battering artillery,
nothing could be effected. It was suggested,
however
,
by the zealous bishop, that another road might
be opened, through a more practicable part of the
mountains. It would be an undertaking extravagant
and chimerical, with ordinary means; and, therefore,
unlooked for by the enemy: but what could not
kings effect, who had treasures and armies at
command
?
The project struck the enterprising spirit of the
queen. Six thousand men, with pickaxes, crowbars,
and every other necessary implement, were set to
work day and night, to break a road through the
very centre of the mountains. No time was to be
lost, for it was rumored that El Zagal was about to
march with a mighty host to the relief of the castles.
The bustling bishop of Jaen acted as pioneer, to
mark the route and superintend the laborers; and
the grand cardinal took care that the work should
never languish through lack of means.
[43]
[43]
Zurita, Anales de Aragon, lib. 20. c. 64. Pulgar, part 3, cap. 51.
When kings' treasures, says Fray Antonio
Agapida
,
are dispensed by priestly hands, there is no
stint, as the glorious annals of Spain bear witness.
Under the guidance of these ghostly men, it seemed
as if miracles were effected. Almost an entire
mountain
was levelled, valleys filled up, trees hewn down,
rocks broken and overturned; in short, all the
obstacles
which nature had heaped around, entirely
and promptly vanished. In little more than twelve
days, this gigantic work was effected, and the
ordnance
dragged to the camp, to the great triumph of
the christians and confusion of the Moors.
Idem.
No sooner was the heavy artillery arrived, than it
was mounted, in all haste, upon the neighboring
heights: Francisco Ramirez de Madrid, the first
engineer
in Spain, superintended the batteries, and soon
opened a destructive fire upon the castles.
When the valiant alcayde, Mahomet Lentin, found
his towers tumbling about him, and his bravest men
dashed from the walls, without the power of
inflicting
a wound upon the foe, his haughty spirit was
X 2
greatly exasperated. Of what avail, said he,
bitterly
,
is all the prowess of knighthood against these
cowardly engines, that murder from afar?
For a whole day, a tremendous fire kept
thundering
upon the castle of Albahar. The lombards
discharged
large stones, which demolished two of the
towers, and all the battlements which guarded the
portal. If any Moors attempted to defend the walls
or repair the breaches, they were shot down by
ribadoquines
,
and other small pieces of artillery. The
christian soldiery issued forth from the camp, under
cover of this fire; and, approaching the castles,
discharged flights of arrows and stones through the
openings made by the ordnance.
At length, to bring the siege to a conclusion,
Francisco
Ramirez elevated some of the heaviest artillery
on a mount that rose in form of a cone or pyramid,
on the side of the river near to Albahar, and
commanded
both castles. This was an operation of great
skill and excessive labor, but it was repaid by
complete
success; for the Moors did not dare to wait
until this terrible battery should discharge its fury.
Satisfied that all further resistance was vain, the
valiant alcayde made signal for a parley. The
articles of capitulation were soon arranged. The
alcayde and his garrisons were permitted to return
in safety to the city of Granada, and the castles were
delivered into the possession of king Ferdinand, on
the day of the festival of St. Matthew, in the month
of September. They were immediately repaired,
strongly garrisoned, and delivered in charge to the
city of Jaen.
The effects of this triumph were immediately
apparent
.
Quiet and security once more settled upon
the bishopric. The husbandmen tilled their fields in
peace, the herds and flocks fattened unmolested in
the pastures, and the vineyards yielded corpulent
skinsful of rosy wine. The good bishop enjoyed, in
the gratitude of his people, the approbation of his
conscience, the increase of his revenues, and the
abundance of his table, a reward for all his toils and
perils. This glorious victory, exclaims Fray
Antonio
Agapida, achieved by such extraordinary
management and infinite labor, is a shining example
of what a bishop can effect, for the promotion of the
faith and the good of his diocese.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
Enterprise of the knights of Calatrava against Zalea.
While
these events were taking place on the
northern frontier of the kingdom of Granada, the
important fortress of Alhama was neglected, and its
commander, Don Gutiere de Padilla, clavero of
Calatrava, reduced to great perplexity. The
remnant
of the foraging party, which had been surprised
and massacred by the fierce El Zagal when on his
way to Granada to receive the crown, had returned
in confusion and dismay to the fortress. They could
only speak of their own disgrace, being obliged to
abandon their cavalgada, and to fly, pursued by a
superior force: of the flower of their party, the
gallant knights of Calatrava, who had remained
behind
in the valley, they knew nothing. A few days
cleared up all the mystery of their fate: tidings were
brought that their bloody heads had been borne in
triumph into Granada by the ferocious El Zagal.
The surviving knights of Calatrava, who formed a
part of the garrison, burned to revenge the death of
their comrades, and to wipe out the stigma of this
defeat; but the clavero had been rendered cautious
by disaster,he resisted all their entreaties for a
foray. His garrison was weakened by the loss of so
many of its bravest men; the vega was patrolled by
numerous and powerful squadrons, sent forth by the
warlike El Zagal; above all, the movements of the
garrison were watched by the warriors of Zalea, a
strong town, only two leagues distant, on the road
towards Loxa. This place was a continual check
upon Alhama when in its most powerful state, placing
ambuscades to entrap the christian cavaliers in the
course of their sallies. Frequent and bloody
skirmishes
had taken place, in consequence; and the
troops of Alhama, when returning from their forays,
had often to fight their way back through the
squadrons
of Zalea. Thus surrounded by dangers, Don
Gutiere de Padilla restrained the eagerness of his
troops for a sally, knowing that any additional
disaster
might be followed by the loss of Alhama.
In the meanwhile, provisions began to grow scarce;
they were unable to forage the country as usual for
supplies, and depended for relief upon the Castilian
sovereigns. The defeat of the count de Cabra filled
the measure of their perplexities, as it interrupted
the intended reinforcements and supplies. To such
extremity were they reduced, that they were
compelled
to kill some of their horses for provisions.
The worthy clavero, Don Gutiere de Padilla, was
pondering one day on this gloomy state of affairs,
when a Moor was brought before him who had
surrendered
himself at the gate of Alhama, and claimed
an audience. Don Gutiere was accustomed to visits
of the kind from renegado Moors, who roamed the
country as spies and adalides; but the countenance
of this man was quite unknown to him. He had a
box strapped to his shoulders, containing divers
articles
32
of traffic, and appeared to be one of those
itinerant traders, who often resorted to Alhama and
the other garrison towns, under pretext of vending
trivial merchandise, such as amulets, perfumes, and
trinkets, but who often produced rich shawls, golden
chains and necklaces, and valuable gems and jewels.
The Moor requested a private conference with
the clavero: I have a precious jewel, said he, to
dispose of.
I want no jewels, replied Don Gutiere.
For the sake of him who died on the cross, the
great prophet of your faith, said the Moor, solemnly,
refuse not my request; the jewel I speak of you
alone can purchase, but I can only treat about it in
secret.
Don Gutiere perceived there was something
hidden
under these mystic and figurative terms, in which
the Moors were often accustomed to talk. He
motioned
to his attendants to retire. When they were
alone, the Moor looked cautiously round the
apartment
,
and then, approaching close to the knight,
demanded
in a low voice, What will you give me, if I
deliver the fortress of Zalea into your hands?
Don Gutiere looked with surprise at the humble
individual that made such a suggestion.
What means have you, said he, of effecting
such a proposition?
I have a brother in the garrison of Zalea,
replied
the Moor, who, for a proper compensation,
would admit a body of troops into the citadel.
Don Gutiere turned a scrutinizing eye upon the
Moor. What right have I to believe, said he,
that thou wilt be truer to me, than to those of thy
blood and thy religion?
I renounce all ties to them, either of blood or
religion, replied the Moor; my mother was a
christian captive; her country shall henceforth be
my country, and her faith my faith.
[44]
[44]
Cura de los Palacios.
The doubts of Don Gutiere were not dispelled by
this profession of mongrel christianity. Granting
the sincerity of thy conversion, said he, art thou
under no obligations of gratitude or duty to the
alcayde
of the fortress thou wouldst betray?
The eyes of the Moor flashed fire at the words;
he gnashed his teeth with fury. The alcayde,
cried he, is a dog! He has deprived my brother
of his just share of booty; he has robbed me of my
merchandise, treated me worse than a Jew when I
murmured at his injustice, and ordered me to be
thrust forth ignominiously from his walls. May the
curse of God fall upon my head, if I rest content
until I have full revenge!
Enough, said Don Gutiere; I trust more to
thy revenge than thy religion.
The good clavero called a council of his officers.
The knights of Calatrava were unanimous for the
enterprisezealous to appease the manes of their
slaughtered comrades. Don Gutiere reminded them
of the state of the garrison, enfeebled by their late
loss, and scarcely sufficient for the defence of the
walls. The cavaliers replied, that there was no
achievement without risk, and that there would have
been no great actions recorded in history, had there
not been daring spirits ready to peril life to gain
renown.
Don Gutiere yielded to the wishes of his knights,
for to have resisted any further might have drawn on
him the imputation of timidity: he ascertained by
trusty spies that every thing in Zalea remained in
the usual state, and he made all the requisite
arrangements
for the attack.
When the appointed night arrived, all the
cavaliers
were anxious to engage in the enterprise; but
the individuals were decided by lot. They set out,
under the guidance of the Moor; and when they had
arrived in the vicinity of Zalea, they bound his hands
behind his back, and their leader pledged his knightly
word to strike him dead, on the first sign of
treachery
.
He then bade him to lead the way.
It was near midnight, when they reached the walls
of the fortress. They passed silently along until they
found themselves below the citadel. Here their
guide made a low and preconcerted signal: it was
answered from above, and a cord let down from the
wall. The knights attached to it a ladder, which was
drawn up and fastened. Gutiere Muoz was the
first that mounted, followed by Pedro de Alvanado,
both brave and hardy soldiers. A handful succeeded:
they were attacked by a party of guards, but held
them at bay until more of their comrades ascended;
with their assistance, they gained possession of a
tower and part of the wall. The garrison, by this
time, was aroused; but before they could reach the
scene of action, most of the cavaliers were within
the battlements. A bloody contest raged for about
an hourseveral of the christians were slain, but
many of the Moors; at length the whole citadel was
carried, and the town submitted without resistance.
Thus did the gallant knights of Calatrava gain the
strong town of Zalea with scarcely any loss, and
atone for the inglorious defeat of their companions
by El Zagal. They found the magazines of the
place well stored with provisions, and were enabled
to carry a seasonable supply to their own famishing
garrison.
The tidings of this event reached the sovereigns,
just after the surrender of Cambil and Albahar.
They were greatly rejoiced at this additional success
of their arms, and immediately sent strong
reinforcements
and ample supplies for both Alhama and Zalea.
They then dismissed the army for the winter.
Ferdinand
and Isabella retired to Alcala de Henares,
where the queen, on the 16th of December, 1485,
gave birth to the princess Catharine, afterwards wife
of Henry VIII. of England. Thus prosperously
terminated the checkered campaign of this
important
year.
Vol. I. Y
CHAPTER XXXV.
Death of Muley Aben Hassan.
Muley Abdalla El Zagal
had been received with
great acclamations at Granada, on his return from
defeating the count de Cabra. He had endeavored
to turn his victory to the greatest advantage, with his
subjects; giving tilts and tournaments, and other
public
festivities, in which the Moors delighted. The
loss of the castles of Cambil and Albahar, and of the
fortress of Zalea, however, checked this sudden tide
of popularity; and some of the fickle populace began
to doubt whether they had not been rather
precipitate
in deposing his brother, Muley Aben Hassan.
That superannuated monarch remained in his
faithful town of Almunecar, on the border of the
Mediterranean, surrounded by a few adherents,
together
with his wife Zorayna and his children; and
he had all his treasures safe in his possession. The
fiery heart of the old king was almost burnt out, and
all his powers of doing either harm or good seemed
at an end.
While in this passive and helpless state, his brother
El Zagal manifested a sudden anxiety for his health.
He had him removed, with all tenderness and care,
to Salobrea, another fortress on the Mediterranean
coast, famous for its pure and salubrious air; and
the alcayde, who was a devoted adherent to El Zagal,
was charged to have especial care that nothing was
wanting to the comfort and solace of his brother.
Salobrea was a small town, situated on a lofty
and rocky hill, in the midst of a beautiful and
fertile
vega, shut up on three sides by mountains, and
opening on the fourth to the Mediterranean. It was
protected by strong walls and a powerful castle, and,
being deemed impregnable, was often used by the
Moorish kings as a place of deposit for their
treasures
.
They were accustomed also to assign it as a
residence for such of their sons and brothers as
might endanger the security of their reign. Here
the princes lived, in luxurious repose: they had
delicious
gardens, perfumed baths, a harem of beauties
at their commandnothing was denied them but the
liberty to depart; that alone was wanting to render
this abode an earthly paradise.
Such was the delightful place appointed by El
Zagal for the residence of his brother; but,
notwithstanding
its wonderful salubrity, the old monarch had
not been removed thither many days before he
expired
.
There was nothing extraordinary in his death:
life with him had long been glimmering in the socket,
and for some time past he might rather have been
numbered with the dead than with the living. The
public, however, are fond of seeing things in a
sinister
and mysterious point of view, and there were
many dark surmises as to the cause of this event.
El Zagal acted in a manner to heighten these
suspicions
:
he caused the treasures of his deceased
brother to be packed on mules and brought to Gra
nada, where he took possession of them, to the
exclusion
of the children of Aben Hassan. The
sultana
Zorayna and her two sons were lodged in the
Alhambra, in the tower of the Cimares. This was a
residence in a palacebut it had proved a royal
prison to the sultana Ayxa la Horra, and her youthful
son Boabdil. There the unhappy Zorayna had time
to meditate upon the disappointment of all those
ambitious schemes for herself and children, for which
she had stained her conscience with so many crimes,
and induced her cruel husband to imbrue his hands
in the blood of his other offspring.
The corpse of old Muley Aben Hassan was also
brought to Granada, not in state becoming the
remains
of a once-powerful sovereign, but transported
on a mule, like the corpse of the poorest peasant. It
received no honor or ceremonial from El Zagal, and
appears to have been interred obscurely, to prevent
any popular sensation; and it is recorded by an
ancient
and faithful chronicler of the time, that the
body of the old monarch was deposited by two
christian captives in his osario or charnel-house.
[45]
[45]
Cura de los Palacios, c. 77.
Such was the end of the turbulent Muley Aben
Hassan, who, after passing his life in constant
contests
for empire, could scarce gain quiet admission
into the corner of a sepulchre.
No sooner were the populace well assured that
old Muley Aben Hassan was dead, and beyond
recovery
,
than they all began to extol his memory and
deplore his loss. They admitted that he had been
fierce and cruel, but then he had been brave; he
had, to be sure, pulled this war upon their heads,
but he had likewise been crushed by it. In a word,
he was dead;
and his death atoned for every fault;
for a king, recently dead, is generally either a hero
or a saint.
In proportion as they ceased to hate old Muley
Aben Hassan, they began to hate his brother El
Zagal
.
The circumstances of the old king's death, the
eagerness to appropriate his treasures, the scandalous
neglect of his corpse, and the imprisonment of his
sultana and children, all filled the public mind with
gloomy suspicions; and the epithet of Fratracide!
was sometimes substituted for that of El Zagal, in
the low murmurings of the people.
As the public must always have some object to
like as well as to hate, there began once more to be
an inquiry after their fugitive king, Boabdil el Chico.
That unfortunate monarch was still at Cordova,
existing
on the cool courtesy and meagre friendship of
Ferdinand; which had waned exceedingly, ever
since Boabdil had ceased to have any influence in
his late dominions. The reviving interest expressed
in his fate by the Moorish public, and certain secret
overtures made to him, once more aroused the
sympathy
of Ferdinand: he immediately advised Boabdil
again to set up his standard within the frontiers of
Granada, and furnished him with money and means
for the purpose. Boabdil advanced but a little way
into his late territories; he took up his post at Velez
Y 2 33
el Blanco, a strong town on the confines of Murcia;
there he established the shadow of a court, and
stood, as it were, with one foot over the border, and
ready to draw that back upon the least alarm. His
presence in the kingdom, however, and his
assumption
of royal state, gave life to his faction in Granada.
The inhabitants of the Albaycin, the poorest but
most warlike part of the populace, were generally
in his favor: the more rich, courtly, and
aristocratical
inhabitants of the quarter of the Alhambra,
rallied
round what appeared to be the most stable
authority, and supported the throne of El Zagal. So
it is, in the admirable order of sublunary affairs:
every thing seeks its kind; the rich befriend the rich,
the powerful stand by the powerful, the poor enjoy
the patronage of the poorand thus a universal
harmony prevails.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
Of the Christian army which assembled at the city of
Cordova.
Great
and glorious was the style with which the
Catholic sovereigns opened another year's campaign
of this eventful war. It was like commencing
another
act of a stately and heroic drama, where the
curtain rises to the inspiring sound of martial melody,
and the whole stage glitters with the array of
warriors
and the pomp of arms. The ancient city of
Cordova was the place appointed by the sovereigns
for the assemblage of the troops; and early in the
spring of 1436, the fair valley of the Guadalquivir
resounded with the shrill blast of trumpet, and the
impatient neighing of the war-horse. In this
splendid
era of Spanish chivalry, there was a rivalship
among the nobles who most should distinguish
himself
by the splendor of his appearance, and the
number
and equipments of his feudal followers. Every
day beheld some cavalier of note, the representative
of some proud and powerful house, entering the gates
of Cordova with sound of trumpet, and displaying
his banner and device, renowned in many a contest.
He would appear in sumptuous array, surrounded
by pages and lackeys no less gorgeously attired, and
followed by a host of vassals and retainers, horse and
foot, all admirably equipped in burnished armor.
Such was the state of Don Inigo Lopez de
Mendoza
,
duke of Infantado; who may be cited as a
picture
of a warlike noble of those times. He brought
with him five hundred men-at-arms of his
household
,
armed and mounted
la gineta
and
la guisa
.
The cavaliers who attended him were magnificently
armed and dressed. The housings of fifty of his
horses were of rich cloth, embroidered with gold;
and others were of brocade. The sumpter mules
had housings of the same, with halters of silk; while
the bridles, head-pieces, and all the harnessing,
glittered
with silver.
The camp equipage of these noble and luxurious
warriors, was equally magnificent. Their tents were
gay pavilions, of various colors, fitted up with silken
hangings and decorated with fluttering pennons.
They had vessels of gold and silver for the service
of their tables, as if they were about to engage in a
course of stately feasts and courtly revels, instead
of the stern encounters of rugged and mountainous
warfare. Sometimes they passed through the streets
of Cordova at night, in splendid cavalcade, with
great numbers of lighted torches, the rays of which
falling upon polished armor and nodding plumes, and
silken scarfs, and trappings of golden embroidery,
filled all beholders with admiration.
[46]
[46]
Pulgar, part 3, cap. 41. 56.
But it was not the chivalry of Spain, alone, which
thronged the streets of Cordova. The fame of this
war had spread throughout christendom: it was
considered a kind of crusade; and Catholic knights
from all parts hastened to signalize themselves in so
holy a cause. There were several valiant chevaliers
from France, among whom the most distinguished
was Gaston du Leon, Seneschal of Toulouse.
With him came a gallant train, well armed and
mounted, and decorated with rich surcoats and
panaches
of feathers. These cavaliers, it is said, eclipsed
all others in the light festivities of the court: they
were devoted to the fair, but not after the solemn
and passionate manner of the Spanish lovers; they
were gay, gallant and joyous in their amours, and
captivated by the vivacity of their attacks. They
were at first held in light estimation by the grave and
stately Spanish knights, until they made themselves
to be respected by their wonderful prowess in the
field.
The most conspicuous of the volunteers, however,
who appeared in Cordova on this occasion, was an
English knight of royal connexion. This was the
lord Scales, earl of Rivers, brother to the queen of
England, wife of Henry VII. He had distinguished
himself in the preceding year, at the battle of
Bosworth
field, where Henry Tudor, then earl of
Richmond
,
overcame Richard III. That decisive battle
having left the country at peace, the earl of Rivers,
having conceived a passion for warlike scenes,
repaired
to the Castilian court, to keep his arms in
exercise
,
in a campaign against the Moors. He brought
with him a hundred archers, all dexterous with the
long-bow and the cloth-yard arrow; also two
hundred
yeomen, armed cap-a-pie, who fought with pike
and battle-axe,men robust of frame, and of
prodigious
strength. The worthy padre Fray Antonio
Agapida describes this stranger knight and his
followers
,
with his accustomed accuracy and minuteness.
This cavalier, he observes, was from the far
island of England, and brought with him a train of
his vassals; men who had been hardened in certain
civil wars which raged in their country. They were a
comely race of men, but too fair and fresh for
warriors
,
not having the sun-burnt warlike hue of our
old Castilian soldiery. They were huge feeders also,
and deep carousers, and could not accommodate
themselves to the sober diet of our troops, but must
fain eat and drink after the manner of their own
country. They were often noisy and unruly, also, in
their wassail; and their quarter of the camp was
prone to be a scene of loud revel and sudden brawl.
They were, withal, of great pride, yet it was not
like our inflammable Spanish pride; they stood not
much upon the
pundonor
, the high punctilio, and
rarely drew the stiletto in their disputes; but their
pride was silent and contumelious. Though from a
remote and somewhat barbarous island, they believed
themselves the most perfect men upon earth, and
magnified their chieftain, the lord Scales, beyond the
greatest of their grandees. With all this, it must be
said of them that they were marvellous good men in
the field, dexterous archers, and powerful with the
battle-axe. In their great pride and self-will, they
always sought to press in the advance and take the
post of danger, trying to outvie our Spanish chivalry.
They did not rush on fiercely to the fight, nor make
a brilliant onset like the Moorish and Spanish troops,
but they went into the fight deliberately and persisted
obstinately, and were slow to find out when they
were beaten. Withal they were much esteemed, yet
little liked by our soldiery, who considered them
staunch companions in the field, yet coveted but
little fellowship with them in the camp.
Their commander, the lord Scales, was an
accomplished
cavalier, of gracious and noble presence
and fair speech; it was a marvel to see so much
courtesy in a knight brought up so far from our
Castilian
court. He was much honored by the king and
queen, and found great favor with the fair dames
about the court, who indeed are rather prone to be
pleased with foreign cavaliers. He went always in
costly state, attended by pages and esquires, and
accompanied
by noble young cavaliers of his country,
who had enrolled themselves under his banner, to
learn the gentle exercise of arms. In all pageants
and festivals, the eyes of the populace were
attracted
by the singular bearing and rich array of the
English earl and his train, who prided themselves in
always appearing in the garb and manner of their
countryand were indeed something very
magnificent
,
delectable, and strange to behold.
The worthy chronicler is no less elaborate in his
description of the Masters of Santiago, Calatrava,
and Alcantara, and their valiant knights, armed at all
points, and decorated with the badges of their orders.
These, he affirms, were the flower of christian
chivalry
:
being constantly in service, they became more
stedfast and accomplished in discipline, than the
irregular
and temporary levies of the feudal nobles.
Calm, solemn, and stately, they sat like towers upon
their powerful chargers. On parades, they manifested
none of the show and ostentation of the other troops:
neither, in battle, did they endeavor to signalize
themselves by any fiery vivacity, or desperate and
vain-glorious exploitevery thing, with them, was
measured and sedate; yet it was observed, that none
were more warlike in their appearance in the camp,
or more terrible for their achievements in the field.
The gorgeous magnificence of the Spanish nobles
found but little favor in the eyes of the sovereigns.
They saw that it caused a competition in expense,
ruinous to cavaliers of moderate fortune; and they
feared that a softness and effeminacy might thus be
introduced, incompatible with the stern nature of the
war. They signified their disapprobation to several
of the principal noblemen, and recommended a more
sober and soldierlike display while in actual service.
These are rare troops for a tourney, my lord,
said Ferdinand to the duke of Infantado, as he
beheld
his retainers glittering in gold and embroidery;
but gold, though gorgeous, is soft and yielding: iron
is the metal for the field.
Sire, replied the duke, if my men parade in
gold, your majesty will find they fight with steel.
The king smiled but shook his head, and the duke
treasured up his speech in his heart.
It remains now to reveal the immediate object of
this mighty and chivalrous preparation; which had,
in fact, the gratification of a royal pique at
bottom
.
The severe lesson which Ferdinand had
received
from the veteran Ali Atar, before the walls
of Loxa, though it had been of great service in
rendering
him wary in his attacks upon fortified places,
yet rankled sorely in his mind; and he had ever since
held Loxa in peculiar odium. It was, in truth, one
of the most belligerent and troublesome cities on the
borders; incessantly harassing Andalusia by its
incursions
.
It also intervened between the christian
territories and Alhama, and other important places
gained in the kingdom of Granada. For all these
reasons, king Ferdinand had determined to make
another grand attempt upon this warrior city; and
for this purpose, he had summoned to the field his
most powerful chivalry.
It was in the month of May, that the king sallied
from Cordova, at the head of his army. He had
twelve thousand cavalry and forty thousand
foot-soldiers
,
armed with cross-bows, lances, and
arquebusses
.
There were six thousand pioneers, with
hatchets, pickaxes, and crowbars, for levelling roads.
He took with him, also, a great train of lombards
and other heavy artillery, with a body of Germans
skilled in the service of ordnance and the art of
battering walls.
It was a glorious spectacle (says Fray Antonio
Agapida) to behold this pompous pageant issuing
forth from Cordova, the pennons and devices of the
Vol. I. Z 34
proudest houses of Spain, with those of gallant
stranger knights, fluttering above a sea of crests and
plumes; to see it slowly moving, with flash of helm,
and cuirass, and buckler, across the ancient bridge,
and reflected in the waters of the Guadalquivir,
while the neigh of steed and blast of trumpet
vibrated
in the air, and resounded to the distant
mountains
.
But, above all, concludes the good father,
with his accustomed zeal, it was triumphant to
behold
the standard of the faith every where displayed,
and to reflect that this was no worldly-minded army,
intent upon some temporal scheme of ambition or
revenge; but a christian host, bound on a crusade to
extirpate the vile seed of Mahomet from the land,
and to extend the pure dominion of the church.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
How fresh commotions broke out in Granada, and how
the people undertook to allay them.
While
perfect unity of object and harmony of
operation gave power to the christian arms, the
devoted
kingdom of Granada continued a prey to
internal
feuds. The transient popularity of El Zagal
had declined ever since the death of his brother,
and the party of Boabdil el Chico was daily gaining
strength: the Albaycin and the Alhambra were again
arrayed against each other in deadly strife, and the
streets of unhappy Granada were daily dyed in the
blood of her children. In the midst of these
dissensions
,
tidings arrived of the formidable army
assembling
at Cordova. The rival factions paused in their
infatuated brawls, and were roused to a temporary
sense of the common danger. They forthwith
resorted
to their old expedient of new-modelling their
government, or rather of making and unmaking kings.
The elevation of El Zagal to the throne had not
produced
the desired effectwhat then was to be done?
Recall Boabdil el Chico, and acknowledge him again
as sovereign? While they were in a popular tumult
of deliberation, Hamet Aben Zarrax, surnamed El
Santo, arose among them. This was the same wild,
melancholy man, who had predicted the woes of
Granada. He issued from one of the caverns of the
adjacent height which overhangs the Darro, and has
since been called the Holy Mountain. His
appearance
was more haggard than ever; for the unheeded
spirit of prophecy seemed to have turned inwardly,
and preyed upon his vitals. Beware, oh Moslems,
exclaimed he, of men who are eager to govern, yet
are unable to protect. Why slaughter each other for
El Chico or El Zagal? Let your kings renounce their
contests, unite for the salvation of Granada, or let
them be deposed.
Hamet Aben Zarrax had long been revered as a
sainthe was now considered an oracle. The old
men and the nobles immeidately consulted together,
how the two rival kings might be brought to accord.
They had tried most expedients: it was now
determined
to divide the kingdom between them; giving
Granada, Malaga, Velez Malaga, Almeria,
Almunecar
,
and their dependencies, to El Zagaland the
residue to Boabdil el Chico. Among the cities
granted to the latter, Loxa was particularly specified,
with a condition that he should immediately take
command of it in person; for the council thought the
favor he enjoyed with the Castilian monarchs, might
avert the threatened attack.
El Zagal readily accorded to this arrangement; he
had been hastily elevated to the throne by an
ebullition
of the people, and might be as hastily cast
down again. It secured him one-half of a kingdom
to which he had no hereditary right, and he trusted
to force or fraud to gain the other half hereafter.
The wily old monarch even sent a deputation to his
nephew, making a merit of offering him cheerfully
the half which he had thus been compelled to
relinquish
,
and inviting him to enter into an amicable
coalition for the good of the country.
The heart of Boabdil shrunk from all connexion
with a man who had sought his life, and whom he
regarded as the murderer of his kindred. He
accepted
one-half of the kingdom as an offer from the
nation, not to be rejected by a prince who scarcely
held possession of the ground he stood on. He
asserted
,
nevertheless, his absolute right to the whole,
and only submitted to the partition out of anxiety for
the present good of his people. He assembled his
handful of adherents, and prepared to hasten to Loxa.
As he mounted his horse to depart, Hamet Aben
Zarrax stood suddenly before him. Be true to thy
country and thy faith, cried he: hold no further
communication with these christian dogs. Trust not
the hollow-hearted friendship of the Castilian king;
he is mining the earth beneath thy feet. Choose
one of two things; be a sovereign or a slavethou
canst not be both.
Boabdil ruminated on these words; he made many
wise resolutions, but he was prone always to act
from the impulse of the moment, and was
unfortunately
given to temporize in his policy. He wrote
to Ferdinand, informing him that Loxa and certain
other cities had returned to their allegiance, and that
he held them as vassal to the Castilian crown,
according
to their convention. He conjured him,
therefore, to refrain from any meditated attack, of
Z 2
fering free passage to the Spanish army to Malaga,
or any other place under the dominion of his uncle.
[47]
[47]
Zurita, lib. 20. c. 68.
Ferdinand turned a deaf ear to the entreaty, and
to all professions of friendship and vassalage.
Boabdil
was nothing to him, but as an instrument for
stirring up the flames of civil war. He now insisted
that he had entered into a hostile league with his
uncle, and had consequently forfeited all claims to
his indulgence; and he prosecuted, with the greater
earnestness, his campaign against the city of Loxa.
Thus, observes the worthy Fray Antonio
Agapida
,
thus did this most sagacious sovereign act upon
the text in the eleventh chapter of the Evangelist St.
Luke, that `a kingdom divided against itself cannot
stand.' He had induced these infidels to waste and
destroy themselves by internal dissensions, and finally
cast forth the survivor; while the Moorish monarchs,
by their ruinous contests, made good the old Castilian
proverb in cases of civil war, `El vencido vencido, y
el vencidor perdido,' (the conquered conquered, and
the conqueror undone.)
Garibay, lib. 40. c. 33.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
How King Ferdinand held a council of war, at the Rock
of the Lovers.
The
royal army, on its march against Loxa, lay
encamped, one pleasant evening in May, in a meadow
on the banks of the river Yeguas, around the foot of
a lofty cliff called the Rock of the Lovers. The
quarters of each nobleman formed as it were a
separate
little encampment; his stately pavilion,
surmounted
by his fluttering pennon, rising above the
surrounding tents of his vassals and retainers. A
little apart from the others, as it were in proud
reserve
,
was the encampment of the English earl. It
was sumptuous in its furniture, and complete in all
its munitions. Archers, and soldiers armed with
battle-axes, kept guard around it; while above, the
standard of England rolled out its ample folds, and
flapped in the evening breeze.
The mingled sounds of various tongues and nations
were heard from the soldiery, as they watered their
horses in the stream, or busied themselves round the
fires which began to glow, here and there, in the
twilight: the gay chanson of the Frenchman, singing
of his amours on the pleasant banks of the Loire, or
the sunny regions of the Garonne; the broad guttural
tones of the German, chanting some doughty
krieger
lied
, or extolling the vintage of the Rhine; the wild
romance of the Spaniard, reciting the achievements
of the Cid, and many a famous passage of the
Moorish
wars; and the long and melancholy ditty of the
Englishman, treating of some feudal hero or
redoubtable
outlaw of his distant island.
On a rising ground, commanding a view of the
whole encampment, stood the ample and magnificent
pavilion of the king, with the banner of Castile and
Arragon, and the holy standard of the cross, erected
before it. In this tent were assembled the principal
commanders of the army, having been summoned by
Ferdinand to a council of war, on receiving tidings
that Boabdil had thrown himself into Loxa with a
considerable reinforcement. After some
consultation
,
it was determined to invest Loxa on both sides:
one part of the army should seize upon the dangerous
but commanding height of Santo Albohacen, in front
of the city; while the remainder, making a circuit,
should encamp on the opposite side.
No sooner was this resolved upon, than the
marques
of Cadiz stood forth and claimed the post of
danger in behalf of himself and those cavaliers, his
companions in arms, who had been compelled to
relinquish
it by the general retreat of the army on the
former siege. The enemy had exulted over them,
as if driven from it in disgrace. To regain that
perilous height, to pitch their tents upon it, and to
avenge the blood of their valiant compeer, the Master
of Calatrava, who had fallen upon it, was due to their
fame; the marques demanded therefore that they
might lead the advance and secure that height,
engaging
to hold the enemy employed until the main
army should take its position on the opposite side of
the city.
King Ferdinand readily granted his permission;
upon which the count de Cabra entreated to be
admitted
to a share of the enterprise. He had always
been accustomed to serve in the advance; and now
that Boabdil was in the field, and a king was to be
taken, he could not content himself with remaining
in the rear. Ferdinand yielded his consent, for he
was disposed to give the good count every
opportunity
to retrieve his late disaster.
The English earl, when he heard there was an
enterprise
of danger in question, was hot to be admitted
to the party; but the king restrained his ardor.
These cavaliers, said he, conceive that they
have an account to settle with their pride; let them
have the enterprise to themselves, my lord; if you
follow these Moorish wars long, you will find no lack
of perilous service.
The marques of Cadiz, and his companions in
arms, struck their tents before daybreak; they were
five thousand horse and twelve thousand foot, and
marched rapidly along the defiles of the mountains;
the cavaliers being anxious to strike the blow, and
get possession of the height of Albohacen, before the
king with the main army should arrive to their
assistance
.
The city of Loxa stands on a high hill, between
two mountains, on the banks of the Xenel. To
attain
the height of Albohacen, the troops had to pass
35
over a tract of rugged and broken country, and a
deep valley, intersected by those canals and
water-courses
with which the Moors irrigated their lands:
they were extremely embarrassed in this part of their
march, and in imminent risk of being cut up in detail
before they could reach the height.
The count de Cabra, with his usual eagerness,
endeavored
to push across this valley, in defiance of
every obstacle: he, in consequence, soon became
entangled with his cavalry among the canals; but his
impatience would not permit him to retrace his steps,
and choose a more practicable but circuitous route.
Others slowly crossed another part of the valley, by
the aid of pontoons; while the marques of Cadiz,
Don Alonzo de Aguilar, and the count de Urea,
being more experienced in the ground from their
former campaign, made a circuit round the bottom
of the height, and, winding up it, began to display
their squadrons and elevate their banners on the
redoubtable
post, which, in the former siege, they had
been compelled so reluctantly to abandon.
CHAPTER XXXIX.
How the Royal Army appeared before the city of Loxa,
and how it was received; and of the doughty
achievements
of the English Earl.
The
advance of the christian army upon Loxa,
threw the wavering Boabdil el Chico into one of his
usual dilemmas; and he was greatly perplexed
between
his oath of allegiance to the Spanish
sovereigns
,
and his sense of duty to his subjects. His
doubts were determined by the sight of the enemy
glittering upon the height of Albohacen, and by the
clamors of the people to be led forth to battle.
Allah
!
exclaimed he, thou knowest my heart: thou
knowest I have been true in my faith to this
christian
monarch. I have offered to hold Loxa as his
vassal, but he has preferred to approach it as an
enemy
on
his head be the infraction of our treaty!
Boabdil was not wanting in courage; he only
needed decision. When he had once made up his
mind, he acted vigorously; the misfortune was, he
either did not make it up at all, or he made it up too
late. He who decides tardily generally acts rashly,
endeavoring to make up by hurry of action for
slowness
of deliberation. Boabdil hastily buckled on his
armor, and sallied forth, surrounded by his guards,
and at the head of five hundred horse and four
thousand
foot, the flower of his army. Some he detached
to skirmish with the christians who were scattered
and perplexed in the valley, and to prevent their
concentrating their forces; while, with his main
body, he pressed forward to drive the enemy from
the height of Albohacen, before they had time to
collect
there in any number, or to fortify themselves in
that important position.
The worthy count de Cabra was yet entangled
with his cavalry among the water-courses of the
valley, when he heard the war-cries of the Moors,
and saw their army rushing over the bridge. He
recognised Boabdil himself, by his splendid armor,
the magnificent caparison of his steed, and the
brilliant
guard which surrounded him. The royal host
swept on toward the height of Albohacen: an
intervening
hill hid it from his sight; but loud shouts and
cries, the din of drums and trumpets, and the reports
of arquebusses, gave note that the battle had begun.
Here was a royal prize in the field, and the count
de Cabra unable to get into the action! The good
cavalier was in an agony of impatience; every
attempt
to force his way across the valley, only plunged
him into new difficulties. At length, after many eager
but ineffectual efforts, he was obliged to order his
troops to dismount, and slowly and carefully to lead
their horses back, along slippery paths, and amid
plashes of mire and water, where often there was
scarce a foothold. The good count groaned in spirit,
and sweat with mere impatience as he went, fearing
the battle might be fought, and the prize won or lost,
before he could reach the field. Having at length
toilfully unravelled the mazes of the valley, and
arrived
at firmer ground, he ordered his troops to
mount, and led them full gallop to the height. Part
of the good count's wishes were satisfied, but the
dearest were disappointed: he came in season to
partake of the very hottest of the fight, but the royal
prize was no longer in the field.
Boabdil had led on his men with impetuous valor,
or rather with hurried rashness. Heedlessly exposing
himself in the front of the battle, he received two
wounds in the very first encounter. His guards
rallied
round him, defended him with matchless valor,
and bore him, bleeding, out of the action. The count
de Cabra arrived just in time to see the loyal squadron
crossing the bridge, and slowly conveying their
disabled
monarch towards the gate of the city.
The departure of Boabdil made no difference in
the fury of the battle. A Moorish warrior, dark and
terrible in aspect, mounted on a black charger and
followed by a band of savage Gomeres, rushed
forward
to take the lead. It was Hamet el Zegri, the
fierce alcayde of Ronda, with the remnant of his
once redoubtable garrison. Animated by his
example
,
the Moors renewed their assaults upon the
height. It was bravely defended, on one side by the
marques of Cadiz, on another by Don Alonzo de
Aguilar; and as fast as the Moors ascended, they
were driven back and dashed down the declivities.
The count de Urea took his stand upon the fatal
spot where his brother had fallen; his followers
entered
with zeal into the feelings of their commander,
Vol. I A a
and heaps of the enemy sunk beneath their weapons
sacrifices to the manes of the lamented Master of
Calatrava.
The battle continued with incredible obstinacy.
The Moors knew the importance of the height to the
safety of the city; the cavaliers felt their honors
staked to maintain it. Fresh supplies of troops were
poured out of the city; some battled on the height,
while some attacked the christians who were still in
the valley and among the orchards and gardens, to
prevent their uniting their forces. The troops in the
valley were gradually driven back, and the whole
host of the Moors swept around the height of
Albohacen
.
The situation of the marques de Cadiz and
his companions was perilous in the extreme: they
were a mere handful; and, while they were fighting
hand to hand with the Moors who assailed the
height, they were galled from a distance by the
cross-bows and arquebusses of a host that augmented
each moment in number. At this critical juncture,
king Ferdinand emerged from the mountains with
the main body of the army, and advanced to an
eminence
commanding a full view of the field of action.
By his side was the noble English cavalier, the earl
of Rivers. This was the first time he had witnessed
a scene of Moorish warfare. He looked with eager
interest at the chance medley fight before him, where
there was the wild career of cavalry, the irregular
and tumultuous rush of infantry, and where christian
helm and Moorish turban were intermingled in
deadly
struggle. The high blood of the English knight
mounted at the sight, and his soul was stirred within
him, by the confused war-cries, the clangor of drums
and trumpets, and the reports of arquebusses, that
came echoing up the mountains. Seeing that the
king was sending a reinforcement to the field, he
entreated
permission to mingle in the affray, and fight
according to the fashion of his country. His request
being granted, he alighted from his steed: he was
merely armed
en blanco
, that is to say, with morion,
back-piece, and breast-plate; his sword was girded
by his side, and in his hand he wielded a powerful
battle-axe. He was followed by a body of his
yeomen
,
armed in like manner, and by a band of archers
with bows made of the tough English yew-tree. The
earl turned to his troops, and addressed them briefly
and bluntly, according to the manner of his country.
Remember, my merry men all, said he, the eyes
of strangers are upon you; you are in a foreign land,
fighting for the glory of God, and the honor of merry
old England! A loud shout was the reply. The
earl waved his battle-axe over his head: St. George
for England! cried he; and to the inspiring sound
of this old English war-cry, he and his followers
rushed down to the battle with manly and
courageous
hearts.
[48]
[48]
Cura de los Palacios.
They soon made their way into the
midst of the enemy; but when engaged in the hottest
of the fight, they made no shouts or outcries. They
pressed steadily forward, dealing their blows to right
and left, hewing down the Moors, and cutting their
way, with their battle-axes, like woodmen in a forest;
while the archers, pressing into the opening they
made, plied their bows vigorously, and spread death
on every side.
When the Castilian mountaineers beheld the valor
of the English yeomanry, they would not be outdone
in hardihood. They could not vie with them in
weight or bulk, but for vigor and activity they were
surpassed by none. They kept pace with them,
therefore, with equal heart and rival prowess, and
gave a brave support to the stout Englishmen.
The Moors were confounded by the fury of these
assaults, and disheartened by the loss of Hamet el
Zegri, who was carried wounded from the field.
They gradually fell back upon the bridge; the
christians
followed up their advantage, and drove them
over it tumultuously. The Moors retreated into the
suburb; and lord Rivers and his troops entered with
them pell-mell, fighting in the streets and in the
houses. King Ferdinand came up to the scene of
action with his royal guard, and the infidels were
driven within the city walls. Thus were the suburbs
gained by the hardihood of the English lord, without
such an event having been premeditated.
[49]
[49]
Cura de los Palacios. MS.
The earl of Rivers, notwithstanding he had
received
a wound, still urged forward in the attack.
He penetrated almost to the city gate, in defiance of
a shower of missiles that slew many of his followers.
A stone, hurled from the battlements, checked his
impetuous career: it struck him in the face, dashed
out two of his front teeth, and laid him senseless on
the earth. He was removed to a short distance by
his men; but, recovering his senses, refused to
permit
himself to be taken from the suburb.
When the contest was over, the streets presented
a piteous spectacleso many of their inhabitants
had died in the defence of their thresholds, or been
slaughtered without resistance. Among the victims
was a poor weaver, who had been at work in his
dwelling at this turbulent moment. His wife urged
him to fly into the city. Why should I fly? said
the Moorto be reserved for hunger and slavery?
I tell you, wife, I will await the foe here; for better
is it to die quickly by the steel, than to perish
piece-meal
in chains and dungeons. He said no more,
but resumed his occupation of weaving; and in the
indiscriminate fury of the assault, was slaughtered at
his loom.
[50]
[50]
Pulgar, part 3. e. 58.
The christians remained masters of the field, and
proceeded to pitch three encampments for the
prosecution
of the siege. The king, with the great body
of the army, took a position on the side of the city
next to Granada: the marques of Cadiz and his
brave companions once more pitched their tents
upon the height of Sancto Albohacen: but the
English
earl planted his standard sturdily within the
suburb he had taken.
A a 2 36
CHAPTER XL.
Conclusion of the siege of Loxa.
Having
possession of the heights of Albohacen
and the suburb of the city, the christians were
enabled
to choose the most favorable situations for
their batteries. They immediately destroyed the
stone bridge, by which the garrison had made its
sallies; and they threw two wooden bridges across
the river, and others over the canals and streams, so
as to establish an easy communication between the
different camps.
When all was arranged, a heavy fire was opened
upon the city from various points. They threw, not
only balls of stone and iron, but great carcasses of
fire, which burst like meteors on the houses,
wrapping
them instantly in a blaze. The walls were
shattered, and the towers toppled down, by
tremendous
discharges from the lombards. Through the
openings thus made, they could behold the interior
of the cityhouses tumbling or in flamesmen,
women, and children, flying in terror through the
streets, and slaughtered by the shower of missiles,
sent through the openings from smaller artillery, and
from cross-bows and arquebusses.
The Moors attempted to repair the breaches, but
fresh discharges from the lombards buried them
beneath
the ruins of the walls they were mending. In
their despair, many of the inhabitants rushed forth
into the narrow streets of the suburbs, and assailed
the christians with darts, scimitars, and poniards,
seeking to destroy rather than defend, and heedless of
death, in the confidence that to die fighting with an
unbeliever, was to be translated at once to paradise.
For two nights and a day, this awful scene
continued
;
when certain of the principal inhabitants
began
to reflect upon the hopelessness of the conflict:
their king was disabled, their principal captains were
either killed or wounded, their fortifications little
better than heaps of ruins. They had urged the
unfortunate
Boabdil to the conflict; they now clamored
for a capitulation. A parley was procured from the
christian monarch, and the terms of surrender were
soon adjusted. They were to yield up the city
immediately
,
with all their christian captives, and to
sally forth with as much of their property as they
could take with them. The marques of Cadiz, on
whose honor and humanity they had great reliance,
was to escort them to Granada, to protect them from
assault or robbery: such as chose to remain in Spain
were to be permitted to reside in Castile, Arragon,
or Valencia. As to Boabdil el Chico, he was to do
homage as vassal to king Ferdinand, but no charge
was to be urged against him of having violated his
former pledge. If he should yield up all pretensions
to Granada, the title of duke of Guadix was to be
assigned to him, and the territory thereto annexed,
provided it should be recovered from El Zagal
within
six months.
The capitulation being arranged, they gave as
hostages the alcayde of the city, and the principal
officers, together with the sons of their late chieftain,
the veteran Ali Atar. The warriors of Loxa then
issued forth, humbled and dejected at having to
surrender
those walls which they had so long maintained
with valor and renown; and the women and children
filled the air with lamentations, at being exiled from
their native homes.
Last came forth Boabdil, most truly called El
Zogoybi, the unlucky. Accustomed, as he was, to
be crowned and uncrowned, to be ransomed and
treated as a matter of bargain, he had acceded of
course to the capitulation. He was enfeebled by
his wounds, and had an air of dejection; yet it is
said, his conscience acquitted him of a breach of
faith towards the Castilian sovereigns, and the
personal
valor he had displayed had caused a sympathy
for him among many of the christian cavaliers. He
knelt to Ferdinand according to the forms of
vassalage
,
and then departed, in melancholy mood, for
Priego, a town about three leagues distant.
Ferdinand immediately ordered Loxa to be
repaired
,
and strongly garrisoned. He was greatly
elated at the capture of this place, in consequence
of his former defeat before its walls. He passed
great encomiums upon the commanders who had
distinguished
themselves; and historians dwell
particularly
upon his visit to the tent of the English earl.
His majesty consoled him for the loss of his teeth, by
the consideration that he might otherwise have lost
them by natural decay; whereas the lack of them
would now be esteemed a beauty, rather than a
defect
,
serving as a trophy of the glorious cause in
which he had been engaged.
The earl replied, that he gave thanks to God and
to the holy virgin, for being thus honored by a visit
from the most potent king in christendom; that he
accepted with all gratitude his gracious consolation
for the loss of his teeth, though he held it little to
lose two teeth in the service of God, who had given
him all:A speech, says Fray Antonio Agapida,
full of most courtly wit and christian piety; and
one only marvels that it should have been made by
a native of an island so far distant from Castile.
CHAPTER XLI.
Capture of Illora.
King Ferdinand
followed up his victory at Loxa,
by laying siege to the strong town of Illora. This
redoubtable fortress was perched upon a high rock,
in the midst of a spacious valley. It was within four
leagues of the Moorish capital; and its lofty castle,
keeping vigilant watch over a wide circuit of
country
,
was termed the right eye of Granada.
The alcayde of Illora was one of the bravest of the
Moorish commanders, and made every preparation
to defend his fortress to the last extremity. He sent
the women and children, the aged and infirm, to the
metropolis. He placed barricades in the suburbs,
opened doors of communication from house to house,
and pierced their walls with loop-holes for the
discharge
of cross-bows, arquebusses, and other missiles.
King Ferdinand arrived before the place, with all
his forces; he stationed himself upon the hill of
Encinilla, and distributed the other encampments in
various situations, so as to invest the fortress.
Knowing
the valiant character of the alcayde, and the
desperate courage of the Moors, he ordered the
encampments
to be fortified with trenches and
pallisadoes
,
the guards to be doubled, and sentinels to be
placed in all the watch-towers of the adjacent heights.
When all was ready, the duke del Infantado
demanded
the attack; it was his first campaign, and
he was anxious to disprove the royal insinuation
made against the hardihood of his embroidered
chivalry
.
King Ferdinand granted his demand, with a
becoming compliment to his spirit; he ordered the
count de Cabra to make a simultaneous attack upon
a different quarter. Both chiefs led forth their
troops;those of the duke in fresh and brilliant
armor, richly ornamented, and as yet uninjured by
the service of the field; those of the count were
weatherbeaten veterans, whose armor was dented
and hacked in many a hard-fought battle. The
youthful duke blushed at the contrast. Cavaliers,
cried he, we have been reproached with the finery
of our array: let us prove that a trenchant blade
may rest in a gilded sheath. Forward! to the foe!
and I trust in God, that as we enter this affray
knights well accoutred, so we shall leave it
cavaliers
well proved. His men responded by eager
acclamations, and the duke led them forward to the
assault. He advanced under a tremendous shower
of stones, darts, balls, and arrows; but nothing could
check his career; he entered the suburb sword in
hand; his men fought furiously, though with great
loss, for every dwelling had been turned into a
fortress
.
After a severe conflict, they succeeded in
driving the Moors into the town, about the same
time that the other suburb was carried by the count
de Cabra and his veterans. The troops of the duke
del Infantado came out of the contest thinned in
number, and covered with blood, and dust, and
wounds: they received the highest encomiums of
the king, and there was never afterwards any sneer
at their embroidery.
The suburbs being taken, three batteries, each
furnished with eight huge lombards, were opened
upon the fortress. The damage and havoc were
tremendous, for the fortifications had not been
constructed
to withstand such engines. The towers
were overthrown, the walls battered to pieces; the
interior of the place was all exposed, houses
demolished
,
and many people slain. The Moors were
terrified
by the tumbling ruins, and the tremendous din.
The alcayde had resolved to defend the place until
the last extremity; he beheld it a heap of rubbish;
there was no prospect of aid from Granada; his
people
had lost all spirit to fight, and were vociferous
for a surrender; with a reluctant heart, he
capitulated
.
The inhabitants were permitted to depart with
all their effects, excepting their arms; and were
escorted
in safety by the duke del Infantado and the
count de Cabra, to the bridge of Pinos, within two
leagues of Granada.
King Ferdinand gave directions to repair the
fortifications
of Illora, and to place it in a strong state
of defence. He left, as alcayde of the town and
fortress, Gonsalvo de Cordova, younger brother of
Don Alonzo de Aguilar. This gallant cavalier was
captain of the royal guards of Ferdinand and
Isabella
,
and gave already proofs of that prowess which
afterwards rendered him so renowned.
CHAPTER XLII.
Of the arrival of Queen Isabella at the camp before
Moclin; and of the pleasant sayings of the English
Earl.
The
war of Granada, however poets may
embroider
it with the flowers of their fancy, was
certainly one of the sternest of those iron conflicts
which have been celebrated under the name of holy
wars. The worthy Fray Antonio Agapida dwells
with unsated delight upon the succession of rugged
mountain enterprises, bloody battles, and merciless
sackings and ravages, which characterized it; yet we
find him on one occasion pausing in the full career
of victory over the infidels, to detail a stately pageant
of the Catholic sovereigns.
Immediately on the capture of Loxa, Ferdinand
had written to Isabella, soliciting her presence at the
camp, that he might consult with her as to the
disposition
of their newly-acquired territories.
It was in the early part of June, that the queen
departed from Cordova, with the princess Isabella
and numerous ladies of her court. She had a
glorious
attendance of cavaliers and pages, with many
guards and domestics. There were forty mules, for
the use of the queen, the princess, and their train.
As this courtly cavalcade approached the Rock of
the Lovers, on the banks of the river Yeguas, they
beheld a splendid train of knights advancing to meet
Vol. I. B b 37
them. It was headed by that accomplished cavalier
the marques duke de Cadiz, accompanied by the
adelantado of Andalusia. He had left the camp the
day after the capture of Illora, and advanced thus
far to receive the queen and escort her over the
borders. The queen received the marques with
distinguished
honor; for he was esteemed the mirror of
chivalry. His actions in this war had become the
theme of every tongue, and many hesitated not to
compare him in prowess to the immortal Cid.
[51]
[51]
Cura de los Palacios.
Thus gallantly attended, the queen entered the
vanquished frontier of Granada; journeying securely
along the pleasant banks of the Xenel, so lately
subject
to the scourings of the Moors. She stopped at
Loxa, where she administered aid and consolation
to the wounded, distributing money among them for
their support, according to their rank.
The king, after the capture of Illora, had removed
his camp before the fortress of Moclin, with an
intention
of besieging it. Thither the queen
proceeded
,
still escorted through the mountain roads by the
marques of Cadiz. As Isabella drew near to the
camp, the duke del Infantado issued forth a league
and a half to receive her, magnificently arrayed, and
followed by all his chivalry in glorious attire. With
him came the standard of Seville, borne by the
men-at-arms
of that renowned city; and the Prior of St.
Juan, with his followers. They arrayed themselves
in order of battle, on the left of the road by which
the queen was to pass.
The worthy Agapida is loyally minute, in his
description
of the state and grandeur of the Catholic
sovereigns. The queen rode a chestnut mule, seated
in a magnificent saddle-chair decorated with silver
gilt. The housings of the mule were of fine crimson
cloth; the borders embroidered with gold; the reins
and head-piece were of satin, curiously embossed
with needlework of silk, and wrought with golden
letters. The queen wore a brial or regal skirt of
velvet, under which were others of brocade; a
scarlet
mantle, ornamented in the Moresco fashion; and
a black hat, embroidered round the crown and brim.
The Infanta was likewise mounted on a chestnut
mule, richly caparisoned: she wore a brial or skirt
of black brocade, and a black mantle ornamented
like that of the queen.
When the royal cavalcade passed by the chivalry
of the duke del Infantado, which was drawn out in
battle array, the queen made a reverence to the
standard of Seville, and ordered it to pass to the
right hand. When she approached the camp, the
multitude ran forth to meet her, with great
demonstrations
of joy; for she was universally beloved by
her subjects. All the battalions sallied forth in
military
array, bearing the various standards and banners
of the camp, which were lowered in salutation as
she passed.
The king now came forth in royal state, mounted on
a superb chestnut horse, and attended by many gran
dees of Castile. He wore a jubon or close vest of
crimson cloth, with cuisses or short skirts of yellow
satin, a loose cassock of brocade, a rich Moorish
scimitar, and a hat with plumes. The grandees who
attended him were arrayed with wonderful
magnificence
,
each according to his taste and invention.
These high and mighty princes (says Antonio
Agapida) regarded each other with great deference,
as allied sovereigns, rather than with connubial
familiarity
as mere husband and wife. When they
approached
each other, therefore, before embracing,
they made three profound reverences; the queen
taking off her hat, and remaining in a silk net or
cawl, with her face uncovered. The king then
approached
and embraced her, and kissed her
respectfully
on the cheek. He also embraced his daughter
the princess; and, making the sign of the cross, he
blessed her, and kissed her on the lips.
[52]
[52]
Cura de los Palacios.
The good Agapida seems scarcely to have been
more struck with the appearance of the sovereigns,
than with that of the English earl. He followed
(says he) immediately after the king, with great
pomp, and, in an extraordinary manner, taking
precedence
of all the rest. He was mounted
a la
guisa
, or with long stirrups, on a superb chestnut
horse, with trappings of azure silk which reached to
the ground. The housings were of mulberry,
powdered
with stars of gold. He was armed in proof,
and wore over his armor a short French mantle of
black brocade; he had a white French hat with
plumes, and carried on his left arm a small round
buckler, banded with gold. Five pages attended him,
apparelled in silk and brocade, and mounted on
horses sumptuously caparisoned; he had also a train
of followers, bravely attired after the fashion of his
country.
He advanced in a chivalrous and courteous
manner
,
making his reverences first to the queen and
Infanta
,
and afterwards to the king. Queen Isabella
received
him graciously, complimenting him on his
courageous
conduct at Loxa, and condoling with him on
the loss of his teeth. The earl, however, made light
of his disfiguring wound; saying, that our blessed
Lord, who had built all that house, had opened a
window there, that he might see more readily what
passed within:
[53]
[53]
Pietro Martyr, Epist. 61.
whereupon the worthy Fray
Antonio
Agapida is more than ever astonished at the
pregnant wit of this island cavalier. The earl
continued
some little distance by the side of the royal
family
,
complimenting them all with courteous speeches,
his horse curveting and caracoling, but being
managed
with great grace and dexterity; leaving the
grandees and the people at large, not more filled with
admiration at the strangeness and magnificence of his
state, than at the excellence of his horsemanship.
Cura de los Palacios.
To testify her sense of the gallantry and services
of this noble English knight, who had come from so
far to assist in their wars, the queen sent him the
B b 2
next day presents of twelve horses, with stately
tents, fine linen, two beds with coverings of gold
brocade, and many other articles of great value.
Having refreshed himself, as it were, with the
description
of this progress of queen Isabella to the
camp, and the glorious pomp of the Catholic
sovereigns
,
the worthy Antonio Agapida returns with
renewed
relish to his pious work of discomfiting the
Moors.
The description of this royal pageant, and the
particulars
concerning the English earl, thus given from
the manuscript of Fray Antonio Agapida, agree
precisely
with the chronicle of Andres Bernaldes, the
curate of los Palacios. The English earl makes no
further figure in this war. It appears from various
histories, that he returned in the course of the year
to England. In the following year, his passion for
fighting took him to the continent at the head of four
hundred adventurers, in aid of Francis duke of
Brittany, against Louis XI. of France. He was
killed in the same year [1488] in the battle of St.
Alban's, between the Bretons and the French.
CHAPTER XLIII.
How King Ferdinand attacked Moclin, and of the strange
events that attended its capture.
The
Catholic sovereigns, says Fray Antonio
Agapida, had by this time closely clipped the right
wing of the Moorish vulture. In other words, most
of the strong fortresses along the western frontier of
Granada had fallen beneath the christian artillery.
The army now lay encamped before the town of
Moclin, on the frontier of Jaen, one of the most
stubborn fortresses of the border. It stood on a
high rocky hill, the base of which was nearly girdled
by a river: a thick forest protected the back part
of the town, towards the mountain. Thus strongly
situated, it domineered, with its frowning battlements
and massive towers, all the mountain passes into
that part of the country, and was called the shield
of Granada. It had a double arrear of blood to
settle with the christians; two hundred years before,
a Master of Santiago and all his cavaliers had been
lanced by the Moors before its gates. It had recently
made terrible slaughter among the troops of the good
count de Cabra, in his precipitate attempt to entrap
the old Moorish monarch. The pride of Ferdinand
had been piqued by being obliged on that occasion
to recede from his plan, and abandon his concerted
attack on the place; he was now prepared to take a
full revenge.
El Zagal, the old warrior king of Granada,
anticipating
a second attempt, had provided the place
with ample ammunitions and provisions; had ordered
trenches to be digged, and additional bulwarks thrown
up; and caused all the old men, the women, and the
children, to be removed to the capital.
Such was the strength of the fortress, and the
difficulties of its position, that Ferdinand anticipated
much trouble in reducing it, and made every
preparation
for a regular siege. In the centre of his camp
were two great mounds, one of sacks of flour, the
other of grain, which were called the royal granary.
Three batteries of heavy ordnance were opened
against the citadel and principal towers, while
smaller
artillery, engines for the discharge of missiles,
arquebusses
and cross-bows, were distributed in various
places, to keep up a fire into any breaches that might
be made, and upon those of the garrison who should
appear on the battlements.
The lombards soon made an impression on the
works, demolishing a part of the wall, and tumbling
down several of those haughty towers, which from
their height had been impregnable before the
invention
of gunpowder. The Moors repaired their walls
as well as they were able, and, still confiding in the
strength of their situation, kept up a resolute defence,
firing down from their lofty battlements and towers
upon the christian camp. For two nights and a day
an incessant fire was kept up, so that there was not
a moment in which the roaring of ordnance was not
heard, or some damage sustained by the christians or
the Moors. It was a conflict, however, more of
engineers and artillerists than of gallant cavaliers;
there was no sally of troops, or shock of armed men,
or rush and charge of cavalry. The knights stood
looking on with idle weapons, waiting until they
should have an opportunity of signalizing their
prowess
by scaling the walls, or storming the breaches.
As the place, however, was assailable only in one
part, there was every prospect of a long and
obstinate
resistance.
The engineers, as usual, discharged not merely
balls of stone and iron, to demolish the walls, but
flaming balls of inextinguishable combustibles,
designed
to set fire to the houses. One of these, which
passed high through the air like a meteor, sending
out sparks and crackling as it went, entered the
window
of a tower which was used as a magazine of
gunpowder. The tower blew up, with a tremendous
explosion; the Moors who were upon its battlements
were hurled into the air, and fell mangled in various
parts of the town; and the houses in its vicinity
were rent and overthrown as with an earthquake.
The Moors, who had never witnessed an explosion
of the kind, ascribed the destruction of the tower to a
miracle. Some who had seen the descent of the
flaming
ball, imagined that fire had fallen from heaven to
punish them for their pertinacity. The pious
Agapida
,
himself, believes that this fiery missive was
conducted
by divine agency to confound the infidels; an
38
opinion in which he is supported by other Catholic
historians.
[54]
[54]
Pulgar. Garibay. Lucio Marino Siculo, Cosas Memoral. de
Hispan lib. 20.
Seeing heaven and earth as it were combined
against them, the Moors lost all heart: they
capitulated
,
and were permitted to depart with their
effects, leaving behind all arms and munitions of war.
The Catholic army (says Antonio Agapida) entered
Moclin in solemn state, not as a licentious host,
intent
upon plunder and desolation, but as a band of
christian warriors, coming to purify and regenerate
the land. The standard of the cross, that ensign of
this holy crusade, was borne in the advance, followed
by the other banners of the army. Then came the
king and queen, at the head of a vast number of
armed cavaliers. They were accompanied by a
band of priests and friars, with the choir of the royal
chapel, chanting the canticle
Te deum laudamus
.
As they were moving through the streets in this
solemn
manner, every sound hushed excepting the
anthem
of the choir, they suddenly heard, issuing as it
were from under ground, a chorus of voices
chanting
the solemn response,
Benedictum qui venit in
nomine domini
.
Marino Siculo.
The procession paused in wonder.
The sounds arose from christian captives, and among
them several priests, who were confined in
subterraneous
dungeons.
The heart of Isabella was greatly touched. She
ordered the captives to be drawn forth from their
cells, and was still more moved at beholding, by their
wan, discolored, and emaciated appearance, how
much they had suffered. Their hair and beards
were overgrown and shagged; they were wasted by
hunger, half naked, and in chains. She ordered that
they should be clothed and cherished, and money
furnished them to bear them to their homes.
[55]
[55]
Illeseas, Hist. Pontif. lib. 6. c. 20,  1.
Several of the captives were brave cavaliers, who
had been wounded and made prisoners, in the defeat
of the count de Cabra by El Zagal, in the preceding
year. There were also found other melancholy
traces of that disastrous affair. On visiting the narrow
pass where the defeat had taken place, the remains
of several christian warriors were found in thickets,
or hidden behind rocks, or in the clefts of the
mountains
.
These were some who had been struck from
their horses, and wounded too severely to fly. They
had crawled away from the scene of action, and
concealed themselves to avoid falling into the hands
of the enemy, and had thus perished miserably and
alone. The remains of those of note were known
by their armor and devices, and were mourned over
by their companions who had shared the disasters
of that day.
Pulgar, part 3, cap. 61.
The queen had these remains piously collected,
as the relics of so many martyrs who had fallen in
the cause of the faith. They were interred with
great solemnity in the mosques of Moclin, which had
been purified and consecrated to christian worship.
There, says Antonio Agapida, rest the bones of
those truly Catholic knights, in the holy ground
which in a manner had been sanctified by their blood;
and all pilgrims passing through those mountains offer
up prayers and masses for the repose of their souls.
The queen remained for some time at Moclin,
administering comfort to the wounded and the
prisoners
,
bringing the newly acquired territory into
order, and founding churches and monasteries and
other pious institutions. While the king marched
in front, laying waste the land of the Philistines,
says the figurative Antonio Agapida, queen Isabella
followed his traces as the binder follows the reaper,
gathering and garnering the rich harvest that has
fallen beneath his sickle. In this she was greatly
assisted by the counsels of that cloud of bishops,
friars, and other saintly men, which continually
surrounded
her, garnering the first fruits of this infidel
land into the granaries of the church. Leaving her
thus piously employed, the king pursued his career
of conquest, determined to lay waste the vega, and
carry fire and sword to the very gates of Granada.
CHAPTER XLIV.
How King Ferdinand foraged the Vega; and of the
battle of the Bridge of Pinos, and the fate of the two
Moorish brothers.
Muley Abdalla el Zagal
had been under a
spell of ill fortune, ever since the suspicious death
of the old king his brother. Success had deserted
his standard; and, with his fickle subjects, want of
success was one of the greatest crimes in a sovereign.
He found his popularity declining, and he lost all
confidence
in his people. The christian army marched
in open defiance through his territories, and sat down
deliberately before his fortresses; yet he dared not
lead forth his legions to oppose them, lest the
inhabitants
of the Albaycin, ever ripe for a revolt, should
rise and shut the gates of Granada against his return.
Every few days, some melancholy train entered
the metropolis, the inhabitants of some captured
town, bearing the few effects that had been spared
them, and weeping and bewailing the desolation of
their homes. When the tidings arrived that Illora
and Moclin had fallen, the people were seized with
consternation. The right eye of Granada is
extinguished
,
exclaimed they; the shield of Granada is
broken: what shall protect us from the inroad of the
foe? When the survivors of the garrisons of those
towns arrived, with downcast looks, bearing the
Vol. I. C c
marks of battle, and destitute of arms and standards,
the populace reviled them in their wrath; but they
answered, we fought as long as we had force to
fight, or walls to shelter us; but the christians laid
our towns and battlements in ruins, and we looked
in vain for aid from Granada.
The alcaydes of Illora and Moclin were brothers;
they were alike in prowess, and the bravest among
the Moorish chevaliers. They had been the most
distinguished in all tilts and tourneys which graced
the happier days of Granada, and had distinguished
themselves in the sterner conflicts of the field.
Acclamation
had always followed their banners, and
they had long been the delight of the people. Yet
now, when they returned after the capture of their
fortresses, they were followed by the unsteady
populace
with execrations. The hearts of the alcaydes
swelled with indignation; they found the ingratitude
of their countrymen still more intolerable than the
hostility of the christians.
Tidings came, that the enemy was advancing with
his triumphant legions to lay waste the country about
Granada. Still El Zagal did not dare to take the
field. The two alcaydes of Illora and Moclin stood
before him: We have defended your fortresses,
said they, until we were almost buried under their
ruins, and for our reward we receive scoffings and
revilings; give us, oh king, an opportunity where
knightly valor may signalize itself, not shut up behind
stone walls, but in the open conflict of the field.
The enemy approaches to lay our country desolate:
give us men to meet him in the advance, and let
shame light upon our heads if we be found wanting
in the battle!
The two brothers were sent forth, with a large
force of horse and foot; El Zagal intended, should
they be successful, to issue forth with his whole
force, and by a decisive victory, repair the losses he
had suffered. When the people saw the well-known
standards of the brothers going forth to battle, there
was a feeble shout; but the alcaydes passed on with
stern countenances, for they knew the same voices
would curse them were they to return unfortunate.
They cast a farewell look upon fair Granada, and
upon the beautiful fields of their infancy, as if for
these they were willing to lay down their lives, but
not for an ungrateful people.
The army of Ferdinand had arrived within two
leagues of Granada, at the Bridge of Pinos, a pass
famous in the wars of the Moors and christians for
many a bloody conflict. It was the pass by which
the Castilian monarchs generally made their inroads,
and was capable of great defence, from the
ruggedness
of the country and the difficulty of the bridge.
The king, with the main body of the army, had
attained
the brow of a hill, when they beheld the
advance
guard, under the marques of Cadiz and the
Master of Santiago, furiously attacked by the enemy,
in the vicinity of the bridge. The Moors rushed to
the assault with their usual shouts, but with more
than usual ferocity. There was a hard struggle at
the bridge; both parties knew the importance of
that pass.
The king particularly noted the prowess of two
Moorish cavaliers, alike in arms and devices, and
whom by their bearing and attendance he perceived
to be commanders of the enemy. They were the
two brothers, the alcaydes of Illora and Moclin.
Wherever they turned, they carried confusion and
death into the ranks of the christians; but they
fought with desperation, rather than valor. The
count de Cabra, and his brother Don Martin de
Cordova
,
pressed forward with eagerness against them;
but having advanced too precipitately, were
surrounded
by the foe, and in imminent danger. A
young christian knight, seeing their peril, hastened
with his followers to their relief. The king
recognised
him for Don Juan de Arragon, count of
Ribargoza
,
his own nephew; for he was illegitimate son
of the duke of Villahermosa, illegitimate brother of
king Ferdinand. The splendid armor of Don Juan,
and the sumptuous caparison of his steed, rendered
him a brilliant object of attack. He was assailed on
all sides, and his superb steed slain under him; yet
still he fought valiantly, bearing for a time the brunt
of the fight, and giving the exhausted forces of the
count de Cabra time to recover breath.
Seeing the peril of these troops and the general
obstinacy of the fight, the king ordered the royal
standard to be advanced, and hastened, with all his
forces, to the relief of the count de Cabra. At his
approach, the enemy gave way, and retreated
towards
the bridge. The two Moorish commanders
endeavored to rally their troops, and animate them
to defend this pass to the utmost: they used prayers,
remonstrances, menacesbut almost in vain. They
could only collect a scanty handful of cavaliers; with
these they planted themselves at the head of the
bridge, and disputed it inch by inch. The fight was
hot and obstinate, for but few could contend hand to
hand, yet many discharged cross-bows and
arquebusses
from the banks. The river was covered with
the floating bodies of the slain. The Moorish band
of cavaliers was almost entirely cut to pieces; the
two brothers fell, covered with wounds, upon the
bridge they had so resolutely defended. They had
given up the battle for lost, but had determined not
to return alive to ungrateful Granada.
When the people of the capital heard how
devotedly
they had fallen, they lamented greatly their
deaths, and extolled their memory: a column was
erected to their honor in the vicinity of the bridge,
which long went by the name of the Tomb of the
Brothers.
The army of Ferdinand now marched on, and
established its camp in the vicinity of Granada. The
worthy Agapida gives many triumphant details of the
ravages committed in the vega, which was again laid
waste; the grain, fruits, and other productions of the
earth, destroyedand that earthly paradise
rendered
a dreary desert. He narrates several fierce but
ineffectual sallies and skirmishes of the Moors, in
defence of their favorite plain; among which, one
C c 2 39
deserves to be mentioned, as it records the
achievements
of one of the saintly heroes of this war.
During one of the movements of the christian
army, near the walls of Granada, a battalion of fifteen
hundred cavalry, and a large force of foot, had sallied
from the city, and posted themselves near some
gardens
,
which were surrounded by a canal, and
traversed
by ditches, for the purpose of irrigation.
The Moors beheld the duke del Infantado pass by,
with his two splendid battalions; one of men-at-arms,
the other of light cavalry, armed
la gineta
. In
company
with him, but following as a rear-guard, was
Don Garcia Osorio, the belligerent bishop of Jaen,
attended by Francisco Bovadillo, the corregidor of
his city, and followed by two squadrons of
men-at-arms
,
from Jaen, Anduxar, Ubeda, and Baeza.
[56]
[56]
Pulgar, part 3, cap. 62.
The
success of last year's campaign had given the good
bishop an inclination for warlike affairs, and he had
once more buckled on his cuirass.
The Moors were much given to stratagem in
warfare
.
They looked wistfully at the magnificent
squadrons of the duke del Infantado; but their
martial
discipline precluded all attack: the good bishop
promised to be a more easy prey. Suffering the
duke and his troops to pass unmolested, they
approached
the squadrons of the bishop, and, making a
pretended attack, skirmished slightly, and fled in
apparent
confusion. The bishop considered the day
his own, and, seconded by his corregidor Bovadillo,
followed with valorous precipitation. The Moors
fled into the
Huerta del Rey
, or orchard of the king;
the troops of the bishop followed hotly after them.
When the Moors perceived their pursuers fairly
embarrassed among the intricacies of the garden, they
turned fiercely upon them, while some of their
number
threw open the sluices of the Xenel. In an
instant
,
the canal which encircled and the ditches
which traversed the garden, were filled with water,
and the valiant bishop and his followers found
themselves
overwhelmed by a deluge.
[57]
[57]
Pulgar.
A scene of great
confusion succeeded. Some of the men of Jaen,
stoutest of heart and hand, fought with the Moors in
the garden, while others struggled with the water,
endeavoring to escape across the canal, in which
attempt
many horses were drowned.
Fortunately, the duke del Infantado perceived the
snare into which his companions had fallen, and
dispatched
his light cavalry to their assistance. The
Moors were compelled to flight, and driven along the
road of Elvira up to the gates of Granada.
[58]
[58]
Pulgar.
Several
christian cavaliers perished in this affray; the bishop
himself escaped with difficulty, having slipped from
his saddle in crossing the canal, but saving himself
by holding on to the tail of his charger. This
perilous
achievement seems to have satisfied the good
bishop's belligerent propensities. He retired on his
laurels, (says Agapida,) to his city of Jaen; where,
in the fruition of all good things, he gradually waxed
too corpulent for his corselet, which was hung up in
the hall of his episcopal palace; and we hear no
more of his military deeds, throughout the residue
of the holy war of Granada.
[59]
[59]
Don Luis Osorio fue obispo de Jaen desde el ao de 1483, y
presidio in esta Iglesia hasta el de 1496 in que murio en Flandes,
a donde fue acompaando a la princesa Doa Juana, esposa del
archiduque Don Felipe.
Espaa Sagrada
, por Fr. M. Risco,
tom. 41, trat. 77, cap. 4.
King Ferdinand, having completed his ravage of
the vega, and kept El Zagal shut up in his capital,
conducted his army back through the pass of Lope
to rejoin queen Isabella at Moclin. The fortresses
lately taken being well garrisoned and supplied, he
gave the command of the frontier to his cousin, Don
Fadrique de Toledo, afterwards so famous in the
Netherlands as the duke of Alva. The campaign
being thus completely crowned with success, the
sovereigns returned in triumph to the city of Cordova.
CHAPTER XLV.
Attempt of El Zagal upon the life of Boabdil, and how
the latter was roused to action.
No sooner did the last squadron of christian
cavalry
disappear behind the mountain of Elvira, and
the note of its trumpets die away upon the ear, than
the long-suppressed wrath of old Muley El Zagal
burst forth. He determined no longer to be half a
king, reigning over a divided kingdom, in a divided
capital; but to exterminate, by any means, fair or
foul, his nephew Boabdil and his faction. He turned
furiously upon those whose factious conduct had
deterred
him from sallying upon the foe; some he
punished
by confiscations, others by banishment, others
by death. Once undisputed monarch of the entire
kingdom, he trusted to his military skill to retrieve his
fortunes, and drive the christians over the frontier.
Boabdil, however, had again retired to Velez el
Blanco, on the confines of Murcia, where he could
avail himself, in case of emergency, of any assistance
or protection afforded him by the policy of
Ferdinand
.
His defeat had blighted his reviving fortunes,
for the people considered him as inevitably doomed
to misfortune. Still, while he lived, El Zagal knew
he would be a rallying point for faction, and liable
at any moment to be elevated into power by the
capricious multitude. He had recourse therefore to
the most perfidious means, to compass his destruction.
He sent embassadors to him, representing the
necessity
of concord for the salvation of the kingdom, and
even offering to resign the title of king, and to
become
subject to his sway, on receiving some estate
on which he could live in tranquil retirement. But
while the embassadors bore these words of peace,
they were furnished with poisoned herbs, which
they were to administer secretly to Boabdil; and if
they failed in this attempt, they had pledged
themselves
to dispatch him openly, while engaged in
conversation
.
They were instigated to this treason by
promises of great reward, and by assurances from
the alfaquis that Boabdil was an apostate, whose
death would be acceptable to Heaven.
The young monarch was secretly apprized of the
concerted treason, and refused an audience to the
embassadors. He denounced his uncle as the
murderer
of his father and his kindred, and the usurper
of his throne; and vowed never to relent in hostility
to him, until he should place his head on the walls
of the Alhambra.
Open war again broke out between the two
monarchs
,
though feebly carried on, in consequence of
their mutual embarrassments. Ferdinand again
extended
his assistance to Boabdil, ordering the
commanders
of his fortresses to aid him in all enterprises
against his uncle, and against such places as refused
to acknowledge him as king; and Don Juan de
Bonavides
,
who commanded in Lorca, even made inroads
in his name, into the territories of Almeria, Baza,
and Guadix, which owned allegiance to El Zagal.
The unfortunate Boabdil had three great evils to
contend withthe inconstancy of his subjects, the
hostility of his uncle, and the friendship of
Ferdinand
.
The last was by far the most baneful: his
fortunes withered under it. He was looked upon as
the enemy of his faith and of his country. The cities
shut their gates against him; the people cursed him;
even the scanty band of cavaliers, who had hitherto
followed his ill-starred banner, began to desert him;
for he had not wherewithal to reward, or even to
support them. His spirits sunk with his fortune, and
he feared that in a little time he should not have a
spot of earth whereon to plant his standard, nor an
adherent to rally under it.
In the midst of his despondency, he received a
message from his lion-hearted mother, the sultana
Ayxa la Horra. For shame, said she, to linger
timorously about the borders of your kingdom, when
a usurper is seated in your capital. Why look abroad
for perfidious aid, when you have loyal hearts
beating
true to you in Granada? The Albaycin is ready
to throw open its gates to receive you. Strike home
vigorouslya sudden blow may mend all, or make
an end. A throne or a grave!for a king, there is
no honorable medium.
Boabdil was of an undecided character, but there
are circumstances which bring the most wavering to
a decision, and when once resolved they are apt to
act with a daring impulse, unknown to steadier
judgments
.
The message of the sultana roused him from
a dream. Granada, beautiful Granada, with its
stately
Alhambra, its delicious gardens, its gushing and
limpid fountains sparkling among groves of orange,
citron, and myrtle, rose before him. What have I
done, exclaimed he, that I should be an exile
from this paradise of my forefathersa wanderer
and fugitive in my own kingdom, while a murderous
usurper sits proudly upon my throne? Surely Allah
will befriend the righteous cause; one blow, and all
may be my own.
He summoned his scanty band of cavaliers. Who
is ready to follow his monarch unto the death? said
he: and every one laid his hand upon his scimitar.
Enough! said he; let each man arm himself and
prepare his steed in secret, for an enterprise of toil
and peril: if we succeed, our reward is empire.
END OF VOL. I.